, 2006 to celebrate her tenth anniversary in professional wrestling, Takahashi announced her intention to start her own promotion. Her stable, the Dream Catchers, held their final show on the following September 3. 
On October 4, 2008, Takahashi beat Kyoko Inoue to win NWA Women's Pacific/NEO Single Championship. On October 10, 2009, she won NEO Tag Team Championship with Kana. 
From January 25, 2009 to December 29, 2010, Takahashi was also active with Ice Ribbon and held International Ribbon Tag Team Championship three times (with Minori Makiba, Kazumi Shimouma and Emi Sakura) and Triangle Ribbon Championship once. 
On April 18, 2010, Takahashi beat Kayoko Haruyama to win JWP Openweight Championship. She became the second champion from outside since Manami Toyota in 2006. 
On September 7, 2010, Takahashi announced with Fuka and Rossy Ogawa that they founded a new promotion called World Wonder Ring Stardom. They had their first card on January 23, 2011. 
On May 12, 2015, Takahashi, in an interview with Tokyo Sports, announced she was leaving Stardom and continuing her career as a freelancer. On June 12, 2015, Takahashi announced she was going to start promoting her own professional wrestling events with her new production company, "Seadlinnng". On July 17, Takahashi returned to the United States, making her debut for Ring of Honor (ROH) in Las Vegas, Nevada by defeating ODB. Seadlinnng held its first show on August 26, 2015. 
On January 7, 2018, Takahashi was legitimately injured in a Hardcore Tag Team Match, while teaming up with Yoshiko against Rina Yamashita & Ryo Mizunami at WAVE Happy New Year 2018. While attempting a move from the top of a ladder, the ladder tilted and fell, causing her to fall and land on her head, legitimately knocking her unconscious. The referee ended the match, and she was taken out on a stretcher. 
Rachel Gould (born June 25, 1953 in Camden, New Jersey, as Rachel Field) is an American singer and teacher of Modern Jazz. 
Since 1991, she has worked as a lecturer in jazz singing at the Royal Conservatory of The Hague (Koninlijk Conservatorium Den Haag). 
The larvae feed on Fraxinus pennsylvanica. They mine in the stem of their host plant. They mine above the ground level in the main stem and branches of the tree. They initiate mining in the periderm but later feed exclusively in the cortex. 
This article relating to the family Gracillariidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
MacDonald Taylor Jr. (born 22 March 1992) is a United States Virgin Islands international soccer player who plays as a midfielder. 
He made his international debut for United States Virgin Islands in 2006, and has appeared in FIFA World Cup qualifying matches. 
This biographical article related to US Virgin Islander soccer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Studies at Barnes Foundation, Merion, PA, Fellowship, 1939-44 Sacramento State University, B.A. 1958 
Claude Clark was born on a tenant farm in Rockingham, Georgia November 11, 1915. In early August 1923, Clark's parents left the south for a better life in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania during the Great Migration. Clark attended Roxborough High School where he wrote poetry but also discovered a talent for painting. His Sunday School teacher encouraged him to exhibit in Sunday school class and at church. 
In 1941, Claude met the daughter of an African Methodist Episcopal Church minister, Effie May Lockhart from California. They married in June 1943 and formed a partnership in art, education and philosophy. He continued his paint studies at The Barnes Foundation while teaching art in the Philadelphia Public School system during the early years of their marriage. The couple moved to Alabama and finally California while continuing their careers. 
During the Great Depression Clark contacted the Artists Union for work through the Works Progress Administration (WPA). He worked with the WPA from 1939 to 1942. Clark joined the graphics art shop where he worked with Raymond Seth and Dox Thrash. 
Clark was the subject of many articles and publications. He also was the author of A Black Art Perspective, a Black Teachers Guide to a Black Visual Arts Curriculum, Merritt Press 1970. As a member of the Black West Coast Arts Movement he co-developed the first African American Studies curriculum. He also mentored and supported many young emerging scholars and artists. 
Claude Clark attended high school in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, graduating from Roxborough High School. From 1935 to 1939, Clark studied at the Philadelphia Museum School of Industrial Art (later the University of the Arts) on full scholarship. While studying there, he came across the work of Van Gogh. Van Gogh's style and method formed the basis of Clark's approach to drawing and painting, with thick creamy texture and loosely applied paint using a palette knife. 
While studying at Barnes in 1939, Clark found a job through the Federal Arts Project of the Works Progress Administration (WPA). He also performed independent research from 1944 to 1958. Clark moved his family to Talladega, Alabama and subsequently Sacramento, California. He received a BA from Sacramento State University in 1958 and a Master of Arts from the University of California, Berkeley in 1962. 
Clark matured in art by recognizing his opportunity to develop without being constrained by the racism, poverty and inherent inequality of circumstance prejudice and labels bring. His work exhibited social realism, modern and abstract styles. When Clark could not afford paint, he salvaged throw away paint cans from trash bins in the back of art schools and mixed his own. Unable to afford to buy paint brushes and chemicals to clean them, he mastered use of the palette knife.[citation needed] 
Clark continued to paint, research and exhibit throughout this period. Clark worked from his studio in Oakland, California following his Merritt College retirement from 1981 to 1998. He has exhibited in the United States, Africa, Caribbean, Europe and South America. 
Ketevan was born to Prince Ashotan of Mukhrani (Bagrationi) and married Prince David of Kakheti, the future David I, king of Kakheti from 1601 to 1602.  
After the uprising she negotiated with Shah Abbas I of Iran who was the suzerain over Georgia, to confirm her underage son, Teimuraz I, as king of Kakheti, while she assumed the function of a regent. 
In 1614, sent by Teimuraz as a negotiator to Shah Abbas, Ketevan effectively surrendered herself as an honorary hostage in a failed attempt to prevent Kakheti from being attacked by the Iranian armies. She was held in Shiraz for several years until Abbas I, in an act of revenge for the recalcitrance of Teimuraz, ordered the queen to renounce Christianity, and upon her refusal, had her tortured to death with red-hot pincers in 1624.[citation needed] 
Portions of her relics were clandestinely taken by the St. Augustine Portuguese Catholic missioners, eyewitnesses of her martyrdom, to Georgia where they were interred at the Alaverdi Monastery. The rest of her remains were said to have been buried at the Church of St. Augustine in Goa, India. After several expeditions to Goa in the 21st century to search for the remains, they were believed to be found in late 2013. 
In 2017, celebrating twenty five years of diplomatic relations between India and Georgia, the relics were sent to Georgia for a period of six months during which both religious and scientific events were staged. 
The Indian government has offered some parts of the holy relics of Goa to Georgia. On July 9th, 2021, the relics were handed over to the Georgian government and to Catholicos-Patriarch Ilia II of Georgia by  Indian Foreign Minister S. Jaishankar. 
Tini Beg was remembered as more suitable man for the throne by Ibn Battuta. He was considered pro-Christian and received some letters from Benedict XII, who encouraged him to convert Christianity. 
With the rise of the Nazi Party in Germany, modernist artistic movements were suppressed. Becher escaped from a military raid in 1933 and settled in Paris for a couple of years. He migrated to the Soviet Union in 1935 with the central committee of the KPD. After the German invasion of the Soviet Union in June 1941, Becher and other German communists were evacuated to internal exile in Tashkent. 
In April 1910, Becher and Fanny Fuss, a young woman he had encountered in January of that year, planned a joint suicide; Becher shot them both, killing her and wounding himself severely. His father succeeds in quashing the case of killing on demand. Becher is certified insanity. His early poetry was filled with struggling to come to terms with this event. 
From 1911 he studied medicine and philosophy in college in Munich and Jena. He left his studies and became an expressionist writer, his first works appearing in 1913. An injury from his suicide attempt made him unfit for military service/ and he became addicted to morphine, which he struggled with for the rest of the decade. 
He was also engaged in many communist organisations, joining the Independent Social Democratic Party of Germany in 1917, then went over to the Spartacist League in 1918 from which emerged the Communist Party of Germany (KPD). In 1920 he left the KPD, disappointed with the failure of the German Revolution, and embraced religion. In 1923, he returned to the KPD and very actively worked within the party. 
His art entered an expressionist period, from which he would later dissociate himself. He was part of die Kugel, an artistic group based in Magdeburg. During this time, he published in the magazines Verfall und Triumph, Die Aktion (The Action) and Die neue Kunst. 
In 1925 government reaction against his anti-war novel, (CHCI=CH)3As (Levisite) oder Der einzig gerechte Krieg, resulted in his being indicted for "literarischer Hochverrat" or "literary high treason". It was not until 1928 that this law was amended. 
After the Reichstag fire, Becher was placed on the Nazi blacklist, but he escaped from a large raid in the Berlin artist colony near Breitenbachplatz in Wilmersdorf. By March 15, 1933, he, with the support of the secretary of the Association of Proletarian-Revolutionary Authors, traveled to the home of Willy Harzheim. After staying briefly in Brno, he moved to Prague after some weeks. 
Becher was recalled to Moscow by 1942. In 1943, he became one of the founders of the National Committee for a Free Germany. 
After the Second World War, Becher returned to Germany with a KPD team, where he settled in the Soviet zone of occupation. There he was appointed to various cultural-political positions. He took part in the establishment of the Cultural Association, to "revive German culture," and founded the Aufbau-Verlag publishing house and the literature magazine, Sinn und Form. He also contributed to the satirical magazine, Ulenspiegel. 
In 1946, Becher was selected for the Party Executive Committee and the Central Committee of the Socialist Unity Party. After the establishment of the German Democratic Republic (GDR) on 7 October 1949, he became a member of the Volkskammer. He also wrote the lyrics to Hanns Eisler's melody "Auferstanden aus Ruinen," which became the national anthem of the GDR. 
That year, he helped establish the DDR Academy of Arts, Berlin.  He served as its president from 1953 to 1956, succeeding Arnold Zweig. In January 1953 he received the Stalin Peace Prize (later renamed the Lenin Peace Prize) in Moscow. 
In Leipzig in 1955, the German Institute for Literature was founded and originally named in Becher's honor. The institute's purpose was to train socialist writers. Institute graduates include Erich Loest, Volker Braun, Sarah Kirsch and Rainer Kirsch. 
From 1954 to 1958, Becher served as Minister of Culture of the GDR. During the Khrushchev Thaw, Becher fell out of favor. Internal struggles of the party eventually lead to his political demotion in 1956. 
Late in his life, Becher began to renounce socialism. His book Das poetische Prinzip (The Poetic Principle) wherein he calls socialism the fundamental error of his life ["Grundirrtum meines Lebens"] was only published in 1988. 
The following year, in declining health, Becher gave up all his offices and functions in September 1958. He died of cancer on 11 October 1958 in the East Berlin government hospital. Becher was buried at the Dorotheenstadt cemetery in the Berlin center, with his gravesite designated as a grave of honor (German: Ehrengrab) of Berlin. Becher lived in Majakowskiring 34 street, Pankow, East Berlin. 
Born in Reggio Emilia in 1920, he studied music at the Giuseppe Verdi Conservatory in Milan, where he was graduated in choral music and composition. During the Second World War, he had fought with the Italian partisans, then he moved to Rome, where he began his career as composer. 
He is probably best known for the main theme of the 1972 giallo film Amuck!, "Piacere Sequence", that was later used in The Big Lebowski, in the TV-series Spaced and in the documentary film How to Draw a Bunny. He frequently worked with director Marco Ferreri on films such as The Conjugal Bed (1963), The Ape Woman (1964), Controsesso (1964), The Man, the Woman and the Money (1965), The Man with the Balloons (1965), Dillinger Is Dead (1969), The Seed of Man (1969), and L'udienza (1972). 
His other film scores include I grandi condottieri (1965), Agente S 03: Operazione Atlantide (1965), The Seventh Floor (1967), Strogoff (1970), Il prato macchiato di rosso (1973), and Il solco di pesca (1976). 
Oedipina complex, commonly known as the Gamboa worm salamander, is a species of lungless salamander found in western South America from Costa Rica to western Colombia and north-western Ecuador. This species inhabits humid tropical lowland forest where it can be found on the ground, and on bushy vegetation, logs and rocks. It can also be found on forest edges, but it does not survive in degraded areas. Deforestation is a threat to this species. 
 The culture of the Philippines is characterized by cultural diversity. Although the multiple ethnic groups of the Philippine archipelago have only recently established a shared Filipino national identity, their cultures were all shaped by the geography and history of the region, and by centuries of interaction with neighboring cultures, colonial powers. In more recent times, Filipino culture has also been influenced through its participation in the global community." 
In 1990, more than 100 highland peoples constituted approximately three percent of the Philippine population. Over the centuries, the isolated highland peoples have retained their Indigenous cultures. The folk arts of these groups were, in a sense, the last remnants of Indigenous traditions that flourished throughout the Philippines before the Islamic and Spanish contacts. 
A formal field interpreting Psychology as rooted on the experience, ideas, and cultural orientation of the Filipinos, called Filipino Psychology, was established in 1975. 
As a general description, the distinct value system of Filipinos is rooted primarily in personal alliance systems, especially those based in kinship, obligation, friendship, religion (particularly Christianity), and commercial relationships. 
Other elements of the Filipino value system are optimism about the future, pessimism about present situations and events, concern and care for other people, the existence of friendship and friendliness, the habit of being hospitable, religious nature, respectfulness to self and others, respect for the female members of society, the fear of God, and abhorrence of acts of cheating and thievery. 
Before the arrival of European colonizers, Austronesian architecture was the common form of housing on the archipelago.[citation needed] 
However, certain areas of the country like Batanes have slight differences as both Spanish and Filipino ways of architecture assimilated differently due to the climate. Limestones and coral were used as building materials. 
Filipinos began creating paintings in the European tradition during 17th-century Spanish period. The earliest of these paintings were Church frescoes, religious imagery from Biblical sources, as well as engravings, sculptures and lithographs featuring Christian icons and European nobility. Most of the paintings and sculptures between the 19th and 20th centuries produced a mixture of religious, political, and landscape art works, with qualities of sweetness, dark, and light. 
Kut-kut, a technique combining ancient Oriental and European art process. Considered lost art and highly collectible art form. Very few known art pieces existed today. The technique was practiced by the indigenous people of Samar Island between early 1600 and late 1800 A.D. It is an exotic Philippine art form based on early century techniques: sgraffito, encaustic and layering. The merging of the ancient styles produces a unique artwork characterized by delicate swirling interwoven lines,  
Modern day Philippine music features several styles. Most music genres are contemporary such as Filipino rock, Filipino hip hop and other musical styles. Some are traditional such as Filipino folk music. 
During the 1960s, James Bond movies, bomba (soft porn) pictures and an era of musical films, produced mostly by Sampaguita Pictures, dominated the cinema. The second golden age occurred from 1970s to early 1980s. It was during this era that filmmakers ceased to produce pictures in black and white. A rise in Hollywood films dominated theater sales during the late 1980s until the 2000s. The dawn of this era saw a dramatic decline of the mainstream Philippine movie industry. 
With the high rates of film production in the past, several movie artists have appeared in over 100+ roles in Philippine Cinema and enjoyed great recognition from fans and moviegoers. 
Protest art has played an important part in Philippine history, and in the development of Philippine culture. The Propaganda Movement had been key in the formation of the Philippine national consciousness in the 19th century. In the 20th century, the proclamation of Martial law under Ferdinand Marcos - and the subsequent human rights abuses which came with it - led to the prominence of protest art in Filipino popular culture. 
Indigenous Philippine folk religions, also referred collectively as Anitism, meaning ancestral religions, are the original faiths of the diverse ethnic groups of the Philippines. Much of the texts of the religions are stored through memory which are traditionally chanted, rather than written in manuscripts.[citation needed] 
Written texts, however, have been utilized as well in modern times to preserve aspects of the religions, notably their stories which are important aspects of Philippine mythology and traditional rites and other practices. These stories consist of creation stories or stories about important figures such as deities and heroes and certain creatures.[citation needed] 
Some popular, but distinct, figures include the Tagalog's Bathala and Makiling, the Ilocano's Lam-Ang, and the Maranao's Sarimanok. 
Filipinos cook a variety of foods influenced by of main Indian, Chinese,  influences indigenous ingredients. 
Popular snacks and desserts such as chicharon (deep fried pork or chicken skin), halo-halo (crushed ice with evaporated milk, flan, sliced tropical fruit, and sweet beans), puto (white rice cakes), bibingka (rice cake with butter or margarine and salted eggs), ensaymada (sweet roll with grated cheese on top), pulburon (powder candy), and tsokolate (chocolate) are usually eaten outside the three main meals. Popular Filipino beverages include Beer, Tanduay Rhum, lambanog, and tuba. 
Every province has its own specialty and tastes vary in each region. In Bicol, for example, foods are generally spicier than elsewhere in the Philippines. Patis (fish sauce), suka (vinegar), toyo (soy sauce), bagoong, and banana ketchup are the most common condiments found in Filipino homes and restaurants. 
Western fast food chains such as McDonald's, Wendy's, KFC, and Pizza Hut are a common sight in the country. Local food chains such as Jollibee, Goldilocks Bakeshop, Mang Inasal and Chowking are also popular and have successfully competed against international fast food chains. 
The school year in the Philippines starts in June and ends in March, with a two-month summer break from April to May, two-week semestral break in October and Christmas and New Year's holidays. Changes are currently being made to the system and some universities have copied the Westernized academic calendar and now start the school year in August.[citation needed] 
In 2005, the Philippines spent about US$138 per pupil compared to US$1,582 in Singapore, US$3,728 in Japan, and US$852 in Thailand. 
Arnis, a form of martial arts, is the national sport in the Philippines. Among the most popular sports include basketball, boxing, football, billiards, chess, ten-pin bowling, volleyball, horse racing, Sepak Takraw, cockfighting and Bullfighting. Dodgeball, badminton and Tennis are also popular. 
There are several forms of Filipino martial arts that originated in the Philippines (similar to how Silat is the martial arts practiced in Asia) including Eskrima (weapon-based fighting, also known as Arnis and in the West sometimes as Kali), Panantukan (empty-handed techniques), and Pananjakman (the boxing component of Filipino martial arts). 
Traditional Philippine games such as luksong baka, patintero, piko, and tumbang preso are still played primarily as children's games among the youth. Sungka is played on a board game using small sea shells in which players try to take all shells. The winner is determined by who has the most shells at the point when all small pits become empty. 
Sabong or cockfighting is another popular entertainment especially among Filipino men, and existed prior to the arrival of the Spanish. Antonio Pigafetta, Magellan's chronicler, first documented this pastime in the kingdom of Taytay. 
The yo-yo, a popular toy in the Philippines, was introduced in its modern form by Pedro Flores with its name coming from the Ilocano language. 
The Philippines, with the National Commission for Culture and the Arts as the de facto Ministry of Culture, ratified the 2003 Convention after its formal deposit in August 2006. 
An Overseas Filipino is a person of Filipino origin, who lives outside of the Philippines. This term is applied to people of Filipino ancestry, who are citizens or residents of a different country. Often, these Filipinos are referred to as Overseas Filipino Workers. 
There are about 11 million overseas Filipinos living worldwide, equivalent to about 11 percent of the total population of the Philippines. 
Each year, thousands of Filipinos migrate to work abroad through overseas employment agencies and other programs. Other individuals emigrate and become permanent residents of other nations. Overseas Filipinos often work as doctors, nurses, accountants, IT professionals, engineers, architects, entertainers, technicians, teachers, military servicemen, students, caregivers, domestic helpers, and household maids. 
International employment includes an increasing number of skilled Filipino workers taking on unskilled work overseas, resulting in what has been referred to as brain drain, particularly in the health and education sectors. Also, the employment can result in underemployment, for example, in cases where doctors undergo retraining to become nurses and other employment programs. 
While Silay, Iloilo City, and San Fernando de Pampanga have ordinances giving certain tax exemptions to owners of heritage houses. In 2010, the Philippine Cultural Heritage Act passed into law, effectively giving protections to all cultural heritage properties of the Philippines. However, despite its passage, many ancestral home owners continue to approve the demolition of ancestral structures. In certain cases, government entities themselves were the purveyors of such demolitions. 
Xander mopes alone at his apartment but eventually can't stand it anymore and leaves. As he walks away, Anya watches him from behind some bushes. 
The next day, Willow waits for Tara outside of her classroom and the two talk and plan a coffee date. Buffy and Dawn stroll downtown, but there are very few stores where Dawn can show her face: she has confessed to shoplifting at most of them. They chat about all of the things Dawn stole and how they're working to remedy the whole problem. 
Jonathan works on a project involving the disk they stole as Warren watches over, eager for it to be complete. While Jonathan finishes his work alone, Warren and Andrew Wells talk about their inability to trust Jonathan and how soon they won't need him anymore. 
The next day, Anya has coffee with Halfrek and the two demons talk about Anya's attempts at vengeance. Halfrek reminds Anya that she can't grant her own wishes and must get someone else to wish Xander harm. 
At the Summers house, Buffy makes pancakes for Dawn. Dawn realizes she's trying too hard to make up for what happened when she was crazy, and eventually Buffy catches on to that reality as well. Dawn proposes the idea of joining Buffy on patrol so the two can spend some time together, but Buffy isn't interested in that. 
Buffy confronts Spike at his crypt with the mini camera she found. Spike denies planting the mini camera, and he further insists that he would never do anything like that to hurt Buffy, because he believes that the love between them is real. Buffy concedes that it is, for him; this hurts Spike deeply. 
At Buffy's house, Willow uses her computer to try to trace the camera's signal. Given that it was not Spike, they correctly assume that the Trio are behind it. 
Jonathan completes his work with the disk, and uses it to highlight a spot on a map of Sunnydale. The Trio are delighted, until the map catches fire. This distracts them from a red light, flashing to announce that their network has been penetrated. 
Anya and Spike drink the whiskey and complain to each other about their respective relationship problems. Spike reiterates how he despises Xander, but Anya cannot get him to make a wish. Spike also tells Anya that he likes her forthrightness. 
Willow finds more camera feeds: the Trio are watching her classrooms, the Bronze, Xander's and Buffy's workplaces. Buffy wants to find them even more urgently now. 
Spike and Anya seek comfort in each other's arms. Anya feels guilty about what happened with Xander and Spike consoles her, which leads to much more. The two kiss and undress. Andrew belatedly sees the intrusion alarm. Willow stumbles upon the Magic Box feed as Spike and Anya are having sex on a table. Warren directs Andrew to shut down the surveillance network, but they are captivated by the action on the Magic Box camera. 
In Christian tradition, the Four Evangelists are Matthew, Mark, Luke, and John, the authors attributed with the creation of the four Gospel accounts in the New Testament that bear the following titles: Gospel according to Matthew; Gospel according to Mark; Gospel according to Luke and Gospel according to John.  
The gospels of Matthew, Mark, and Luke are known as the Synoptic Gospels, because they include many of the same stories, often in the same sequence.  While the periods to which the gospels are usually dated suggest otherwise, convention traditionally holds that the authors were two of the Twelve Apostles of Jesus, John and Matthew, as well as two "apostolic men," Mark and Luke, whom Orthodox Tradition records as members of the 70 Apostles (Luke 10): 
They are called evangelists, a word meaning "people who proclaim good news," because their books aim to tell the "good news" ("gospel") of Jesus. 
Matthew is often cited as the "first Gospel account," not only owing to its place in the canon, but also in view of the patristic witness to this effect. Most biblical scholars however, see the gospel account of Mark as having been written first (see Markan priority) and John's gospel account as having been written last. 
It has become customary to speak of "the Gospel of Matthew" ... "the Gospel of John", not least because it is shorter and rolls much more smoothly off the tongue; but it is worth noting that the ancient titles do not use the genitive of possession, but the preposition "according to", signifying that each evangelist sets forth the one "Gospel of God" according to his own capacity, but not in the sense of creating his own story. 
Symbol facing evangelist portrait at the start of the Gospel of St John; Egmond Gospels, Royal Library of the Netherlands 
Sparrows is a three-piece post hardcore band originally from Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. Formed in 2010 the band consists of vocalist/guitarist Dan Thomson, guitarist Alex Pley, and drummer Jon Busby. In March 2015 the group was named one of Alternative Press magazine's "100 Bands You Need to Know". 
In May 2019 the group announced their third studio album Failed Gods via Sound Anxiety Records with the addition of bassist Jack Panic. The following month the group debuted the video for their single "Fifth Helena Drive" featuring local Toronto venue Sneaky Dee's, the same day the restaurant announced their collaborative dish "Fifth Helena Homefries". 
In November 2019 the band announced via Facebook a new lineup featuring Thomson, Busby, and the addition of guitarist Alex Pley. 
In September of 2020, Sparrows released the two song EP Death Crown digitally. These two tracks were recorded earlier in 2020 with Mario Quintero of Spotlights. 
Sparrows is considered post-hardcore utilizing melodic elements of punk and rock throughout their music. In 2013 Alternative Press described their sound as "If Moneen sounded evil" as Moneen guitarist/vocalist Kenny Bridges had produced three records for the group. A 2019 article from Metal Injection compared the group's blasts of distortion and use of dynamics to the American alternative metal group Deftones 
Paul Grandhomme was a French medalist, engraver and enameller.  Born in Paris in 1851, he died in Saint-Briac-sur-Mer in 1944. 
Another frequent collaborator of Grandhomme's was Jules Brateau, a silversmith and metal-worker.  Grandhomme used his flat as his studio, with his dining room as the main area of work, and using a furnace in his kitchen to bake the enamel.  Grandhomme also worked with the Falize Jewellery house, particularly Lucien Falize. 
The 132-meter high Baroque spire totally covered with copper is a prominent feature of Hamburg's skyline and has always been a landfall mark for ships sailing up the river Elbe. 
The composer and pianist Johannes Brahms was baptized on May 26, 1833 in this church and confirmed at the age of fifteen by Pastor von Ahlsen, who had married Brahms's parents. 
Offering 2,500 seats, the Michel is the largest church in Hamburg. The church has a Latin cross plan with 44 m width, 52 m length and 27 m height. 
The church has five organs including a Marcussen organ and a large Steinmeyer organ with its 85 registers, 5 manuals and 6674 pipes. On 9 October 2008, St. Michael's received a new crypt organ, named after Felix Mendelssohn Bartholdy. 
The pulpit is in the center of the building which was crafted out of marble by sculptor Otto Lessing from Dresden in 1910. It was designed to look like a rounded chalice and features a magnificent staircase. The large pulpit roof is crowned by the Angel of Annunciation. 
Made from white marble, the baptismal font was crafted in Livorno in 1763 and donated by Hamburg merchants who lived there at that time. The baptismal font is reminiscent of a seashell and supported by three baptism angels. 
The church is the seat of one of the three bishops of the Evangelical Lutheran Church in Northern Germany. 
Piney Prospect, also known as the Sugg House, is a historic home located near Tarboro, Edgecombe County, North Carolina. The original house was built about 1800, and enlarged to its present size about 1820.  It is a two-story, rectangular, frame dwelling in the Early Republic style.  It features a four-bay, two-tiered recessed porch with three free standing and two engaged columns.  The interior has Adamesque design elements.  Also on the property is a large barn built about 1860. 
This article about a property in Edgecombe County, North Carolina on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Spitsbergen mountain, mountain range, or peak related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ithocritus is a genus of longhorn beetles of the subfamily Lamiinae, containing the following species: 
This article related to a German film of the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Turnout in the primary election was 43.50%, with a total of 2,493,518 ballots cast. 1,321,810 Democratic and 1,171,708 Republican primary ballots were cast. 
This was the fourth consecutive election in which the state had voted for the Republican ticket in a presidential election. 
Incumbent Democrat Adlai Stevenson III, did not seek reelection. Democrat Alan J. Dixon was elected to succeed him. 
In a January 22, 1980 special election for Illinois's 10th congressional district, Republican John Porter captured what had previously been a Democratic-held seat. 
In the November election, none of Illinois' seats switched parties, with there remaining 14 Republican and seats 10 Democratic seats in Illinois' House of Representatives delegation. 
Some seats of the Illinois Senate were up for election in 1980. Democrats retained control of the chamber. 
All of the seats in the Illinois House of Representatives were up for election in 1980. Republicans flipped control of the chamber. 
The election saw the reelection first-term incumbent Democratic Nina T. Shepherd and the election of new members, Republicans Galey S. Day and Dean E. Madden. 
Illinois voters voted on a two ballot measures in 1980. In order to be approved, the measures required either 60% support among those specifically voting on the measure or 50% support among all ballots cast in the elections. 
The two measures were approved, becoming the first amendments to be successfully made following the passage of the 1970 Constitution of Illinois. 
Voters approved the Size of State House of Representatives Amendment (also known as "Amendment 1", the "Legislative Article", and the "Cutback Amendment"), which was an initiated constitutional amendment that amended Article IV, Sections 1, 2 and 3 of the Constitution of Illinois to reduce the size of the Illinois House of Representatives from 177 to 118 members, eliminated cumulative voting, and replace the use of multi-member districts with single-member districts. 
Voters approved the Sale of Tax Delinquent Property Amendment (also known as "Article 2"), which was a legislatively referred constitutional amendment that amended Article IX, Section 8 of the Constitution of Illinois to reduce the redemption period on the sale of tax delinquent property. 
Despite its name the prison has never been operated by, or housed prisoners of, Perry County. It opened in April 2006.[citation needed] A contract with the Vermont Department of Corrections for the housing of 80 offenders ended in April 2009 amid allegations of understaffing and inmates being injured. It was Vermont's first private-prison contract. 
On May 25, 2009, prisoners Ashton Mink and Joshua Southwick escaped and were re-captured after a 14-hour shootout in Gladstone, North Dakota. Shortly thereafter Alabama removed its 250 prisoners from the facility, citing money concerns, although state Prison Commissioner Richard Allen noted that LCS had taken eleven and a half hours to notify officials of the Memorial Day escape. 
The facility continues to house federal inmates of the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement and the United States Marshals Service. As of November 2013[update] only about 30 federal prisoners were held in Perry even though the Alabama state system was running at an average 192% capacity. 
He was born in Wellington, New Zealand, in 1921, and educated at Wellington College. He died in Wellington in 1995. 
He stood unsuccessfully for the Communist Party for the Island Bay electorate in 1949, 1954, 1960, 1963, and 1966. 
This biographical article related to government in New Zealand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article about an activist from New Zealand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Chatham-Kent Municipal Council is the governing body of the Municipality of Chatham-Kent in southwestern Ontario, Canada. 
The municipality is divided into six wards. Each ward elects a different number of members to council. 
Council Ward 6 - Chatham (6 Councillors) Michael Bondy Marjorie Crew Amy Finn Karen Kirkwood-Whyte Brock McGregor Douglas Sulman 
The first four yearly lists each had 50 selections. Since 2006, 25 recordings have been selected annually. As of 2020[update], a total of 550 recordings have been preserved in the Registry. Each calendar year, public nominations are accepted for inclusion in that year's list of selections, which are announced the following spring. 
Each yearly list typically includes a few recordings that have also been selected for inclusion in the holdings of the National Archives' audiovisual collection. Recordings on the National Recording Registry that are of a political nature tend to overlap with the audiovisual collection of the National Archives. The list shows overlapping items and whether the National Archives has an original or a copy of the recording. 
As of 2020[update], the oldest recording on the list is Edouard-Leon Scott de Martinville's Phonautograms which date back to the 1850s. The most recent are Colin Currie's recording of Jennifer Higdon's Percussion Concerto and the This American Life podcast episode "The Giant Pool of Money" (each from 2008). 
Patrick Greene (born 1985) is an American composer and performer of contemporary classical music. A lifelong resident of New England, he has been based in Boston, Massachusetts, since 2008. 
Greene earned his MM in Composition from the Boston Conservatory in May 2010, where his primary teachers were Andy Vores and Dalit Warshaw. While at the Conservatory, he also studied with Jan Swafford and Curtis Hughes. His undergraduate career was at Trinity College, where he earned his B.A. in Music in 2007. His primary teachers at Trinity were Gerald Moshell and Douglas Bruce Johnson. 
In writing about Greene's style, Jonathan Blumhofer of the Boston Classical Review notes "his musical language is ... diverse," with a "wide emotional breadth.". His music has been called "undeniably expressive and smartly crafted." 
Greene has described his music as "extractive," rather than "abstractive," while still noting the unique expressive power of music as an abstract medium. 
In interviews, Greene has cited the work of composers like Maurice Ravel, Steven Stucky, Igor Stravinsky, Toru Takemitsu, and Charles Ives as inspiration; he also draws influence from Anglican choral traditions and rock bands such as Radiohead and Tool. 
Recent projects include Mabinte, a co-composition with the percussionist/composer Ryan Edwards. Commissioned by the Boston Landmarks Orchestra, it paired the orchestral musicians with dozens of young members of Greater Boston Boys and Girls Clubs, and featured choreography by Brian Mirage. It premiered in the Hatch Memorial Shell on the Charles River Esplanade in the summer of 2016. 
Greene's song cycle Year of Glad, based on erasure poetry by Jenni B. Baker from David Foster Wallace's Infinite Jest, premiered in Chicago in spring 2016. Other recent vocal works include "Come soon, you feral cats", a cycle on the poetry of W. S. Di Piero written for and premiered by the New York-based loadbang ensemble. 
Steel Symphony, a 2013 composition for virtuoso organ, has been performed extensively across the United States. Composed for Christopher Houlihan, it gained special praise in the New York Times. 
Connie Cynthia Henry (born 15 April 1972 in London) is a female social mobility consultant and former international triple jumper who won bronze in the 1998 Commonwealth Games in Kuala Lumpur. She is the founder and director of Track Academy by Connie Henry in north-west London, a registered charity which supports young people from disadvantaged backgrounds through sport, education and mentoring, thus creating social mobility. 
Connie moved to Sydney in the autumn of 1997 to train with Keith Connor, a former British Olympic triple jump medallist and then-Australian head coach.  
In the summer of 1998, she set a personal best of 13.95m in Thurrock, took fourth at the 1998 European Cup, and represented Great Britain at the 1998 European Athletics Championships. 
After coming third at the 2000 AAA Championships, Connie decided to retire from professional athletics, returning to live in the UK.  
She then moved into sports journalism, providing commentary for broadcasters such as Eurosport, Sky and the BBC, reporting on events such as the IAAF World Championships in Athletics and the Summer Olympics. She also worked with boxing promoter Frank Warren, a role which saw her broadcast from the heavyweight match between Vitali Klitschko and Danny Williams in Las Vegas. 
Connie launched Track Academy by Connie Henry in 2007 at the Willesden Sports Centre in London, where she herself trained as a teenager. Now a registered charity, the organisation uses sport, education and mentoring to support young people, helping to reduce the negative impact of gangs, drugs and crime.  
Sporting sessions are held for two- to 21-year-olds three times a week, with toddler sessions for two-year-olds up and multi-skills classes available for children aged from four to ten. Members are offered English and Maths classes on Saturdays at Capital City Academy, next to the sports centre, while they can also benefit from one-on-one mentoring support. The work of Track Academy was featured in an ITV documentary, Run For Your Life, in April 2019. 
2015 in paleoentomology is a list of new fossil insect taxa that were described during the year 2015, as well as other significant discoveries and events related to paleoentomology that were scheduled to occur during the year. 
A leaf beetle belonging to the subfamily Galerucinae found in Rovno amber. The type species is Archealtica convexa. 
A lamprosomatine leaf beetle. Genus contains two species known from Baltic amber: Archelamprosomius balticus and Archelamprosomius kirejtshuki. 
A skin beetle belonging to the subfamily Attageninae found in Dominican amber, a species of Attagenus. 
A skin beetle belonging to the subfamily Megatominae found in Dominican amber, a species of Caccoleptus. 
A skin beetle belonging to the subfamily Megatominae found in Dominican amber, a species of Caccoleptus. 
A darkling beetle belonging to the subfamily Alleculinae and the tribe Gonoderini. The type species is Calcarocistela kirejtshuki. 
A monotomid beetle. The type species is C. birmanicus; genus also contains C. hispanicus from the Albian of Spain. 
A skin beetle belonging to the subfamily Megatominae found in Dominican amber, a species of Cryptorhopalum. 
A skin beetle belonging to the subfamily Megatominae found in Dominican amber, a species of Cryptorhopalum. 
A skin beetle belonging to the subfamily Megatominae found in Baltic amber, a species of Globicornis. 
A member of Sphindidae. Genus contains five species: L. poinari, L. impexa, L. limosa, L. straminea and L. slipinskii. 
A longhorn beetle belonging to the subfamily Spondylidinae and the tribe Anisarthrini found in Baltic amber. The type species is Mesalocerus tetropoides. 
A leaf beetle belonging to the subfamily Chrysomelinae. The type species is M. antenattus; genus also includes M. adapertilis, M. angusticollis, M. basicollis and M. trapezicollis. 
A member of Buprestidae. The type species is Mongoligenula altilabdominis; genus also contains Mongoligenula gracilis. 
A member of Aderidae. Genus contains four species: P. densipunctatus, P. saeticornis, P. glabricornis and P. mara. 
A member of Brentidae belonging to the subfamily Nanophyinae. The type species is Palaeonanophyes zherikhini. 
A member of Brentidae belonging to the subfamily Apioninae and the tribe Tanaini found in Oise amber. The type species is Palaeotanaos oisensis. 
A lophocaterine trogossitid beetle. The type species is Paracretocateres bellus. Kirejtshuk (2017) considered the genus Paracretocateres to be a junior synonym of the genus Forticatinius Tan & Ren (2007). 
A member of Glaphyridae. The type species is Paraglaphyrus yixianensis; genus also contains Paraglaphyrus ovalis, Paraglaphyrus robustus and Paraglaphyrus subtilis. 
A relative of reticulated beetles. A new genus for "Simmondsia" permiana Ponomarenko (2004); genus also contains new species Proterocupes nedubrovensis and Proterocupes major. 
A weevil belonging to the family Attelabidae found in Dominican amber, a species of Pseudopilolabus. 
A false darkling beetle belonging to the tribe Dircaeini found in Baltic amber. The type species is Quasianisoxya curonensis. 
A leaf beetle belonging to the subfamily Cassidinae found in Baltic amber. The type species is Succinispa stainesi. 
A lamprosomatine leaf beetle found in Baltic amber. The type species is Succinoomorphus warchalowskii. 
A leaf beetle belonging to the subfamily Eumolpinae found in Baltic amber, a species of Taphioporus. 
A leaf beetle belonging to the subfamily Eumolpinae found in Baltic amber, a species of Taphioporus. 
A darkling beetle belonging to the tribe Palorini found in Baltic amber. The type species is Vabole triplehorni. 
A member of Ochodaeidae belonging to the subfamily Chaetocanthinae and the tribe Synochodaeini. The type species is Yixianochodaeus horridus. 
A member of Scarabaeoidea belonging to the family Eremazidae. The type species is Yixianscarabaeus sulcatus; genus also includes Yixianscarabaeus tenuistriatus. 
A ceratopogonid midge. Originally described as a species of Archiculicoides; Borkent (2019) transferred this species to the genus Archiaustroconops. 
A zhangsolvid stratiomyomorph. Genus contains two species: Buccinatormyia magnifica and B. soplaensis. 
A member of Chironomidae belonging to the tribe Tanytarsini found in Baltic amber. The type species is Eonandeva helva; genus also contains Eonandeva latistyla. 
A black fly found in Rovno amber. Originally described as a species of Hellichiella; Perkovsky & Sukhomlin (2016) transferred it to the genus Greniera and considered it to be a junior synonym of Greniera yankovskyi. 
A moth fly. Originally described as a species of Nemopalpus, but subsequently transferred to the genus Palaeoglaesum. 
A moth fly. The type species is Palaeoparasycorax globosus; genus also contains Palaeoparasycorax suppus. 
A trichomyiine psychodid found in New Jersey amber. The type species is Xenotrichomyia newjerseyiensis. 
A procercopid cicadomorph, a relative of froghoppers; a replacement name for Sinotettegarcta longa Hong (1986). 
A member of Saldidae. The type species is Baissotea infanta; genus also contains Baissotea peregrina and Baissotea popovi. 
A member of Cicadomorpha belonging to the family Scytinopteridae. The type species is Euroscytina lutevanorum. 
A monophlebid scale insect found in Baltic amber. Genus contains two species: P. hoffeinorum and P. kotejai. 
A member of Sternorrhyncha belonging to the superfamily Psylloidea and the family Protopsyllidiidae, a species of Permopsyllidium. 
An augiline caliscelid planthopper found in Dominican amber. The type species is Quizqueiplana alexbrowni. 
A procercopid cicadomorph. The type species is Stellularis longirostris; genus also contains "Anthoscytina" aphthosa Ren, Yin & Dou (1998) and "Anthoscytina" macula Hu, Yao & Ren (2014). 
A cimicomorph, probably a member of Thaumastocoridae, found in Baltic amber. The type species is Thaumastotingis areolatus. 
An ellinaphidid aphid. Genus contains two species: Vetellinaphis cracens and Vetellinaphis longalata. 
An ant belonging to the subfamily Myrmicinae. The type species is B. zherikhini; genus also contains B. lata and B. rugosa. 
A braconid wasp. The type species is C. keeleyorum from the Green River Formation; genus also contains "Ichneutes" contortus Brues (1933) known from Baltic amber. 
A praesiricid sawfly. The type species is Decorisiricius patulus; genus also contains Decorisiricius longus. 
A cuckoo wasp found in Baltic amber; a replacement name for Protochrysis Bischoff (1916) and its first replacement name Protochrysidis Carpenter (1985) (both preoccupied). 
A member of Pergidae belonging to the subfamily Euryinae. The type species is F. perfectus; genus also includes F. propinquus. 
A praesiricid sawfly. The type species is Decorisiricius aequalis; genus also contains Limbisiricius complanatus. 
An ant belonging to the subfamily Ponerinae, a species of Pachycondyla. A replacement name for Pachycondyla minuta Dlussky & Wedmann (2012) (preoccupied). 
A member of Pteromalidae belonging to the subfamily Cerocephalinae found in Baltic amber. The type species is Pteropilosa lailarabanorum. 
A member of Pteromalidae belonging to the subfamily Cerocephalinae found in Dominican amber. The type species is Tenuicornus dominicus. 
A beaded lacewing. A new genus for "Mesithone" protea Panfilov (1980); genus also contains "Mesithone" gracilis Panfilov (1980). 
A neuropteran of uncertain phylogenetic placement; originally described as an osmylid, but Winterton et al. (2019) transferred it to the family Nymphidae. The type species is C. magnificus. 
Originally classified as a pleasing lacewing; subsequently considered to be a member of the superfamily Psychopsoidea of uncertain phylogenetic placement by Lu, Zhang & Liu (2016), while Liu et al. (2018) considered it to be a member of the family Kalligrammatidae. The type species is C. magnificus. 
An osmylopsychopid neuropteran. Five species: D. dissectus, D. clausus, D. inanis, D. bifasciatus and D. cubitalis. 
A mantispid neuropteran; a new genus for "Mesithone" carnaria Khramov (2013) and "Mesithone" monstruosa Khramov (2013). Jepson, Khramov & Ohl (2018) transferred "Mesithone" monstruosa to the genus Ovalofemora. 
A nymphid neuropteran. Originally described as a species of Sialium; Archibald & Makarkin (2020) transferred it to the genus Spilonymphes. 
A member of Lepidoptera belonging to the family Eolepidopterigidae. The type species is Aclemus patulus. 
A relative of stick insects belonging to the family Permophasmatidae. The type species is Arachnephasma scurra. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Chaulioditidae. The type species is Arkhangeloptera sokica. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Lemmatophoridae; a species of Artinska. 
A flea belonging to the family Pulicidae found in Dominican amber. The type species is Atopopsyllus cionus. 
A mecopteran of uncertain phylogenetic placement; a new genus for "Prochoristella" leongatha Jell & Duncan (1986). 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Daldubidae. The type species is Batkentak intactus. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Permotermopsidae. The type species is Belebey mutilus. The generic name is a junior homonym of Belebey Ivakhnenko (1973); Aristov (2019) coined a replacement name Belebeus. 
A member of Holometabola of uncertain phylogenetic placement. The type species is Cavalarva caudata. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Chaulioditidae; a species of Chauliodites. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the order Reculida and the family Chelopteridae, a species of Chelopterum. 
A member of Lepidoptera belonging to the family Micropterigidae found in Baltic amber, a species of Electrocrania. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Geinitziidae; a species of Geinitzia. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Permotermopsidae, a species of Idelina. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Pinideliidae. The type species is Idelopterum samoedum. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Atactophlebiidae. The type species is Issadophlebia fusa. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Doubraviidae. The type species is Iva permiana. The generic name is a junior homonym of the pontellid Iva Lubbock (1853). 
A member of Archaeorthoptera belonging to the group Caloneurodea. The type species is Jarmiloptera mouralensis. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Euryptilonidae; a new genus for "Sylvardembia" pectinata Novokshonov, (2000). 
A member of Cnemidolestida/Cnemidolestodea (an extinct group of insects of uncertain phylogenetic placement, might be related to plecopterans or orthopterans) belonging to the family Protembiidae. The type species is Kirovopteron luteus. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Doubraviidae. The type species is "Cerasopterum" megakhosaroides Aristov (2004). 
A member of Grylloblattida (an extinct group of insect containing putative relatives of extant grylloblattids) belonging to the family Sylvaphlebiidae. The type species is Lodevophlebia reticulata. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Eoblattidae. The type species is Lomovatka udovichenkoi. 
A member of Protorthoptera, possibly a member of the family Sheimiidae; a new genus for "Pseudosheimia" alligans Aristov & Rasnitsyn (2009). 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Atactophlebiidae. The type species is Malmyzhia kazanica. 
A corydioid cockroach and/or a possible relative of the mantises. The type species is Manipulator  modificaputis. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Megakhosaridae, a species of Megakhosarella. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Atactophlebiidae. The type species is Novokshonovus ignoratus Aristov & Rasnitsyn; genus also includes Novokshonovus boreus Aristov. 
A member of Grylloblattida (an extinct group of insect containing putative relative of extant grylloblattids) belonging to the family Euryptilonidae, a species of Oborella. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Mesorthopteridae, a species of Parastenaropodites. 
A member of Grylloblattida (an extinct group of insect containing putative relative of extant grylloblattids). The type species is Permobaharellus salagousensis. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Permopectinidae, a species of Permopectina. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Geinitziidae; a species of Permoshurabia. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to group Reculida and the family Geinitziidae, a species of Permoshurabia. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Geinitziidae. The type species is Permovalia abortiva. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Protophasmatidae; a new genus for "Paranarkemina" martinsnetoi Pinto (1999). 
A damsel-dragonfly belonging to the clade Isophlebioptera. The type species is Pseudostenolestes bechlyi. 
A member of Dictyoptera of uncertain phylogenetic placement. The type species is Raptoblatta waddingtonae. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Geinitziidae; a species of Shurabia. 
A member of the family Bajanzhargalanidae, a possible relative of ice crawlers. Genus contains four species: Sinonele fangi, Sinonele hei, Sinonele phasmoides and Sinonele mini. 
An aykhalid megasecopteran. Genus contains Sinopalaeopteryx olivieri and Sinopalaeopteryx splendens. 
A member of Cnemidolestida/Cnemidolestodea belonging to the family Protembiidae. The type species is Soyanocadaver crypticus. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Geinitziidae; a species of Stegopterum. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Cacurgidae. The type species is Suksunus bicodex. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Liomopteridae; a species of Sylvaella. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Sylvaphlebiidae; a species of Sylvaphlebia. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Sylvaphlebiidae; a species of Sylviodes. 
A member of Grylloblattida/Eoblattida belonging to the family Mesorthopteridae. The type species is "Alicula" asiatica Storozhenko (1997). 
A member of Hypoperlida belonging to the family Tococladidae. The type species is Tshekardocladus sparsus. 
A member of Cnemidolestida/Cnemidolestodea belonging to the family Protembiidae, a species of Tshekardomina. 
A member of Polyneoptera/Gryllones belonging to the group Reculida and the family Lemmatophoridae; a species of Uraloprisca. 
Space Night (full title: space night - All-tag nachts) is the name of a German television program in the early night/morning hours each day. It is a mixture of chill-out-music and images of the earth as seen from space interspersed with informative broadcasts. It was started by the Bayerischer Rundfunk (BR) in 1994 and is now broadcast by ARD-alpha. 
The Space Night's structure consists of several different sub-programs. In any given month, on any given weekday, the programs will be the same. In the next month, the programs will change, but again stay the same for the same weekdays. There are no broadcasts during Friday and Saturday nights. 
Space Night itself does not have any opening or closing credits; only the sub-programs may do. You can recognize a program is part of Space Night in two ways: 
The sub-programs are never all part of any single Space Night. Instead the programs from the beginning of a Space Night are repeated at the end, so that some episodes of a program may be broadcast twice during one Space Night. If a program would continue to run longer than the Space Night itself, it will be interrupted in the middle. 
Space Night started in 1994 as a replacement of the test cards which were broadcast on BR at night  until this time. The idea originated in the fact that the German satellite ASTRO-SPAS (see STS-80) had recorded many hours of video footage in space. The BR received this footage, edited the material and added downtempo spherical music. 
As BR did not want to show the same pictures 7 days a week, both NASA and ESA as well as the German Aerospace Center were addressed. They offered more hours of footage from in and around space, which were thus included. 
The restart was scheduled for November 1, 2013. It had to be postponed to November, 15th, because NASA was not able to provide the necessary graphical material, due to the Government shutdown in the United States. 
Since the 25th anniversary of the first human landing on the moon the original  version of the broadcast of the ARD is shown at the exact time of the original  airing. 
Zola holds a Bachelor of Arts degree, with distinction, from the University of Michigan in Ann Arbor (1973), and a Master of Arts degree in Counseling Psychology from Northwestern University in Evanston, Illinois (1976). He earned a Master of Arts in Hebrew Letters (1981), Rabbinic Ordination (1982), a Master of Philosophy (1988) from HUC-JIR. Zola received his Ph.D. in American Jewish History from HUC-JIR in 1991. 
A very good connoisseur of music, he published works on Schubert and Wagner and traced the history of the ballet since Louis XIV. 
 Waimataitai is a suburb of Timaru, in the South Canterbury district and Canterbury region of New Zealand's South Island.  
Northtown Mall opened at Waimataitai in the 1970s. It was upgraded in 2016, and includes a Pak'nSave supermarket. 
A number of chain stores have their Timaru branches at Waimataitai, including Briscoes, and Supercheap Auto. There are a number of fast food outlets in the area, including McDonald's, KFC, Domino's Pizza and Pizza Hut. 
Sweep was bred by James R. Keene. He was sired by Kentucky Derby winner Ben Brush out of the Domino mare Pink Domino. he was trained by James Rowe. Sweep was a Champion two-year-old with a long stride. He placed second in the Hopeful Stakes and the Saratoga Special Stakes before he won the Futurity Stakes by over half a dozen lengths under a tight hold. 
Racing at three, with jockey James Butwell aboard, Sweep won the 1910 Belmont Stakes in a time of 2:22 when the race was contested at 1 3/8 miles. He was the favorite at 1 to 10 odds and won by six lengths over the only other starter, Duke of Ormonde. It was one of only five times in the history of the stakes race that just two horses have been entered. 
Retired to Keene's Castleton Farm, in 1917 Sweep was the leading sire of two-year-olds. He was the leading sire by earnings of all horses in 1918 and again in 1925.  He was a great sire and broodmare sire, with three daughters that produced Kentucky Derby winners.  They were Beaming Beauty, dam of Bubbling Over; Brushup, dam of War Admiral; and Dust Whirl, dam of Whirlaway.  Both War Admiral and Whirlaway became Triple Crown champions. 
His daughter Washoe Belle became the foundation mare to whom trace Forward Pass, Alydar, Princess Turia, T.V. Lark., etc. 
Another daughter, La Chica, became the foundation mare to whom trace Grey Flight and Native Dancer, which bring the Northern Dancer and Mr. Prospector lines. 
Other successful progeny include Eternal, General Thatcher, The Porter, Leonardo, Bon Homme, and Pen Rose. 
In molecular biology, Caf1 capsule antigen proteins are a family of the F1 capsule antigens Caf1 synthesised by Yersinia bacteria. They adopt a structure consisting of a seven strands arranged in two beta-sheets, in a Greek-key topology, and mediate targeting of the bacterium to sites of infection. 
He retired in 1981 but stayed involved visiting and speaking to labor union groups almost until the end of his life. He died in 1990, survived at that time by his wife of 46 years, Helen Stickno, his daughters, Lois Wolkowitz and Carol Alt and four grandchildren, Matthew Alt, Allyson Alt, Rachel Wolkowitz Mack, and Jacob Wolkowitz. 
Simon Jackson is a British playwright, filmmaker and poet, born in Manchester, UK. His plays deal with themes of redemptive love, the trauma of creation and the peeling back of layers to reveal the truth. The plays often exist in a dream like space between reality and fantasy and are characterised by poetic language and rich imagery. 
Born in Manchester, Jackson studied Literature and Commercial Art at North Carolina State University in Raleigh, USA and Drama at Manchester University. He was later graduated with an MA (Distinction) in Textual Analysis and Creative Writing at the University of Edinburgh. 
He was director of Living Arts Space Theatre Company, Manchester, from 1992 until 1995. He co-wrote a series of training films for Reuters International and a series of radio plays for French children learning English then left to teach in Eastern Europe, North Africa and South America. In 1998 he became the academic advisor to Heinemann/Macmillan, for Peru and was Head of Drama at Newton International College, Lima from 1998 to 2001. 
He has been the winner of several literary competitions, including the Malton Literature Festival Poetry Award 2011, Ware Poets Sonnet Prize 2011, Segora Poetry Prize 2010/11, The Writers Bureau Poetry Competition 2010, Grace Dieux Writers' Prize 2009 and Tyne Valley Writers Open Poetry Competition in 1997. He was the judge for the Grace Dieu Award 2010. 
Other short films include work for Billy Bragg's Jail Guitar Doors charity and collaborations with Get Cape. Wear Cape. Fly and with Scottish poets and artists Brian McCabe, Andrew Greig, Ali Hayes and Aonghas MacNeacail, shown by the BBC, at the UN Climate Change Conference in Mexico and at Film and Literary Festivals around the world. 
He was invited to write a series of treatments for Transporter 2 (2004) by Jason Statham. Although the treatments were not used he has recently finished a full length screenplay for a new Statham project. 
Greatest Hits contains songs from The Hooters' three albums on Columbia Records: Nervous Night (1985), One Way Home (1987) and Zig Zag (1989). 
The Electronika BK is a series of 16-bit PDP-11-compatible fanless home computers developed under the Electronika brand by NPO Scientific Center, then the leading microcomputer design team in the Soviet Union. It was also the predecessor of the more powerful UKNC and DVK micros. 
The BK series was essentially a barebones machine, with no peripherals or programming tools. The only software available at the launch, except read-only memory (ROM) firmware, was an included magnetic tape with several programming examples (for the languages BASIC and FOCAL), and several tests. The ROM firmware includes a simple program to enter machine codes, BASIC and FOCAL interpreters. 
One of the operating systems was ANDOS, although officially the computer was shipped with OS BK-11, a modification of RT-11. 
It was not uncommon among owners to install one or two mechanical switches that made using the computer more convenient. Some of the common mods were: 
These modifications are relatively simple and can be carried out by users who knew how to handle a soldering iron. Most of the people in the program sales cottage industry can also do the mods for a small fee. Enthusiasts also managed to connect more advanced devices to BK series computers: they developed a hard disk drive (HDD) controller, and 2.5" HDDs were successfully used with BK computers. Other popular enhancements are AY-3-8912 sound chips and Covox Speech Thing. 
There are various software emulators of BK for modern IBM PC compatible computers. An emulator is able to run at a much higher speed than the original BK. 
There are also fairly complete re-implementations of the BK for field-programmable gate array (FPGA) based systems, such as the MiST. 
The Milkanskoye mine is a large iron mine located in eastern Russia in the Far Eastern Federal District. Milkanskoye represents one of the largest iron ore reserves in Russia and in the world having estimated reserves of 2.7 billion tonnes of ore grading 31.5% iron metal. 
Dyani was born (3 years before the establishment of Apartheid) and grew up in Duncan Village, East London, in the Buffalo City Metropolitan Municipality, eastern Cape Province of South Africa.. 
In 1966, Dyani toured Argentina with Steve Lacy's quartet. Lacy, Dyani and Moholo recorded The Forest and the Zoo. 
In 1971, Dyani formed his own group Earthquake Power, and in 1972 co-founded Xaba with Mongezi Feza and Okay Temiz. 
After his death, the remaining members of The Blue Notes reunited to record a moving tribute album, entitled Blue Notes for Johnny. Other musical tributes include: 
In a memorial published in the South African magazine Rixaka, Pallo Jordan wrote of Dyani: "Above all, his music resounded with a joy in life." 
Jungle Lord also included an innovative scoring feature called Double Trouble, a drop target feature that engages when the player hits five special targets. 
Jungle Lord was the second of the four two-level System 7 games that Williams produced, the others being Black Knight, Pharaoh and Solar Fire. 
The early production of the game had a red cabinet, and around 100 units were made. The later ones had a blue cabinet and the tiger artwork was slightly changed. 
During subsequent years in the opposition, Otero published a weekly newsletter called the Confidential Information Service (SIC). In this publication, he revealed information that he personally received about acts of corruption by government officials. 
The 2003 London Broncos season was the twenty-fourth in the club's history and their eighth season in the Super League. The club was coached by Tony Rea, competing in Super League VIII and finishing in 5th place. The club also got to the fifth round of the Challenge Cup. 
Source: Rugby League Project. Classification: 1st on competition points; 2nd on match points difference. Competition points: for win = 2; for draw = 1; for loss = 0. 
Richard John Howson (born August 1968) is a British businessman, and the former chief executive (CEO) of Carillion, a British multinational facilities management and construction services company that went into liquidation in January 2018. Howson's "misguided self-assurance" was said to have contributed to the company's collapse. 
Howson was educated at Settle College, and earned a bachelor's degree in construction management from Leeds Polytechnic. 
Howson worked at Balfour Beatty, Bovis, and Tarmac before becoming operations director for the Carillion Building business in 1999. In March 2004 he was promoted to national construction director on the Carillion Building senior management team, before becoming managing director of Carillion Rail in 2006, and then managing director of Carillion's Middle East and North African operations in 2007. Howson was appointed chief operating officer of Carillion in September 2010. 
Carillion investors said the board focused more on their pay than the company's performance, with the protection of directors' pay extending to the creation of a secret bank account for Howson's share-related bonuses. 
In the final report of the Parliamentary inquiry into the collapse of Carillion, published on 16 May 2018, Howson was severely criticised, described as "the figurehead for a business model that was doomed to fail". The report continued: 
The report also recommended that the Insolvency Service should consider whether the former Carillion directors, including Howson, could be disqualified from acting as a director. 
Howson became a non-executive director of Wood Group in April 2016, but resigned on 17 January 2018, following the collapse of Carillion. 
Maud Island is an important predator free nature reserve (officially a Scientific Reserve as defined under New Zealand's Reserves Act) to which only scientists and conservationists have access. Visitors need a special permit issued by the New Zealand Department of Conservation. 
Thanks to the efforts of conservationist Don Merton the kakapo was introduced onto the predator-free island in 1974. Additional kakapo were subsequently translocated onto other Islands like Codfish Island, Anchor Island and Little Barrier Island. 
After only one breeding attempt by pair Flossie and Richard Henry in 1998 where three chicks were born, Maud Island's kakapo population was translocated to more forested islands. The takahe was also introduced there in 1985. 
Another rare species is the Maud Island frog (Leiopelma pakeka), which was split from the Hamilton's frog (Leiopelma hamiltoni) in 1998 and is now seen as its own species. Maud Island has a rich invertebrate fauna. Weta are numerous with tree weta, cave weta and Cook Strait giant weta likely to be seen at night. A large weevil, the flax weevil can be seen on flax and the rare Cook Strait click beetle is also present on the island. 
Welcome to Australia is a 1999 Carlton Television documentary, written and presented by  John Pilger and directed and produced by Alan Lowery that demonstrates the injustices endured by Aboriginal Australian sportsmen and women who were, until recently, denied a place on Australia's olympic teams. 
"Whatever one may think of Pilger's style," stated Richard Ackland of ABC's Media Watch, "his film reminded us of a shameful and tragic history". 
Prince George, Duke of Kent, brother of King George VI, died in an air crash on a hillside near Morven on 25 August 1942 while serving in the Royal Air Force. 
The club added Nordic skiing in 1923, track and field in 1929 and bandy in 1934. All these were later abolished. The club got its own sports field with gravel surface in 1934, and a grass pitch in 1947. The grass pitch was changed to artificial turf in 2007, the same year that the name Ferd Stadion was inaugurated. The club colors are red and blue. 
Daphne erosiloba is a shrub, of the family Thymelaeaceae.  It is native to China, specifically Western Sichuan. 
The following list is a discography of production by No I.D., an American hip hop record producer from Chicago, Illinois. It includes a list of songs produced, co-produced and remixed by year, artist, album and title. 
Coventry Godcakes are baked puff pastry pasties containing sweet mincemeat, which originate from the city of Coventry, England. They are in the form of a right-angled isosceles triangle, marked with three slits on the top and sprinkled with sugar. The triangular shape and the markings are said to be reference to the Holy Trinity. 
Godcakes are a New Year tradition in the city, and are given by godparents to their godchildren along with a blessing for the year ahead. 
In 2010, Leigh Waite, a local Blue Badge Tourist Guide with an interest in baking, was given a recipe by a local historian David McGrory. Leigh tried out the recipe, producing them to sell during the annual Heritage Open Weekend event in the city. 
In August 2012, the Coventry Godcake was officially re-launched at a celebration event at Coventry Transport Museum attended by the Lord Mayor and guests, including the Coventry Mummers. 
The triangles created in country lanes where three lanes meet derive their names from the Coventry Godcake. A triangle is created by the passing of farm vehicles, originally horse drawn carts,  as they turn. The so-called "god cakes", which are not particular to any one city or county, take their name from these triangular pastries. 
This biographical article related to a South African cricket person born in the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
With the beginning of the Second World War, Andrews returned to work as a welder, this time for the British Power Company, constructing warships. There she met Walter Morgan, whom she married in 1943. Seven wartime depictions of ships by Andrews are in the collection of the Royal Air Force Museum London. 
In 1925 she was employed by Iain Macnab as the first secretary of The Grosvenor School of Modern Art, where she also attended Claude Flight's linocutting classes. Around 1926 she began producing linocuts and one of her earliest prints Limehouse is in the British Museum Collection. Between 1928 and 1938 she exhibited linocuts extensively through shows organised by Flight. 
Flight's most technical achievement to the medium was abandoning the key-block, forcing his students to create structure with color. In this way, Andrews relies on three to five blocks (one per color) and common print inks applied with a simple roller in order to create her lively prints. 
Interest in her work was revived in late 2019, when the Dulwich Picture Gallery hosted an exhibition of the works of the Grosvenor School from June to September, which included several examples of her prints. Approximately a month after it closed, an exhibition concentrating on wholly her works opened at the Glenbow Museum in Canada, which finished in January the next year. 
In 1947 she and Morgan moved to Canada and settled in Campbell River, British Columbia. Seeking a new life together after the depression of two world wars, Andrews and Morgan moved to a small cottage in the logging community on Vancouver Island where they made ends meet building and repairing boats. Rediscovered in the art world during the 1970s and 1980s, Andrews became a local celebrity and spent the rest of her life working, painting and teaching. 
Sybil Andrews was elected to the Society of Canadian Painters, Etchers and Engravers in 1951 when her linocut Indian Dance was selected as the presentation print. In 1975, while working as a teacher and focusing on her practice, she completed one of her major works The Banner of St Edmund. It is hand embroidered in silks on linen and was first conceived, designed and begun in 1930. This banner now hangs in St Edmundsbury Cathedral, Bury St Edmunds, the town of her birth. 
The Glenbow Museum in Canada holds copyright for Andrews' estate and houses the majority of her work with a collection of over 1000 examples, including the main body of her colour linocuts, original linoleum blocks, oil paintings and watercolour, drawings, drypoint etchings, sketchbooks, and personal papers. In recent years her works have sold extremely well at auction with record prices being achieved, primarily within Canada. 
In 2015 an exhibition was held at the Art Gallery of Greater Victoria, Canada, A Study in Contrast: Sybil Andrews and Gwenda Morgan, comparing and contrasting fellow Grosvenor School artists. In 2017 her work was included in the exhibition, The Ornament of a House: Fifty Years of Collecting at the Burnaby Art Gallery. A full exhibition history is available in Sybil Andrews Linocuts. 
The river surface is generally frozen from mid-December to the end of March. Safe traffic on the ice is generally from late December to early March. The water level of the river varies with the seasons and the precipitation. 
The original name of the village, Les Contamines, is from the word contamines, which in the ancient local dialect meant ploughable land on the estate of the squire. 
Creation of the local Mountain Guides Company which was established in 1850, marked the first corporation in the village dedicated to tourism. Further development surged after 1900, in the form of hotels, restaurants, and, in 1911, a local ski club.  The first ski lift began operation in 1937. 
After World War II, in 1949, the name was changed to Les Contamines-Montjoie. The first chair lift opened three years later, in 1952, along with a summer attraction at l'Etape. 
The village of Les Contamines is a jewel at the heart of the Mont Blanc region. The sensation of a hidden valley results in a very close knit local community. The village has preserved its historic aspect. More than 70% of old farm buildings have been restored in respect of the local Savoy architecture. 
Les Contamines Montjoie main industry is tourism through its Skiing Area which is moderately sized. It ranges from the village at around 1100m to l'Aiguille Croche (Crooked Needle) at around 2500m. There are four sections of the ski area: the Tierces section, the Roselette section, the Montjoie section and the Hauteluce section. 
The Tierces section faces south: it is the highest section of the resort and possesses the resort's hardest black runs, Grevettaz and Rebans. The Tierces section also has easier blue and red runs such as Coins (blue) and Tierces (red). From most places in the Tierces section one can, weather permitting, see a vivid panorama of Mont Blanc and its neighbouring peaks including Aiguille de Bionnassay and Domes de Miage. 
The Roselette section is a north-facing area of ski runs which range from blue to black, the hardest run in this section being the black of Olympique. The Aiguille de Rosselette towers over the majority of the section giving it its name. There is off piste potential in the steep couloirs of the Aiguille de Rosselette. 
The Hauteluce section is the name given to the section of runs on the other side of the Col du Joly in the Val Joly (rather than the Val Montjoie). The run difficulty is varied in this section. 
In March 2021 he was appointed to be the commander of the Southern Command, and led the operation Guardian of the Walls right after his appointment. 
Like most pumped-storage facilities, the power station uses two reservoirs, releasing and pumping as the demand rises and falls.  The upper reservoir is contained by the Yashio Dam, a rock-fill dam.  The lower reservoir is contained by the Sabigawa Dam, a concrete gravity dam. 
The power station employs three 300 MW pumping/generation units. The first 2 units started operation on 24 June 1994 and the third unit was started on 16 June 1995. 
Whess Harman is an artist and curator based in what is colonially known as Vancouver, British Columbia. They are perhaps most known for their beading and zine work, including their Potlach Punk series and their Together Apart Zine series. 
Whess Harman is a trans/non-binary person from the Carrier Wit'at Nation (known under Canadian government as part of the Lake Babine Nation), born in what is known as Prince Rupert, BC. Currently, Harman resides on the unceded territories of the Musqueam, Squamish and Tsleil Waututh Nations. In 2014, Harman obtained a Bachelor of Fine Arts from Emily Carr University of Art and Design. 
Whess Harman is a multidisciplinary artist whose work ranges in media. Their practice includes beading, illustration, design, text, and curation.  Since obtaining their BFA from Emily Carr University, Harman has participated in and curated a variety of exhibitions across Turtle Island and Norway, including: 
In 2020, Harman designed a "Land Back" sewn patch, which they sold multiples of in order to raise money for organizations and legal funds that support Indigenous land defenders. The "Land Back" patch was also used in a collaboration with musical group A Tribe Called Red as the cover for a song with the same title.  
In January 2021, Harman was announced as the new Curator for grunt gallery, after having been involved with grunt as a curatorial assistant.  Through grunt gallery, and independently as well, they have curated a variety of projects, including Spark: Fireside Artist Talks, and, most recently, Human Nature - Last Supper for the Capture Photography Festival in collaboration with InTransit BC. 
The electron pair arrangement of ammonia is tetrahedral: the two lone electrons are shown in yellow, the hydrogen atoms in white 
The molecular geometry can be inferred from the electron pair arrangement, showing that ammonia has trigonal pyramidal geometry. 
This article about an Indian religious building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Graham Daniels is the General Director of Christians in Sport and  Director of Football at Cambridge United Football Club. 
Daniels played for Cardiff City whilst studying for a degree in Philosophy at Cardiff University. He left Wales and moved to Cambridge United and stayed in his adopted city when he made the move to neighbours Cambridge City. 
He entered management as player-assistant to Richie Powling at Sudbury Town whilst completing theological training at the University of London, before moving to the number one role at Histon and then Cambridge City. He resigned from his position as Cambridge City manager on 2 January 1999 and immediately joined BBC Radio Cambridgeshire as a broadcaster. 
From 2000-2012, Daniels was involved with the Cambridgeshire Football Association, firstly in coaching a number of its youth representative squads and latterly through involvement with local teams Hardwick F.C. and Cambridge University Press F.C. He returned to Cambridge United in May 2013 as a director and in September 2013 became a member of the Cambridgeshire F.A. Council. He was appointed Director of Football at Cambridge United in February 2018. 
Daniels has been on the staff of the Round Church at St. Andrew the Great (StAG), Cambridge since October 2000 and General Director of Christians In Sport since April 2002. 
The Base is a regional shopping centre located in Te Rapa, in the New Zealand city of Hamilton. The centre consists of the original outdoor strip mall, and the more recent Te Awa enclosed shopping mall. 
In 2002 The Warehouse Group (TWG) was signed up as the anchor tenant of stage one of The Base. The first 16,000 square metres was to house one of their largest stores, and the first with the new store format that is in use today throughout the country. TWG later became part of a joint venture company with Tainui to operate the mall. In 2007, Tainui Group Holdings paid $37.4M to buy out The Warehouse Group's 50% stake in the joint venture company. 
At the core of the site are three very important pou (carved poles). The first is symbolic, representing traditional guardianship of the site; the second acknowledges the recent presence of the Royal New Zealand Air Force; the third is a contemporary design that depicts the present day, and modernisation of the tribe.[citation needed] 
The Base design was awarded a silver medal at the 2012 Asia Pacific Shopping Centre Awards in China.[citation needed] 
The Base was formerly wholly owned by Tainui Group Holdings, the holding company for the assets of the Waikato-Tainui Iwi, and has been valued at over $250M. However, in 2016 NZX-listed Kiwi Property Group invested $192.5 million in acquiring a 50% stake. This investment values the property at $385 million. 
Attitudes toward lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender (LGBT) people and their experiences in the Muslim world have been influenced by its religious, legal, social, political, and cultural history. 
Some scholars (both Western and Islamic) argue that in the course of the Quranic Lot story, homosexuality in the modern sense is not addressed, but that the destruction of the "people of Lut" was a result of breaking the ancient hospitality law and sexual violence, in this case the attempted rape of men. 
Only one passage in the Quran prescribes a strictly legal position. It is not restricted to homosexual behaviour, however, and deals more generally with zina (illicit sexual intercourse): 
Some Quranic verses describing the paradise refer to "immortal boys" (56:17, 76:19) or "young men" (52:24) who serve wine to the blessed. Although the tafsir literature does not interpret this as a homoerotic allusion, the connection was made in other literary genres, mostly humorously. For example, the Abbasid-era poet Abu Nuwas wrote: 
A beautiful lad came carrying the wine  With smooth hands and fingers dyed with henna  And with long hair of golden curls around his cheeks ...  I have a lad who is like the beautiful lads of paradise  
Jurists of the Hanafi school took up the question seriously, considering, but ultimately rejecting the suggestion that homosexual pleasures were, like wine, forbidden in this world but enjoyed in the afterlife. 
The hadith (sayings and actions attributed to Muhammad) show that homosexual behaviour was not unknown in seventh-century Arabia. However, given that the Quran did not specify the punishment of homosexual practices, Islamic jurists increasingly turned to several "more explicit" hadiths in an attempt to find guidance on appropriate punishment. 
From Abu Musa al-Ash'ari, the Prophet states that: "If a woman comes upon a woman, they are both adulteresses, if a man comes upon a man, then they are both adulterers."
While there are no reports relating to homosexuality in the best known and authentic hadith collections of Sahih al-Bukhari and Sahih Muslim, other canonical collections record a number of condemnations of the "act of the people of Lut" (male-to-male anal intercourse). For example, Abu 'Isa Muhammad ibn 'Isa at-Tirmidhi (compiling the Sunan al-Tirmidhi around 884) wrote that Muhammad had indeed prescribed the death penalty for both the active and passive partners: 
Narrated by Abdullah ibn Abbas: "The Prophet said: 'If you find anyone doing as Lot's people did, kill the one who does it, and the one to whom it is done'."
Narrated Abdullah ibn Abbas: "If a man who is not married is seized committing sodomy he will be stoned to death."
It was narrated that Ibn Abbas said: "The Prophet said: '... cursed is the one who does the action of the people of Lot'."
Ahmad narrated from Ibn Abbas that the Prophet of Allah said: 'May Allah curse the one who does the action of the people of Lot, may Allah curse the one who does the action of the people of Lot', three times."
It was narrated that Jabir: "The Prophet said: 'There is nothing I fear for my followers more than the deed of the people of Lot.'"
In addition, there is a number of "purported (but mutually inconsistent) reports" (athar) of punishments of sodomy ordered by some of the early caliphs. Abu Bakr apparently recommended toppling a wall on the culprit, or else burning him alive, while Ali ibn Abi Talib is said to have ordered death by stoning for one sodomite and had another thrown head-first from the top of the highest building in the town; according to Ibn Abbas, the latter punishment must be followed by stoning. 
There are, however, fewer hadith mentioning homosexual behaviour in women; but punishment (if any) for lesbianism was not clarified. 
 Moreover, within Islam, there is a tradition of the elaboration and refinement of extended religious doctrines through scholarship. This doctrine contains a passage by the scholar and hadith collector An-Nawawi:
A mukhannath is the one ("male") who carries in his movements, in his appearance and in his language the characteristics of a woman. There are two types; the first is the one in whom these characteristics are innate, he did not put them on by himself, and therein is no guilt, no blame and no shame, as long as he does not perform any (illicit) act or exploit it for money (prostitution etc.). The second type acts like a woman out of immoral purposes and he is the sinner and blameworthy.
Narrated by Abdullah ibn Abbas: The Prophet cursed effeminate men; those men who are in the similitude (assume the manners of women) and those women who assume the manners of men, and he said, "Turn them out of your houses." The Prophet turned out such-and-such man, and 'Umar turned out such-and-such woman.
Early Islamic literature rarely comments upon the habits of the mukhannathun. It seems there may have been some variance in how "effeminate" they were, though there are indications that some adopted aspects of feminine dress or at least ornamentation. One hadith states that a Muslim mukhannath who had dyed his hands and feet with henna (traditionally a feminine activity) was banished from Medina, but not killed for his behavior. 
A mukhannath who had dyed his hands and feet with henna was brought to the Prophet. He asked: What is the matter with this man? He was told: Apostle of Allah! he affects women's get-up. So he ordered regarding him and he was banished to an-Naqi'. The people said: Apostle of Allah! should we not kill him? He said: I have been prohibited from killing people who pray. AbuUsamah said: Naqi' is a region near Medina and not a Baqi.
Other hadiths also mention the punishment of banishment, both in connection with Umm Salama's servant and a man who worked as a musician. Muhammad described the musician as a mukhannath and threatened to banish him if he did not end his unacceptable career. 
According to Everett K. Rowson, professor of Middle Eastern and Islamic Studies at New York University, none of the sources state that Muhammad banished more than two mukhannathun, and it is not clear to what extent the action was taken because of their breaking of gender rules in itself or because of the "perceived damage to social institutions from their activities as matchmakers and their corresponding access to women". 
The paucity of concrete prescriptions to be derived from hadith and the contradictory nature of information about the actions of early authorities resulted in lack of agreement among classical jurists as to how homosexual activity should be treated. Classical Islamic jurists did not deal with homosexuality as a sexual orientation, since the latter concept is modern and has no match in traditional law, which dealt with it under the technical terms of liwat and zina. 
Many Muslim scholars have followed a "don't ask, don't tell" policy in regards to homosexuality in Islam, by treating the subject with passivity. 
Egyptian Islamist journalist Muhammad Jalal Kishk also found no punishment for homosexual acts prescribed in the Quran, regarding the hadith that mentioned it as poorly attested. He did not approve of such acts, but believed that Muslims who abstained from sodomy would be rewarded by sex with youthful boys in paradise. 
In a 2012 book, Aisha Geissinger writes that there are "apparently irreconcilable Muslim standpoints on same-sex desires and acts," all of which claim "interpretative authenticity." One of these standpoints results from "queer-friendly" interpretations of the Lot story and the Quran. The Lot story is interpreted as condemning "rape and inhospitality rather than today's consensual same-sex relationships." 
European travellers remarked on the taste that Shah Abbas of Iran (1588-1629) had for wine and festivities, but also for attractive pages and cup-bearers. A painting by Riza Abbasi with homo-erotic qualities shows the ruler enjoying such delights. 
In mystic writings of the medieval era, such as Sufi texts, it is "unclear whether the beloved being addressed is a teenage boy or God." European chroniclers censured "the indulgent attitudes to gay sex in the Caliphs' courts." Mustafa Akyol writes that "The Ottoman sultans, arguably, were social liberals compared with the contemporary Islamists of Turkey, let alone the Arab World." 
Same-sex sexual activity is illegal in Chad since 1 August 2017 under a new penal code. Before that, homosexuality between consenting adults had not been criminalized ever prior to this law. 
In Egypt, openly gay men have been prosecuted under general public morality laws. (See Cairo 52.) "Sexual relations between consenting adult persons of the same sex in private are not prohibited as such. However, the Law on the Combating of Prostitution, and the law against debauchery have been used to imprison gay men in recent years." An Egyptian TV host was recently sentenced to a year in prison for interviewing a gay man in January 2019. 
Islamic state has decreed capital punishment for gay people. They have executed more than two dozen men and women for suspected homosexual activity, including several thrown off the top of buildings in highly publicized executions. 
In India, which has the third-largest Muslim population in the world, and where Muslims form a large minority, the largest Islamic seminary (Darul Uloom Deoband) has vehemently opposed recent government moves to abrogate and liberalize laws from the colonial era that banned homosexuality. As of September 2018, homosexuality is no longer a criminal act in India, and most of the religious groups withdrew their opposing claims against it in the Supreme Court. 
In Iraq, homosexuality is allowed by the government, but terrorist groups often carry out illegal executions of gay people. Saddam Hussein was "unbothered by sexual mores." Ali Hili reports that "since the 2003 invasion more than 700 people have been killed because of their sexuality." He calls Iraq the "most dangerous place in the world for sexual minorities." 
In Jordan, where homosexuality is legal, "gay hangouts have been raided or closed on bogus charges, such as serving alcohol illegally." Despite this legality, social attitudes towards homosexuality are still hostile and hateful. 
In Bangladesh, homosexual acts are illegal and punishable according to section 377. Due to the traditional mentality of the predominantly conservative Bangladeshi society, negative attitudes towards those in the LGBT community are high. In 2009 and 2013, the Bangladeshi Parliament refused to overturn Section 377.[verification needed] 
As the latest addition in the list of criminalizing Muslim counties, Brunei's has implemented penalty for homosexuals within Sharia Penal Code in stages since 2014. It prescribes death by stoning as punishment for sex between men, and sex between women is punishable by caning or imprisonment. The sultanate currently has a moratorium in effect on death penalty. 
In Algeria, Bangladesh, Chad, Aceh, Malaysia, Maldives, Pakistan, Qatar, Somalia and Syria, it is illegal, and penalties may be imposed. In Kuwait, Turkmenistan and Uzbekistan, homosexual acts between males are illegal, but homosexual relations between females are legal. 
The Ottoman Empire (predecessor of Turkey) decriminalized homosexuality in 1858. In Turkey, where 99.8% of the population is officially registered as Muslim, homosexuality has never been criminalized since the day it was founded in 1923. LGBT people also have the right to seek asylum in Turkey under the Geneva Convention since 1951. 
Same-sex sexual intercourse is legal in Albania, Azerbaijan, Bahrain, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Burkina Faso, Djibouti, Guinea-Bissau, Iraq, Jordan, Kazakhstan, Kosovo, Kyrgyzstan, Mali, Niger, Tajikistan, Turkey, West Bank (State of Palestine),  Indonesia, and in Northern Cyprus. In Albania and Turkey, there have been discussions about legalizing same-sex marriage. Albania, Northern Cyprus, Bosnia and Herzegovina and Kosovo also protect LGBT people with anti-discrimination laws. 
Same-sex relations between females are legal in Kuwait, Turkmenistan, and Uzbekistan, but homosexual acts between males are illegal. 
In Lebanon, courts have ruled that the country's penal code must not be used to target homosexuals, but the law has yet to be changed by parliament. 
In 2007 there was a gay party in the Moroccan town of al-Qasr al-Kabir. Rumours spread that this was a gay marriage and more than 600 people took to the streets, condemning the alleged event and protesting against leniency towards homosexuals. Several persons who attended the party were detained and eventually six Moroccan men were sentenced to between four and ten months in prison for "homosexuality". 
In France there was an Islamic same-sex marriage on 18 February 2012. In Paris in November 2012 a room in a Buddhist prayer hall was used by gay Muslims and called a "gay-friendly mosque", and a French Islamic website is supporting religious same-sex marriage. 
The first American Muslim in the United States Congress, Keith Ellison (D-MN) said in 2010 that all discrimination against LGBT people is wrong. He further expressed support for gay marriage stating: 
I believe that the right to marry someone who you please is so fundamental it should not be subject to popular approval any more than we should vote on whether blacks should be allowed to sit in the front of the bus.
In 2014 eight men were jailed for three years by a Cairo court after the circulation of a video of them allegedly taking part in a private wedding ceremony between two men on a boat on the Nile. 
Although it prohibits homosexuality, Iran is the only[citation needed] Muslim-majority country in the Persian Gulf region that allows transgender people to express themselves by recognizing their self-identified gender and subsidizing reassignment surgery. Despite this, those who do not commit to reassignment surgery are often seen as freaks, and due to their refusal to conform they are treated as outcasts. 
In 2011, the UN Human Rights Council passed its first resolution recognizing LGBT rights, which was followed up with a report from the UN Human Rights Commission documenting violations of the rights of LGBT people. The two world maps of the percentage of Muslims per country and the countries that support LGBT rights at the UN give an impression of the attitude towards homosexuality on the part of many Muslim-majority governments. 
The Muslim community as a whole, worldwide, has become polarized on the subject of homosexuality. Some Muslims say that "no good Muslim can be gay," and "traditional schools of Islamic law consider homosexuality a grave sin." At the opposite pole, "some Muslims . . . are welcoming what they see as an opening within their communities to address anti-gay attitudes." Especially, it is "young Muslims" who are "increasingly speaking out in support of gay rights". 
According to the Albert Kennedy Trust, one in four young homeless people identify as LGBT due to their religious parents disowning them. The Trust suggests that the majority of individuals who are homeless due to religious out casting are either Christian or Muslim. Many young adults who come out to their parents are often forced out of the house to find refuge in a more accepting place. This leads many individual to be homeless or even attempt suicide. 
In 2013, the Pew Research Center conducted a study on the global acceptance of homosexuality and found a widespread rejection of homosexuality in many nations that are predominantly Muslim. In some countries, views were becoming more conservative among younger people. 
Since February 2017, over 100 male residents of the Chechen Republic (part of the Russian Federation) assumed to be gay or bisexual have been rounded up, detained and tortured by authorities on account of their sexual orientation. These crackdowns have been described as part of a systemic anti-LGBT "purge" in the region. The men are held and allegedly tortured in concentration camps. 
In response, the Russian LGBT Network is attempting to assist those who are threatened to evacuate from Chechnya. Human rights groups and foreign governments have called upon Russia and Chechnya to put an end to the internments. 
On 11 January 2019, it was reported that another 'gay purge' had begun in the country in December 2018, with several gay men and women being detained. The Russian LGBT Network believes that around 40 persons were detained and two killed. 
The coming together of "human rights discourses and sexual orientation struggles" has resulted in an abundance of "social movements and organizations concerned with gender and sexual minority oppression and discrimination." 
There are numbers of Muslim LGBT activists from different parts of the world. Some of them are listed below: 
In 2010, an anthology Islam and Homosexuality was published. In the Forward, Parvez Sharma sounded a pessimistic note about the future: "In my lifetime I do not see Islam drafting a uniform edict that homosexuality is permissible." Following is material from two chapters dealing with the present: 
Marhuq Fatima Khan in a chapter "Queer, American, and Muslim: Cultivating Identities and Communities of Affirmation," says that "Queer Muslims employ a few narratives to enable them to reconcile their religious and sexual identities." They "fall into three broad categories: (1) God Is Merciful; (2) That Is Just Who I Am; and (3) It's Not Just Islam."
2PMS, 1B0L, 1BKA, 1CB6, 1DSN, 1EH3, 1FCK, 1H43, 1H44, 1H45, 1HSE, 1L5T, 1LCF, 1LCT, 1LFG, 1LFH, 1LFI, 1LGB, 1N76, 1SQY, 1U62, 1VFD, 1VFE, 1XV4, 1XV7, 1Z6V, 1Z6W, 2BJJ, 2DP4, 2GMC, 2GMD, 2HD4
Lactoferrin is one of the components of the immune system of the body; it has antimicrobial activity (bacteriocide, fungicide) and is part of the innate defense, mainly at mucoses. In particular, lactoferrin provides antibacterial activity to human infants. Lactoferrin  interacts with DNA and RNA, polysaccharides and heparin, and shows some of its biological functions in complexes with these ligands. 
Lactoferrin is one of the transferrin proteins that transfer iron to the cells and control the level of free iron in the blood and external secretions. It is present in the milk of humans and other mammals, in the blood plasma and neutrophils and is one of the major proteins of virtually all exocrine secretions of mammals, such as saliva, bile, tears and pancreas. Concentration of lactoferrin in the milk varies from 7 g/L in the colostrum to 1 g/L in mature milk. 
Lactoferrin belongs to the basic proteins, its isoelectric point is 8.7. It exists in two forms: iron-rich hololactoferrin and iron-free apolactoferrin. Their tertiary structures are different; apolactoferrin is characterized by "open" conformation of the N-lobe and the "closed" conformation of the C-lobe, and both lobes are closed in the hololactoferrin. 
Each lactoferrin molecule can reversibly bind two ions of iron, zinc, copper or other metals. The binding sites are localized in each of the two protein globules. There, each ion is bonded with six ligands: four from the polypeptide chain (two tyrosine residues, one histidine residue and one aspartic acid residue) and two from carbonate or bicarbonate ions. 
Lactoferrin belongs to the innate immune system. Apart from its main biological function, namely binding and transport of iron ions, lactoferrin also has antibacterial, antiviral, antiparasitic, catalytic, anti-cancer, and anti-allergic functions and properties. 
The lactoferrin receptor plays an important role in the internalization of lactoferrin; it also facilitates absorption of iron ions by lactoferrin. It was shown that gene expression increases with age in the duodenum and decreases in the jejunum. The moonlighting glycolytic enzyme glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (GAPDH) has been demonstrated to function as a receptor for lactoferrin. 
One of the important properties of lactoferrin is its ability to bind with nucleic acids. The fraction of protein extracted from milk, contains 3.3% RNA, but, the protein preferably binds to double-stranded DNA rather than single-stranded DNA. The ability of lactoferrin to bind DNA is used for its isolation and purification using affinity chromatography with columns containing immobilized DNA-containing sorbents, such as agarose with the immobilized single-stranded DNA. 
Lactoferrin's primary role is to sequester free iron, and in doing so remove essential substrate required for bacterial growth. Antibacterial action of lactoferrin  is also explained by the presence of specific receptors on the cell surface of microorganisms. Lactoferrin binds to lipopolysaccharide of bacterial walls, and the oxidized iron part of the lactoferrin oxidizes bacteria via formation of peroxides. This affects the membrane permeability and results in the cell breakdown (lysis). 
Lactoferrin prevents the attachment of H. pylori in the stomach, which in turn, aids in reducing digestive system disorders. Bovine lactoferrin has more activity against H. pylori than human lactoferrin. 
Lactoferrin in sufficient strength acts on a wide range of human and animal viruses based on DNA and RNA genomes, including the herpes simplex virus 1 and 2, cytomegalovirus, HIV, hepatitis C virus, hantaviruses, rotaviruses, poliovirus type 1, human respiratory syncytial virus, murine leukemia viruses and Mayaro virus. Activity against COVID-19 has been speculated but not proven. 
Beside interacting with the cell membrane, lactoferrin also directly binds to viral particles, such as the hepatitis viruses. This mechanism is also confirmed by the antiviral activity of lactoferrin against rotaviruses, which act on different cell types. 
The anticancer activity of bovine lactoferrin (bLF) has been demonstrated in experimental lung, bladder, tongue, colon, and liver carcinogeneses on rats, possibly by suppression of phase I enzymes, such as cytochrome P450 1A2 (CYP1A2). Also, in another experiment done on hamsters, bovine lactoferrin decreased the incidence of oral cancer by 50%. Currently, bLF is used as an ingredient in yogurt, chewing gums, infant formulas, and cosmetics. 
Low quality evidence suggests that oral lactoferrin supplementation with or without the addition of a probiotic may decrease late onset of sepsis and necrotizing enterocolitis (stage II or III) in preterm infants with no adverse effects. 
Lactotransferrin has been used in the synthesis of fluorescent gold quantum clusters, which has potential applications in nanotechnology. 
1l5t: Crystal Structure of a Domain-Opened Mutant (R121D) of the Human Lactoferrin N-lobe Refined From a Merohedrally-Twinned Crystal Form. 
1lcf: CRYSTAL STRUCTURE OF COPPER-AND OXALATE-SUBSTITUTED HUMAN LACTOFERRIN AT 2.0 ANGSTROMS RESOLUTION 
1lfg: MOLECULAR REPLACEMENT SOLUTION OF THE STRUCTURE OF APOLACTOFERRIN, A PROTEIN DISPLAYING LARGE-SCALE CONFORMATIONAL CHANGE 
1lfh: MOLECULAR REPLACEMENT SOLUTION OF THE STRUCTURE OF APOLACTOFERRIN, A PROTEIN DISPLAYING LARGE-SCALE CONFORMATIONAL CHANGE 
1lfi: METAL SUBSTITUTION IN TRANSFERRINS: THE CRYSTAL STRUCTURE OF HUMAN COPPER-LACTOFERRIN AT 2.1 ANGSTROMS RESOLUTION 
1lgb: INTERACTION OF A LEGUME LECTIN WITH THE N2 FRAGMENT OF HUMAN LACTOTRANSFERRIN OR WITH THE ISOLATED BIANTENNARY GLYCOPEPTIDE: ROLE OF THE FUCOSE MOIETY 
Kevin Michael Byrne (born 1949) was Mayor of the City of Cairns in Queensland, Australia, from 1992 to 1995, and then from 2000 to 2008. 
He was born in Lae, Papua New Guinea 1949. His family had first arrived in Papua New Guinea in 1906 when his grandfather was  appointed Chief Collector of Customs in Port Moresby. His primary education was on Manus Island, Papua New Guinea and he attended Nudgee College, Brisbane from 1963 until 1967. 
Byrne graduated in 1969 from Officer Cadet School, Portsea, Victoria (OCS Portsea) with an Australian Army commission. He was awarded the Sword of Honour for Leadership in that year.[citation needed] His 17-year military career included Australian and overseas postings to Malaysia, Singapore, Papua New Guinea, Rhodesia and South Vietnam. His final military assignment was as a Senior Instructor at the Royal Military College, Duntroon, 1987. 
Byrne served as the regional manager in the Office of Northern and Regional Development, Cairns, between 1987 and 1990. In 1990 he became the regional manager of the Queensland Confederation of Industry. 
He served as the Administrative Director for an oil spill cleanup operation, funded by the World Bank and European Bank of Reconstruction and Development, in the Kolva Basin, in the Komi Republic, part of the Russian Federation.[when?] The Pechora River tributaries were remediated and 146,000 tonnes (161,000 short tons) of oil were recovered.[citation needed] 
In December 1995, Byrne was appointed as the Chief Executive of the Papua New Guinea Tourism Promotion Authority. He was a member of the national negotiating team for bilateral air service agreements;[when?] the acting chairman of the National Airline Commission for two years;[when?] deputy chairman of Air Niugini for eighteen months;[when?] and a national delegate to the APEC Working Groups on Tourism and Trade.[when?] 
In December 1999, Byrne returned to Cairns; and was re-elected as Mayor of Cairns on 25 March 2000 and again in March 2004. In 2008 he was defeated by Val Schier for the position of mayor of the Cairns Regional Council. 
Byrne was the subject of media attention and controversy for involvement with property developers, attitudes towards racial issues, and his corrupt approach to government and the electorate. Some examples of the unproven allegations include: 
An aborted attempt by the Byrne Council to secretly bus indigenous people from the Cairns region to the remote Lockhart River region. 
Allegations (and subsequent referral to the Crime and Misconduct Commission) by a local ratepayers group that he contravened electoral and ethical policies by maintaining an undeclared involvement in other primary businesses during his mayoralty. 
A self-acknowledged perception that he was 'in the developers pockets', ultimately attributed by him as the reason for his defeat in 2008. Three months later he accepted employment as a senior director with a Cairns property developer. Tragically, the managing director of the company was later murdered and the company went into receivership. 
An investigation of Lady Mayoress Amanda Byrne for ethical misconduct under the terms of the Property Agents and Motor Dealers Act 2000 (PAMD Act). She was ultimately found guilty of charges by the office of fair trading and, in a move unprecedented in Queensland, she was banned for life from practising as an accommodation manager. 
That advice from government environmental body Geoscience Australia that warned of a serious disaster risk in approving new development on the Cairns slopes and some low-lying areas was set-aside in favour of more favourable reports from the Council's own engineers. 
In 2000 Byrne was awarded the Papua New Guinea Independence Medal (25th Anniversary) for services to Aviation and Tourism;[citation needed] and the Australian Centenary Medal for services to Local Government, in 2001. 
Ellis Cashmore (10 February 1949 in Staffordshire, Great Britain) is a British sociologist and cultural critic. He is currently a visiting professor of sociology at Aston University. Before teaching at Aston, he used to teach culture, media and sport at Staffordshire University, starting in 1993. Before 1993, he taught sociology at the University of Tampa, Florida; and, before this, he was a lecturer in sociology at the University of Hong Kong. He is a regular contributor at Fair Observer.  
Taft-Hartley was introduced in the aftermath of a major strike wave in 1945 and 1946. Though it was enacted by the Republican-controlled 80th Congress, the law received significant support from congressional Democrats, many of whom joined with their Republican colleagues in voting to override Truman's veto. The act continued to generate opposition after Truman left office, but it remains in effect. 
In 1945 and 1946, an unprecedented wave of major strikes affected the United States; by February 1946 nearly 2 million workers were engaged in strikes or other labor disputes. Organized labor had largely refrained from striking during World War II, but with the end of the war, labor leaders were eager to share in the gains from a postwar economic resurgence. 
According to First Amendment scholar Floyd Abrams, the Act "was the first law barring unions and corporations from making independent expenditures in support of or [in] opposition to federal candidates". 
The amendments expressly excluded supervisors from coverage under the act, and allowed employers to terminate supervisors engaging in union activities or those not supporting the employer's stance. The amendments maintained coverage under the act for professional employees, but provided for special procedures before they may be included in the same bargaining unit as non-professional employees. 
The act provided for federal court jurisdiction to enforce collective bargaining agreements. Although Congress passed this section to empower federal courts to hold unions liable in damages for strikes violating a no-strike clause, this part of the act has instead served as the springboard for creation of a "federal common law" of collective bargaining agreements, which favored arbitration over litigation or strikes as the preferred means of resolving labor disputes.[citation needed] 
Finally, the act imposed a number of procedural and substantive standards that unions and employers must meet before they may use employer funds to provide pensions and other employee benefit to unionized employees. Congress has since passed more extensive protections for workers and employee benefit plans as part of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act ("ERISA"). 
Organized labor groups[specify] nearly succeeded in pushing Congress to amend the law to increase the protections for strikers and targets of employer retaliation during the Carter and Clinton administrations in the 1970s and 1990. However, Republican opposition and lukewarm support for these changes from the Democratic Carter and Clinton administrations led to their failure. 
Jane Greenwood (born 30 April 1934) is a British costume designer for the stage, television, film, opera, and dance. Born in Liverpool, England, she works both in England and the United States. She has been nominated for the Tony Award for costume design twenty-one times and won the award for her work on The Little Foxes. 
Greenwood attended Liverpool Art School and the Central School of Arts and Crafts, and then started working at the Oxford Playhouse, in charge of the costume department.  She started working in the Ray Diffen costume shop in New York City in 1962. In New York, she met and married scenic designer and producer Ben Edwards. 
Greenwood's work includes designing for over 100 productions, The Ballad of the Sad Cafe (1963), her first Broadway play, to Hamlet with Richard Burton (1964), 70, Girls, 70 (1971), Romantic Comedy (1979), I Hate Hamlet (1991), The Sisters Rosensweig (1993), and Stephen Sondheim's Passion (1994). 
In England, she was nominated for the Olivier Award for her costume designs for She Loves Me (1995). 
Her television work includes several Public Television plays for "The American Playhouse", made-for-television movies, such as In the Gloaming, HBO (1997) and the miniseries Kennedy (1983). 
For opera, she has designed for the Metropolitan Opera House, such as Ariadne in 1987. For dance, she designed the original costumes for the Alvin Ailey dance Night Creature (1974). 
She teaches at the Yale Drama School. Greenwood received the Theater Development Fund Irene Sharaff Award for Lifetime Achievement in 1998. 
Greenwood has been awarded the 2014 Tony Award for Lifetime Achievement in the Theatre. The executive directors of the Broadway League and American Theater Wing said, in part "She has made a significant imprint on the history of Broadway with her artistry. Her work has not only elevated the craft of costume design but has inspired generations of designers to come." 
Kim Kyong-hui was born in Pyongyang on 30 May 1946 to Kim Il-sung and Kim Jong-suk. Her mother died when she was four. After her father remarried, she was raised by various surrogates away from the family. 
In 1988, she was promoted to WPK Central Committee member and director of the Light Industry Department. In 1990, she was elected deputy to the Supreme People's Assembly for the first time. Her role was particularly significant as she led the Economic Policy Inspection Department, then again the Light Industry Department during the "Arduous March" period after Kim Il-sung's death. 
On 8 December 2013, her husband, Jang Sung-thaek, was publicly expelled from the ruling Workers' Party of Korea. Jang was accused of factionalism, corruption, and a range of misbehaviour that included affairs with other women. On 13 December, it was reported that he had been executed for treason. 
In January 2020, Kim appeared in North Korean media for the first time in over six years, attending a lunar new year concert with Kim Jong-un. 
Aramis Ayala (born February 2, 1975) is an American politician and prosecutor who was the state attorney for the Ninth Judicial Circuit Court of Florida. She was elected in November 2016, and served as the chief prosecutor from 2017 to 2021. In May 2019, Ayala stated that she would not seek re-election as state attorney. 
Ayala was born in Saginaw, Michigan, and graduated from the University of Michigan with an undergraduate degree. She then obtained her Juris Doctor degree from the University of Detroit. 
In May 2021, Ayala announced that she was running for Florida's 10th congressional district in 2022. Initially considering a run for the U.S. Senate, she decided to run for Congress after incumbent U.S. Representative Val Demings announced she would run for United States Senate in 2022 against incumbent Republican Marco Rubio. 
The Asian Football Confederation's pre-Olympic tournament was contested by eighteen teams that competed for the two allocated spots for the 2012 Summer Olympics football tournament in London. However, Qatar withdrew before playing any match. The competition was originally scheduled for February 2010 but it eventually started in March 2011. 
This biographical article relating to an American football quarterback is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
DoD's June 19, 1959, Continental Air Defense Program reduced the number of SCCs to 7 and on December 9, 1959, the USAF eliminated both the SCC for the Denver sector and the Albuquerque sector's above-ground AN/FSQ-32. On December 21, 1959, the Office of Defense Research and Engineering informed NORAD a stop order had been placed on AN/FSQ-32 production and in January 1960, the Office of the Secretary of Defense recommended the SCC program be canceled (cancellation was March 18, 1960.) 
In 1350 it became the Welfs' residence in Brunswick. It was captured and destroyed in 1542 by the Schmalkaldic League and rebuilding only began in 1553 under Duke Henry the Younger, who created a new residence and converted the old tower into a castle chapel. In 1575 courtyards were added with Italianate arcades. 
Pastorius suffered from drug addiction and mental health problems throughout his professional life, and despite his widespread acclaim, over the latter part of his life he had problems holding down jobs due to his unreliability.  In frequent financial trouble, he was often homeless throughout the mid-1980s.  He died in 1987, as a result of injuries sustained in a fight outside a South Florida after-hours nightclub. 
After his death, his work continues to influence musicians. He was elected to the DownBeat Hall of Fame in 1988.  He was the subject of the 2014 documentary film Jaco. 
John Francis Pastorius was born December 1, 1951, in Norristown, Pennsylvania, United States. He was the oldest of three boys born to Stephanie, his Finnish mother, and Jack Pastorius, a singer and jazz drummer who spent much of his time on the road. His family moved to Oakland Park near Fort Lauderdale when he was eight. 
He played drums until he injured his wrist playing football when he was thirteen. The damage was severe enough to warrant corrective surgery and inhibited his ability to play the drums. 
After bassist Alphonso Johnson left Weather Report, Zawinul asked Pastorius to join the band. Pastorius made his band debut on the album Black Market (Columbia, 1976), in which he shared the bass chair with Johnson. Pastorius was fully established as sole band bass player for the recording of Heavy Weather (Columbia, 1977), which contained the Grammy-nominated hit "Birdland". 
During his time with Weather Report, Pastorius began abusing alcohol and illegal drugs, which exacerbated existing mental problems and led to erratic behavior. He left Weather Report in 1982 because of clashes with tour commitments for his other projects, plus a growing dissatisfaction with Zawinul's synthesized and orchestrated approach to the band's music. 
In 1982, Pastorius toured with Word of Mouth as a 21-piece big band. While in Japan, to the alarm of his band members, he shaved his head, painted his face black, and threw his bass guitar into Hiroshima Bay. He was diagnosed with bipolar disorder in late 1982 after the tour.  Pastorius had shown signs of bipolar disorder before his diagnosis, but these signs were dismissed as eccentricities, character flaws, and by Pastorius himself as a normal part of his freewheeling personality. 
Luc Havan faced a charge of second-degree murder. He pleaded guilty to manslaughter and was sentenced to twenty-two months in prison and five years' probation. After serving four months in prison, he was paroled for good behavior. 
Pastorius played a number of Fender Jazz Basses over the years, but the most famous was a 1962 Jazz Bass that he called the Bass of Doom. When he was 21, Pastorius acquired the bass, which was modified by removing the frets. It is unclear when the frets were removed, as his recollections varied over the years. One story is that he used a common butter knife to remove the frets, and sealed the fretboard with epoxy resin. 
Fender began offering a fretless version of their standard Jazz Bass in the mid-1980s, and in 1999 began offering the "Fender Jaco Pastorius Jazz Bass" in their Artist series, and Custom Shop series. These instruments were modelled on the Bass of Doom, with the Custom Shop version featuring a fretboard sealed with epoxy resin. In the 2000s Fender's budget brand Squier offered the "Squier Vintage Modified Fretless Jazz Bass" which was also reminiscent of Jaco's instrument. 
Since the 1980s other companies have offered fretless basses similar to, or modelled on, the Bass of Doom, such as Tokai and Edwards. 
Pastorius used the "Variamp" EQ (equalization) controls on his two Acoustic 360 amplifiers (made by the Acoustic Control Corporation) to boost the midrange frequencies, thus accentuating the natural growling tone of his fretless passive Fender Jazz Bass and roundwound string combination. He also controlled his tone color with a rackmount MXR digital delay unit that fed a second Acoustic amp rig. 
Pastorius received two Grammy Award nominations in 1977 for his self-titled debut album: one for Best Jazz Performance by a Group and one for Best Jazz Performance by a Soloist ("Donna Lee").  In 1978, he received a Grammy nomination for Best Jazz Performance by a Soloist for his work on Weather Report's album Heavy Weather. 
Bass Player magazine gave him second place on a list of the one hundred greatest bass players of all time, behind James Jamerson. After his death in 1987, he was voted, by readers of Down Beat magazine, to its Hall of Fame, joining bassists Jimmy Blanton, Ray Brown, Ron Carter, Charles Mingus, Charlie Haden, and Milt Hinton. 
He has been called "arguably the most important and ground-breaking electric bassist in history" and "perhaps the most influential electric bassist today". 
William C. Banfield, director of Africana Studies, Music and Society at Berklee College, described Pastorius as one of the few original American virtuosos who defined a musical movement, in addition to Jimi Hendrix, Louis Armstrong, Thelonious Monk, Charlie Christian, Bud Powell, Charlie Parker, Dizzy Gillespie, John Coltrane, Sarah Vaughan, Bill Evans, Charles Mingus, and Wes Montgomery. 
This United Kingdom biographical article related to medicine is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mucilaginibacter litoreus is a Gram-negative, facultatively aerobic, non-spore-forming and rod-shaped bacterium from the genus of Mucilaginibacter which has been isolated from marine sand from the western coast of Korea. 
Celtic de Paris were a French rugby league team from the city of Paris. The club played most games at La Cipale, Saint-Ouen, and occasionally at the Parc des Princes. 
Maurice Tardy was the president of the club in the 1950s, signing star players including Puig Aubert. The club ceased to exist in the 1970s. 
This article about a rugby league football team or club is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Maria Rita Kehl, ORB (born December 10, 1951) is a Brazilian psychoanalyst, journalist, poet, essayist, cronista and literary critic. In 2010, she won the Jabuti Award in the Education, Psychology and Psychoanalysis category  and the Human Rights Award from the Brazilian government in the Media and Human Rights category. 
In 2012, she was invited to participate in the National Truth Commission, which was installed on May 16 to investigate human rights violations which had occurred in Brazil between September 18, 1946 and October 5, 1988. 
Head coach Bill Russell anticipated a roster overhaul during the offseason. After trading Dick Snyder on draft day to the Cleveland Cavaliers in exchange of the Cavs' first round selection, the SuperSonics selected center Tommy Burleson with the 3rd overall pick. 
This incomplete list of art critics enumerates persons who had or have a significant part of their known creative output in the form of art criticism, which consists mostly of the written discussion and aesthetic evaluation of works of art. 
According to one authority, art criticism, in a close approximation to the current sociocultural framework of the activity, started in the 18th century CE in Western Europe. However, many authors living before that time and outside that region of the world wrote on the subject of art and aesthetic experience, though using terms and concepts that may not have a direct translation into the lexicon of the Western tradition. These, when mentioned, will be included as well though pertinently noted. 
Frank R. Fisher (born October 18, 1926) is a jazz trumpeter, music arranger, and composer. He is one of the oldest jazz musicians in the San Francisco Bay Area still performing. 
Fisher is a jazz musician in the San Francisco Bay Area. He has been involved with music for over 70 years. He was a part of jazz in the Fillmore District, San Francisco, California in the 1940s and 1950s. He has been a member of the Junius Courtney Band since the 1960s. 
In 1950, he began working for the CIA, leading attacks from Taiwan against the mainland of China. The book Raiders of the China Coast by Frank Holober describes these adventures. He later performed undercover counterintelligence work in East Germany and Turkey, up to 1959. 
France awarded him the Legion of Honor in 2005. Hamilton died in 2006 in Annandale, VA, of pneumonia. 
This biographical article related to World War II United States Army personnel is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1973, she became the first member of the U.S. Congress to give birth while in office, and she was the first person to be granted maternity leave by the Speaker of the U.S. House of Representatives. 
She served on the Board of Directors of Amtrak, having been appointed to the position by President Barack Obama in 2012. 
Yvonne Watson was born on October 5, 1932, in Los Angeles as only child to James A. Watson and the former Lola Moore. 
After first attending a public school, she was sent to a model school for exceptional children. At Manual Arts High School she was a member of the debate team and served as vice president of the Latin Club her junior year and Girls' Vice President in her senior year. 
Burke attended the University of California, Berkeley from c. 1949 to 1951 before receiving a bachelor's degree in political science from the University of California, Los Angeles in 1953. She subsequently earned a J.D. degree from the University of Southern California Law School in 1956. Burke is one of the first black women to be admitted to the University of Southern California Law School. 
She served as Vice-Chairperson of the 1972 Democratic National Convention. She was the first African-American and the first woman of color to hold that position, and presided for about fourteen hours when the chair left the convention on its last day. 
During her tenure in Congress, she served on the House Select Committee on Assassinations, House Beauty Shop Committee, and the House Committee on Appropriations; during her tenure on the Appropriations Committee, she fought for increased funding to aid local jurisdictions to comply with desegregation mandates  
In 1973, with the birth of her daughter Autumn, Burke became the first member of Congress to give birth while in office and the first to be granted maternity leave by the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives. 
She did not seek re-election to Congress in 1978, but instead ran for Attorney General of California. She lost to the Republican George Deukmejian. 
In 1992, Burke ran for the District 2 seat on the L.A. County Board of Supervisors. The primary election was held in June, 1992, just weeks after the 1992 Los Angeles Riots. After a hard-fought campaign that often turned negative, Burke narrowly defeated State Senator Diane Watson. 
In 2007, she announced that she would retire when her term expired in 2008. On July 27, 2007, the Los Angeles Times published a front-page story revealing Burke was not living in the mostly low-income district she represented, but rather in the wealthy Brentwood neighborhood, an apparent violation of state law. Burke responded that she was living at her Brentwood mansion because the townhouse she listed in official political filings was being remodeled. 
On March 29, 2012, she was nominated by President Barack Obama to serve on the Amtrak Board of Directors. 
In 1957 she married Louis Brathwaite, divorcing in 1964. She married William A. Burke in Los Angeles on June 14, 1972, just days after she won a Congressional primary against Billy Mills, a Los Angeles City Council member who William Burke had worked for. Their daughter Autumn Burke was born on November 23, 1973.  Yvonne and Autumn are the first mother-and-daughter to both serve in the California Assembly. 
In mathematical heat conduction, the Green's function number is used to uniquely categorize certain fundamental solutions of the heat equation to make existing solutions easier to identify, store, and retrieve. 
Numbers have long been used to identify types of boundary conditions. The Green's function number system was proposed by Beck and Litkouhi in 1988 and has seen increasing use since then. The number system has been used to catalog a large collection of Green's functions and related solutions. 
Although the examples given below are for the heat equation, this number system applies to any phenomena described by differential equations such as diffusion, acoustics, electromagnetics, fluid dynamics, etc. 
The Green's function number specifies the coordinate system and the type of boundary conditions that a Green's function satisfies. The Green's function number has two parts, a letter designation followed by a number designation.  The letter(s) designate the coordinate system while the numbers designate the type of boundary conditions that are satisfied. 
As an example, number X11 denotes the Green's function that satisfies the heat equation in the domain (0 < x < L) for boundary conditions of type 1 (Dirichlet) at both boundaries x = 0 and x = L.  Here X denotes the Cartesian coordinate and 11 denotes the type 1 boundary condition at both sides of the body. The boundary value problem for the X11 Green's function is given by 
Here     k   {\displaystyle k}   is thermal conductivity (W/(m K)) and     h   {\displaystyle h}   is the heat transfer coefficient (W/(m2 K)). See    for this GF. 
As an example in the spherical coordinate system, number RS02 denotes the Green's function for a solid sphere (0 < r < b ) with a type 2 (Neumann) boundary condition at r = b.  Here letters RS denote the radial-spherical coordinate system, number 0 denotes the zeroth boundary condition (boundedness) at r=0, and number 2 denotes the type 2 boundary at r = b.  The boundary value problem for the RS02 Green's function is given by 
"Doing That Scrapyard Thing" is a song from  British group Cream's 1969 farewell album, Goodbye. Composed by the band's bassist, Jack Bruce, with lyrics by Pete Brown, the song, alongside Eric Clapton's "Badge" and Ginger Baker's "What a Bringdown," was one of Cream's final studio recordings. 
According to Pete Brown, Jack Bruce approached him to write the lyrics of the song in a telephone call: 
A funny thing happened with Goodbye. Dick Heckstall-Smith was living with me at the time as his marriage had just broken up. Jack [Bruce] was staying in Los Angeles and called me from there at 3 AM. He said, 'I want you to write the words to this song.' And he played me a theme over the phone, which I recorded on an terrible old Grundig tape recorder. I wrote the lyrics and then phoned him back. That song was 'Doing that Scrapyard Thing'.
Eric Clapton explained that the song, along with the other studio cuts from Goodbye, were recorded due to a lack of proper live material for the album: 
"Doing That Scrapyard Thing" was released on Goodbye in February 1969. In some European countries, the song was used as the B-side of "Badge" instead of "What a Bringdown". AllMusic critic Stephen Thomas Erlewine praised the song as "an overstuffed near-masterpiece filled with wonderful, imaginative eccentricities." 
Baxter and his team developed the concept of Zip-a-Dee River Run, which would incorporate scenes from Song of the South.  The name was later changed to Splash Mountain after then CEO Michael Eisner's mostly ignored suggestion that the attraction be used to help market the 1984 film Splash. The characters from America Sings were used in many scenes, though all of the main characters were specifically designed for Splash Mountain. 
Dave Feiten was then brought in to animate and fix story and staging problems. Feiten moved nearly all of the animatronics to new locations, removing 10 animatronic figures from the ride completely, to improve the show.[citation needed] 
Splash Mountain was originally planned to open in 1988, but this was delayed to 1989. The planned Grand Opening on July 17, 1989, could not be met. Early riders made up of company executives were getting soaked rather than lightly sprayed, and so the ride opening date had to be delayed again for months so that the boats could be re-designed to hold fewer passengers, to build them lighter and to re-design the bottom and bow to make them less likely to splash so much water aboard. 
To celebrate the opening of Disneyland's version in 1989, a television special was made called Ernest Goes to Splash Mountain. Actor and comedian Jim Varney returned to play the title role of Ernest in the special. 
In 1991, construction began for the Splash Mountain attraction at Walt Disney World's Magic Kingdom and Tokyo Disneyland. On July 17, 1992, soft openings began at the Magic Kingdom. The two versions of Splash Mountain officially opened within a day of each other in October 1992: the Tokyo Disneyland attraction opened on October 1, and the Magic Kingdom attraction opened on October 2. 
In the late 1990s, the ride became synonymous with the phrase "Flash Mountain". Some female riders briefly expose their breasts during the descent, hoping to make illicit use of the in-ride photographs that Disney later sells to ride patrons. 
In January 2011, Splash Mountain at Magic Kingdom received lap bars for safety reasons. Each row of two to three passengers shares one lap bar. Meanwhile, Tokyo Disneyland received individual lap bars, which makes the height restriction 5 inches shorter than the other two versions. 
A version of the attraction was planned for Disneyland Paris, but was scrapped due to budget reasons and the colder weather in Europe.[citation needed] 
During the 2018 season, the Magic Kingdom location received a new sponsorship by Ziploc. The company created custom plastic bags to protect belongings for guests who rode the attraction. 
Guests enter the queue in front the main drop viewing area. The queue winds past the Critter Country sign into the main entrance where a number of machines with cogs and gears dominate. Various thoughts and sayings from Uncle Remus are featured on signs throughout the queue, which winds around a barn structure and reaches the loading area. 
Before the logs enter the indoor portion, snoring is heard emanating from Br'er Bear's cave. The snoring is a tribute to the original entrance to Bear Country (the former name of Critter Country) where a bear named Rufus was heard snoring from a cave. 
Before the return to the loading area, riders are given a preview of their picture that was taken on the final drop via an overhead screen. Professor Barnaby Owl, an overhead Audio-Animatronic, calls the riders' attention to the screen as he remarks on their expressions. After disembarking from the log, riders enter a "dark room," where they preview their on-ride photograph before exiting back out into Critter Country. 
Without a Critter Country in Walt Disney World, Splash Mountain is instead located in Frontierland, across the way from Big Thunder Mountain Railroad. Construction of Splash Mountain necessitated the demolition of the existing railroad station and temporarily turning the railroad into a shuttle between Main Street, U.S.A. and Mickey's Toontown Fair. 
Splash Mountain at Disneyland features music in a jazzy "big band" meets orchestral style, fitting the attraction's proximity to New Orleans Square. 
In addition, several other songs from Song of the South are heard as instrumental tracks, playing on a loop near the attraction and in the queuing area. These include "That's What Uncle Remus Said", "Sooner or Later", "All I Want", "Who Wants to Live Like That", and "Let the Rain Pour Down." The loop only features songs from the film and lasts about 25 minutes. 
Animators took over 80 hours to synchronize each figure. To re-wire and test each figure took an additional three months before the attraction could open, as programmers were tasked with reprogramming the figures from their previous America Sings performances with a decent level of realism in accordance with the new settings. Each character can carry out 45 seconds of movement and dialogue before a loop function restarts the sequence from the beginning. 
Songs from the film heard as instrumental tracks in the queuing area include "That's What Uncle Remus Said", "Let the Rain Pour Down", "Sooner or Later", and the opening theme from the film. Traditional songs like "Old MacDonald Had a Farm" and "Goober Peas" are also played in a bluegrass style. The loop lasts about an hour, and includes different orchestrations of the three main songs heard in the ride as well. 
After his tenure as U.S. Attorney General, he served as chairman of Nixon's 1972 presidential campaign. Due to multiple crimes he committed in the Watergate affair, Mitchell was sentenced to prison in 1977 and served 19 months. As Attorney General, he was noted for personifying the "law-and-order" positions of the Nixon Administration, amid several high-profile anti-war demonstrations. 
Mitchell was born in Detroit, Michigan, to Margaret (McMahon) and Joseph C. Mitchell. He grew up in the New York City borough of Queens. He earned his law degree from Fordham University School of Law and was admitted to the New York bar in 1938. He served for three years as a naval officer (Lieutenant, Junior Grade) during World War II where he was a PT boat commander. 
Except for his period of military service, Mitchell practiced law in New York City from 1938 until 1969 with the firm of Rose, Guthrie, Alexander and Mitchell and earned a reputation as a successful municipal bond lawyer.  Richard Nixon was a partner in the firm from 1963 to 1968. 
Mitchell's second wife, Martha Beall Mitchell, became a controversial figure in her own right, gaining notoriety for her late-night phone calls to reporters in which she accused President Nixon of participating in the Watergate cover-up and alleged that Nixon and several of his aides were trying to make her husband the scapegoat for the whole affair. 
John Mitchell met Richard Nixon, former vice president to Dwight D. Eisenhower, when Nixon moved to New York after losing the 1962 California gubernatorial election. Nixon then joined the municipal bond law firm where Mitchell worked, Mudge, Rose, Guthrie, Alexander & Ferndon, and the two men became friends. For the period during which Nixon was a senior partner, the firm was renamed to Nixon, Mudge, Rose, Guthrie, Alexander & Mitchell. 
In 1968, with considerable trepidation, John Mitchell agreed to become Nixon's presidential campaign manager. During his successful 1968 campaign, Nixon turned over the details of the day-to-day operations to Mitchell. 
After Nixon became president in January 1969, he appointed Mitchell as Attorney General of the United States while making an unprecedented direct appeal to FBI Director J. Edgar Hoover that the usual background investigation not be conducted. Mitchell remained in office from 1969 until he resigned in 1972 to manage President Nixon's reelection campaign. 
Mitchell believed that the government's need for "law and order" justified restrictions on civil liberties. He advocated the use of wiretaps in national security cases without obtaining a court order (United States v. U.S. District Court) and the right of police to employ the preventive detention of criminal suspects. He brought conspiracy charges against critics of the Vietnam War, likening them to brown shirts of the Nazi era in Germany. 
Mitchell expressed a reluctance to involve the Justice Department in some civil rights issues. "The Department of Justice is a law enforcement agency," he told reporters. "It is not the place to carry on a program aimed at curing the ills of society." However, he also told activists, "You will be better advised to watch what we do, not what we say." 
John Mitchell's name was mentioned in a deposition concerning Robert L. Vesco, an international financier who was a fugitive from a federal indictment. Mitchell and Nixon Finance Committee Chairman Maurice H. Stans were indicted in May 1973 on federal charges of obstructing an investigation of Vesco after he made a $200,000 contribution to the Nixon campaign. In April 1974, both men were acquitted in a New York federal district court. 
In 1972, when asked to comment about a forthcoming article that reported that he controlled a political slush fund used for gathering intelligence on the Democrats, he famously uttered an implied threat to reporter Carl Bernstein: "Katie Graham's gonna get her tit caught in a big fat wringer if that's published." 
Tape recordings made by President Nixon and the testimony of others involved confirmed that Mitchell had participated in meetings to plan the break-in of the Democratic Party's national headquarters in the Watergate Office Building. In addition, he had met with the president on at least three occasions in an effort to cover up White House involvement after the burglars were discovered and arrested. 
Around 5:00 pm on November 9, 1988, Mitchell collapsed from a heart attack on the sidewalk in front of 2812 N Street NW in the  Georgetown area of Washington, D.C., and died that evening at George Washington University Hospital. He was buried with full military honors at Arlington National Cemetery, based on his World War II Naval service and his cabinet post of Attorney General. 
Thomas Michael Jeneary (born March 31, 1952) is an American politician in the state of Iowa. He was elected to the Iowa House of Representatives in 2018. 
He was born in Des Moines, Iowa and is a retired dentist and funeral director. He is the Vice Chair of the Iowa Board of Dental Examiners. 
In February 2014, Republican Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell was featured in a controversial television advertisement by Dwayne Stovall. Stovall belittled McConnell, Cornyn's superior in the Senate leadership, as an ineffective "Beltway turtle" who is out-of-touch with the party rank-and-file. Until the controversial advertisement, the media had largely ignored Stovall's candidacy. 
Because Cornyn surpassed a majority in the primary, he faced no runoff election. Cornyn's winning percent and margin of victory were the lowest by any Texas Republican U.S. Senator in a primary election in state history. 
Alcithoe benthicola is a species of very large deepwater sea snail, a marine prosobranch gastropod mollusc in the family Volutidae, the volutes. 
He studied medicine in Berlin, obtaining his doctorate in 1870. Following service as a physician in the Franco-Prussian War, he began practicing medicine and soon found himself specializing in diseases of the ear, nose and larynx. In 1884 he became a privat-docent of otology, rhinology and laryngology at the University of Berlin, and in 1897 received the title of professor. Among his assistants at Berlin was fellow otorhinolaryngologist Jacob Katzenstein (1864-1921). 
Dentimargo hesperia is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Marginellidae, the margin snails. 
This biographical article related to fencing in Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Until the thirteenth century, documents referred to Mogrovejo as "Luarna", the name of an old family from which the saint Turibius of Mogrovejo descended. 
Simon Odongo  is a Kenyan rugby union coach and former player. He was born and grew up in Nairobi. His position as a player was Flyhalf / Center / Wing / Fullback and he played for Mwamba RFC, and Homeboyz RFC. He has been the Homeboyz head coach twice now 2018-2019 replacing Paul Murunga and 2021, replacing Jason Hector. 
Odongo played his club rugby at Mwamba RFC after graduating from High School, where he played from 2007 to 2009. He eventually moved to Homeboyz RFC in 2009, which was formed the same year, and helped them win several titles before retiring in 2014 due to a stubborn ACL injury. 
Simon became the academy coach and assistant coach at Homeboyz Rugby Club in Nairobi, Kenya straight after retiring.  He was the assistant coach to Paul Murunga and worked together with The Late Benjamin Ayimba. In 2014 he helped establish a rugby team at Milimani Primary School where Homeboyz used to train. When Homeboyz shifted their base to Jamhuri Park, he continued coaching the academy and reserve team that was later promoted to the senior side.  
Simon joined the Kings Rugby Development Academy as the Head coach in 2016 where he coached different age groups and earned some of his coaching badges. He is currently serving as the Director of Rugby.  
After Paul Murunga got called up to the Kenya 7s team as an assistant coach for the 2015/16 HSBC sevens series and the Rio 2016 Summer Games, Odongo stepped in as the coach and under his guidance, Homeboyz went ahead and won the National 7's circuit in 2016. After working as the assistant coach of Homeboyz RFC for four years under, head coach Paul Murunga (2014-2018), Simon was appointed Homeboyz' head coach in 2018, when they won the Enterprise Cup Final and the overall National 7's Circuit. 
In 2019, Simon coached the Homeboyz Rugby team in the Kenya Cup, where they failed to make the playoffs. He however led the reserve side to the Eric Shirley Shield Finals for the first time since the club was promoted. 
South African, Jason Hector was then appointed head coach for the Homeboyz Rugby team for the 2019-2020 Kenya Rugby season with Simon slotting in as his assistant coach. However, the season was called off due to the COVID-19 pandemic and Jason left for his home country with Simon being appointed the Head Coach of Homeboyz Rugby in 2021. 
"Finders Keepers" is the first episode of the twelfth season and the 211th overall episode of the animated comedy series Family Guy. It aired on Fox in the United States and Canada on September 29, 2013, and is written by Anthony Blasucci and Mike Desilets and directed by John Holmquist. In the episode, Peter is convinced that a placemat at a restaurant is a treasure map. The rumor of supposed treasure sparks a citywide search, turning the residents of Quahog against each other. 
At home, the Griffins are pleased with what they have. They then receive a knock on the door, with Peter suspecting the "Hurry Up Shrimp" delivery. 
The episode received a 2.6 rating and was watched by a total of 5.23 million people; this made it the second most watched show on Animation Domination that night, beating American Dad! and Bob's Burgers, but losing to The Simpsons with 6.37 million. 
Long John was born 22 August 1993 as Learnmore Mwenyeyeka at Dangamvura Hospital in Mutare, Manicaland, Zimbabwe. He never met his father and does not know his name. His mother, Memory Mwanyenyeka, is a Kindergarten teacher in South Africa. He was raised by his grandparents, Partson Mwanyenyeka, a government pensioner and Lillian Mwanyenyeka in Chimanimani. 
During the years 1999 to 2000, he  went to Chimanimani Primary School  between Grade 1 and 2. When his grandfather was retrenched from work, in 2000, they moved to Mutare where he continued his education at Sheni Primary School from Grade 3 up to the time he sat his ZIMSEC Grade 7 Certificate. In 2006, he joined Chimanimani High School, and in 2010, he sat his ZIMSEC General Certificate of Education Ordinary Level. 
In 2014, he then went back to Bulawayo, where a new comedy club called Umahlekisa had been formed. He was helped by the founder, Ntando Van Moyo with stage time and honing skills to be a better comedian. He became affectionately known as "The Village Boy from Chimanimani" because of his village jokes. In October 2014, he began his first international  tour in South Africa at The Box Comedy Club hosted at Pop Art Theatre Johannesburg. 
In December 2015 he performed his first  one man show titled The Longest Yard at Alliance Francaise Harare. 
27 February 2016 was the first time he opened for Barry Hilton. In the same year, he was invited to perform at the African Comedy Festival at the Hippodrum Auditorium in Golders Green in the United Kingdom. While in the United Kingdom, he did a course with Laughing Horse to improve on his skills. On 22 June 2016, he hosted his second one man show titled The Village boy at the Reps Theatre in Harare, Zimbabwe. 
On 27 April 2017, Long John performed in a three day comedy festival at the Swaziland International Comedy Festival, hosted by Chigubu. On 2 March 2018 he headlined the Major Moves Comedy  Nights in Botswana at Zambezi Towers. On 29 June, he performed in Uganda at the Kampala Comedy Festival, hosted by Okello Okello.  In July 2018, he performed in Rwanda at the Kigali International Comedy Festival along several Ugandans and Daliso Chaponda. 
In March 2020 he won his second NAMA Award as Outstanding Comedian of the Year. In October 2020, Long John won the Best Stand up Comedy Award at the All The Laughs Comedy Awards hosted in Atlanta. He was then nominated in three categories; People's Choice Awards, Outstanding Achievement in Entertainment and Male Personality of the Year for in the 6th annual Zimbabwe Achievers Awards South Africa (ZAA SA) and he won as Male Personality of the Year during the award ceremony in December. 
In 2021, Long John was part of the cast of the second season of Savanna Virtual Comedy Bar hosted by Comedy Central on DStv. 
Bugry is located 44 km east of Ustyuzhna (the district's administrative centre) by road. Martynovo is the nearest rural locality. 
Hant's Harbour is a small fishing village built around a small harbour which opens on the north to Trinity Bay. The harbour waters are able to accommodate vessels up to 100 tons, the landscapes which surround it are low hills which are rocky and barren. 
Hant's Harbour early residents were mostly of the Church of England, during the eighteenth century they depended upon the services of clergy on the irregular visits of the missionaries for the Society of the Propagation of the Gospel, stationed at Trinity. 
The rise and rapid growth of Methodism in Hant's Harbour caused the Church of England community to remain small, its members being served the clergy stationed at nearby parishes. In the early twentieth century the Salvation Army came to Hant's Harbour and gradually built up a substantial membership, and constructed a citadel there. 
Relatively mild winters with considerable variation in snow cover. Heavy rainfalls from October through December. Summers cooled by low clouds and fogs near coasts, considerably brighter and warmer inland. 
From the beginning, the economy of Hant's Harbour was based mainly on the fisheries, until the nineteenth century when it was the inshore cod fishery and the Labrador fishery during the latter half of the century. This was also an important source of seasonal income during the nineteenth and twentieth centuries. 
Patnaik was diagnosed with pancreatic cancer. He had been undergoing treatment at a private hospital in Gurgaon. When his health was very critical, he shifted to a private hospital in New Delhi where he died at 7.59 am on 19 October 2018. 
The design was originally a stockless short-barreled pistol version of an AR-15 receiver that Allan Zitta used in target shooting competitions. It later went into commercial production as the Master Blaster in 1996. Zitta later developed it into a full rifle with a folding stock, and conversion kits have also been offered for AR-15 rifles. 
In 2008, the LR-300 was offered under the name Para Tactical Target Rifle (TTR) as a result of a joint collaboration between Para USA and ZM Weapons. 
The direct gas impingement system used in the LR-300 is intended to solve the fouling problems of the traditional AR-15 direct gas impingement gas system. The forward mounted return spring also allows for fitting a folding stock, and the factory stock option folds to the left side. The rifle is also available with a fixed stock. Since its introduction, the exterior design has evolved and changed a couple of times.[citation needed] 
To accommodate the unique forward buffer and gas impingement system, the proprietary upper is taller and thicker than a standard AR upper. The handguard rail has a removable top cover to access the recoil spring system for disassembly. The charging handle is proprietary, and has a beefier design to fit the op-rod. 
Vidhyawati Vidyashankar  was an Indian politician from the state of the Madhya Pradesh. She represented Chhindwara Vidhan Sabha constituency of undivided Madhya Pradesh Legislative Assembly by winning General election of 1957. 
This article about an Indian National Congress politician from Madhya Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The government legislation that defines the R322, the Roads Act 1993 (Classification of Regional Roads) Order 2012 (Statutory Instrument 54 of 2012), provides the following official description: 
Jeff Whiting (born March 27, 1972 in Denver, Colorado) is an American theater director, choreographer, performer and entrepreneur. He has been involved in theatrical productions, concerts, operas and special events around the world. Whiting is also known for developing "Stage Write," an app that allows creation, duplication and editing of floorplan charts to facilitate stage choreography. 
Whiting began his performing career  after graduation. He made his first professional appearance in 1996 as Quasimodo in Disney's Hunchback of Notre Dame at Disney/MGM Studios in Orlando, Florida. In 1997, Whiting moved to New York City and performed in numerous regional theatrical productions. 
In addition to his work on Broadway, Whiting has directed numerous concerts and events. His work includes a series of concerts at Carnegie Hall with James Taylor (starring James Taylor, Bette Midler, Sting, Steve Martin and Tony Bennett) and "A Tribute to Susan Stroman" (co-hosted by Matthew Broderick and Nathan Lane and produced by The Vineyard Theatre). Opera credits include We Open In Paris at Glimmerglass Opera. 
Whiting directed and choreographed the World Premiere production of Chasing Rainbows: Road to Oz, highlighting the life of Judy Garland, at Flatrock Playhouse in 2015. 
Whiting delivered a TEDTalk on February 7, 2016 titled "Rising Beyond Limits with Open Jar Thinking" at Queens University in Kingston, Ontario. He has also directed and choreographed numerous events and shows for The Walt Disney Company in the USA, Brazil, Mexico and India. 
In 2003, Whiting founded The Open Jar Institute, which allows young actors to train one-on-one with Broadway professionals. The institute provides workshops and masterclasses with professionals for students from around the world.Playbill feature on StageWriteApple Website Feature: StageWrite App 
Osmer Eduardo Morales (born October 30, 1992) is a Venezuelan professional baseball pitcher who is a free agent. He previously played in Major League Baseball (MLB) for the Los Angeles Angels. 
Morales signed a minor league deal with the Seattle Mariners on May 1, 2010, beginning his professional career. Osmer played in the minor leagues with the Mariners through the 2016 season. He elected free agency on November 7, 2016. 
On November 14, 2016, Morales signed a minor league deal with the Los Angeles Angels. Morales spent the 2017 season with the Mobile BayBears, Inland Empire 66ers, and Salt Lake Bees. Morales was invited to Spring Training for the 2018 season. He failed to make the majors and was reassigned to Salt Lake.  Morales was called up to the majors for the first time on August 13, 2018. He was designated for assignment by the Angels on September 3, 2018. He elected free agency on November 2. 
On February 11, 2020, Morales signed with the Cleburne Railroaders of the American Association of Independent Professional Baseball. However, the team was not selected by the league to compete in the condensed 2020 season due to the COVID-19 pandemic. Morales was not chosen by another team in the dispersal draft, and therefore became a free agent. 
This biographical article relating to a Venezuelan baseball pitcher is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Museo delle Arti Monastiche e delle tradizioni popolari (Museum of Monastic Arts and Popular Traditions, also known as the Museo Arti Monastiche or MAM) is a museum in Serra de' Conti, Ancona Province, Italy. The museum showcases various art and artifacts from the nearby Monastery of St. Mary Magdalene of Serra de 'Conti. 
The Cesano Infantry Shooting Range was a temporary firing range set up by the Italian Army for the infantry off the Via Cassia. It hosted the 300 m free rifle shooting event for the 1960 Summer Olympics in Rome. 
When the head of the Chichester family was advanced in the Peerage of Ireland to being an earl in 1647, they took the title Earl of Donegall due to the family's ownership of this vast estate in Inishowen. The head of the family was further advanced in the Peerage of Ireland to being Marquess of Donegall in July 1791. 
When The 2nd Marquess of Donegall settled in Belfast in 1802, what remained of the 'Plantation-era' Belfast Castle had long been a ruin, having been destroyed by a fire almost a century before, in April 1708. This 'Plantation' castle had almost certainly been built on the site of the original, medieval Belfast Castle. By 1802, this original castle site had partially been built upon with other buildings. 
Lord Donegall sold off Donegall House in the centre of Belfast in the early 1820s, establishing his main residence at Ormeau House thereafter. Donegall House was converted into being The Royal Hotel in 1824. Ormeau House, where The 2nd Marquess of Donegall died in October 1844, was eventually demolished in the late 1860s. 
The new, Victorian castle was built in the Scots Baronial architectural style and was designed by the Belfast firm of Lanyon, Lynn and Lanyon. However, there is some debate over who in the firm actually designed the new Belfast Castle. Although popularly attributed to Sir Charles Lanyon, some architectural historians believe that the castle was actually designed by either his business partner, and former apprentice, W.H. Lynn, or by Sir Charles's other business partner, his son John Lanyon. 
In the years after it was given to the city, there was some debate about what Belfast Castle should be used for. The publicity manager at the time felt that the castle should either be re-purposed into a tea and dance room, or perhaps a museum and art gallery with refreshment rooms. 
Since 1945, the castle has been a popular venue for weddings, afternoon teas, and other such events. 
As with Belfast Castle itself, there is some debate over who actually designed the Chapel of the Resurrection. The designs for the chapel came out of the office of Lanyon, Lynn and Lanyon. Some architectural historians believe that the chapel, like the castle, was designed by either W.H. Lynn or John Lanyon. 
Having been derelict for almost fifty years, the chapel was eventually converted into luxury flats, with work being completed in 2020. Now called The Chapel, the building is part of a new housing development called Donegall Park Gardens, just off Innisfayle Park. 
Belfast Castle is located 400 feet (121.92 metres) above sea level on Cave Hill, overlooking Belfast in County Antrim in the east of Ulster. 
Belfast Castle is open to the public daily with a visitor centre, antique shop, Millennium Herb Garden, restaurant, and a playground. Visitors can see a bedroom, set up in the style of the 1920s, so visitors can see a 'snapshot in time' of what the castle looked like at the end of its life as a private residence. The Cavehill Visitor Centre is located inside the castle. 
While it is open to the public daily, reservations can be made for a private room to host weddings, business meetings, and parties. 
As in the twentieth-century, many of the rooms have been turned into public tea rooms or are available to be reserved for private functions. 
Another example of events held at the castle was the 2015 Belfast Castle Hospice Walk, held by the Northern Ireland Hospice to benefit local charities and those living with terminal illnesses. 
Ismaila Cheick Coulibaly (born 25 December 2000) is a Malian footballer who plays as a midfielder for Beerschot on loan from EFL Championship club Sheffield United. 
On 9 September 2020, Premier League club Sheffield United announced the signing of Coulibaly and immediately sent him to Belgian First Division A side Beerschot on a three-year loan deal. 
This biographical article related to Malian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
302 West 12th Street is a residential building facing west onto Abingdon Square Park in the Greenwich Village Historic District on the west side of lower Manhattan in New York City, United States. 
It was built by the developer brothers Bing & Bing with the architectural firm of Boak & Paris.  Russell M. Boak and Hyman F. Paris left the architectural firm of Emery Roth to start their own practice in 1927. 
It was part of a simultaneous development of five buildings in the area. Bing & Bing also worked with Boak and Paris on 45 Christopher Street. 
Leo Bing, announced on April 1, 1929, that his firm had quietly acquired 75 small lots and old buildings largely around Abingdon Square, Sheridan Square and Jackson Square Park.  And the lots would be combined to allow for a set of larger-scale, 17-story apartment buildings. 
This building was featured in the 2006 feature film Lucky Number Slevin together with its sister building 299 West 12th Street. 
Rajni Kapur was born on 15 July 1929, in Peshawar, one of five children born to Indernath and Sampiyari Kapur. Following the Partition of India in 1947, the family moved to Delhi. 
At the age of 17, Kapur was recruited by All India Radio (AIR) to sing songs in Punjabi and Pashto for a children's programme and read the news in Hindi. 
Whilst working at AIR, she met Mahendra Kaul, a newsreader in Kashmiri and Urdu and a drama producer. The couple married in 1955. 
The family moved to London in 1961 and both Rajni and Mahendra Kaul took up work for the BBC Hindi. They made London their home. 
Rajni Kaul married broadcaster Mahendra Kaul on 2 May 1955. Their daughter Kalyani Kaul was born in December 1960 and went on to become a barrister, QC and circuit judge. 
She and her husband were often invited to high profile events, meeting Queen Elizabeth II and often going to Number 10 Downing Street during the Thatcher era. Rajni was very tolerant and amused by Mahendra's flirting with the Prime Minister, Margaret Thatcher. 
Kaul died peacefully in her sleep on Tuesday 31 August 2021, aged 92, at the Golden Estate in Faridabad near Delhi. Her death notice in The Times included the memorable line "Her unrivalled ability to interfere, manipulate and micromanage crossed continents and time zones...We love you always". She was cremated and asked for her ashes to be scattered in Rishikesh. 
Gabriel Katopodis was born in 1967 in the uptown Buenos Aires neighborhood of Belgrano to a family of Greek background. He studied law at the University of Buenos Aires and became involved in political activism through his work in poor neighbourhoods of the Buenos Aires Province. 
He counts with a postgraduate degree on public management from FLACSO and a master's degree on public administration from the University of Buenos Aires School of Economics. 
Katopodis was re-elected for a second term in 2015, this time beating former mayor Ricardo Ivoskus.  Noteworthy achievements of his second term in the mayoralty include the inauguration of a municipality-run safe space for women fleeing gender-based violence in 2018, and the inauguration of the Metrobus North Line on Route 8 in 2019. 
In 2020 he denounced that the previous administration had amassed a $ 35,000-million debt on public works, and up to 60% of all ongoing works were completely paralyzed. Katopodis stated that due to the accumulated debt, the ministry's priorities would be federal integration, job creation, and the completion of ongoing works. 
The son of Sylvester Main, a singing school teacher, Hubert Platt Main was born in Ridgefield, Connecticut in 1839 and attended local singing school until 1854, when he went to New York City to work as an errand boy in a wallpaper business. Main later earned a D.D. degree. 
Main also collected music books, and in 1906 sold his collection (over 3,500 volumes) to the Newberry Library in Chicago, Illinois, where they form the core of its Americana collection. 
Main died in Newark, New Jersey on October 7, 1925, and was buried in Bloomfield Cemetery in Essex County. Several of his hymns continue to be republished today. 
Because Music is an independent record label with headquarters in Paris and London. Because Music SAS is the main label, with Because Music Ltd handling the British artist roster. 
Because Music was founded in 2005 by former president of Virgin Records France and EMI Continental Europe Emmanuel de Buretel, and has acts on its roster such as Mercury Music Prize nominated Metronomy and electronic duo Justice, along with actress and songwriter Charlotte Gainsbourg and husband-and-wife duo Amadou & Mariam. 
It holds an exclusive license for all artists on Ed Banger Records and Phantasy. Because Music is the distributor for select Atlantic Records subsidiaries like Big Beat and 300 Entertainment. 
In 2017, Because acquired the catalogues of over 60 artists from Warner Music Group, including Mano Negra, The Beta Band, and most of London Records. 
In January 2018, Because signed a deal with Caroline Distribution (now Virgin Music Label & Artist Services) (a Universal Music division) for distribution of Because's releases starting in 2019. Before, the distribution was held by Warner Music's Alternative Distribution Alliance and Vice Records. 
DePuy met Marjory Kennedy Walker of Salem, Virginia, a Far East specialist who served with both the Office of Strategic Services and the Central Intelligence Agency, and they were married in June 1951. A son, William E DePuy Jr. was born in July 1952, and daughters Joslin and Daphne in July 1953 and 1954, respectively. 
DePuy is perhaps best remembered for his efforts while commander of the United States Army Training and Doctrine Command, where he helped create a new, innovative fighting doctrine for the army. His wide-ranging and sometimes controversial changes in combat development and the way the army trains sparked a debate that resulted in the widely accepted AirLand Battle Doctrine. 
Unityville was originally called Stark, and under the latter name was laid out in 1907 by J. F. Stark, and named for him. 
Miss Innocence is a 1918 American silent drama film directed by Harry Millarde and starring June Caprice. It was produced and released by the Fox Film Corporation. 
After the ascent, Charles Barrington returned to Ireland and never visited the Alps again. He owned and trained a famous racehorse, "Sir Robert Peel", that won the first Irish Grand National in 1870. 
Barrington organized the first Irish mountain race in 1870, offering a gold watch to the winner of this running event, which was held on the Sugar Loaf mountain in County Wicklow. 
He died at his family home in Earlsfort Terrace in Dublin on 20 April 1901, and is buried in Mount Jerome Cemetery. 
All rapid express trains pass Chidoribashi, Dempo, Fuku, Dekijima, and Daimotsu every day from March 20, 2012, and suburban semi-express trains run to Amagasaki instead. 
The teams competed over three days with four fourball matches on both Friday and Saturday, four foursomes matches on Saturday afternoon, four greensomes matches on Sunday morning and ten singles on Sunday. 
Mark James, who qualified by finishing 18th on the 1999 European Tour Order of Merit, turned down the chance to play for Team Great Britain and Ireland and was replaced by David Howell. 
The greensomes were due to be played on Saturday afternoon but were delayed by rain and played on Sunday morning before the singles matches. 
The Bank of Surrency, at 80 Hart St. in Surrency, Georgia, was built in 1911.  It is a small Early Commercial-style building and has also been known as Surrency Post Office.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 2003. 
It was later used for sweet potato storage.  It was bought in 1999 by the City of Surrency with plans to develop it as a local museum and visitor's welcome center. 
This article about a property in Georgia on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aliens: Zone of Silence is a 2017 American direct to video found footage science-fiction psychological horror film directed by Andy Fowler in his directorial debut, and written by Fowler along with Fidel Arizmendi. 
After her brother vanishes from the Mexican desert, a young woman sets out to uncover the truth about his disappearance. When she discovers an extraterrestrial presence, she must risk her life to expose the desert's otherworldly secret. 
In the United States and Canada, Aliens: Zone of Silence was released direct to video on October 24, 2017. 
Hugo Daya (born 25 October 1963) is a Colombian former cyclist. He competed in the sprint event at the 1984 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Colombian cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jordi Turull i Negre (born 6 September 1966) is a Spanish politician associated with Together for Catalonia.  Since March 2018 he has been in pre-trial custody by order of the Supreme Court of Spain and accused of sedition and rebellion. On July 10, 2018 a Supreme Court judge suspended him as a deputy in the Catalan parliament. 
In the 2019 general election, Turull was elected member of the Congress of Deputies for the Province of Barcelona, being sworn in on 20 May 2019, but on 24 May, by a recommendation of the Supreme Court, the Board of the Congress suspended him and other imprisoned Catalan leaders. He also resigned as member of the Catalan Parliament on 18 May 2019. 
On October 27, 2017 after the Parliament of Catalonia proclaimed the Catalan Republic, the Spanish Senate approved the measures proposed by the Spanish executive pursuant to Article 155 of the Spanish Constitution of 1978, including the dismissal of the President of the Generalitat of Catalonia and the entire executive, including Jordi Turull. 
On February 1, 2019, he was transferred back to a prison in Madrid, expecting trial that started February the 12th  and ended and was remitted to decision on 12 June 2019. 
On 14 October 2019 he was sentenced to a 12 years of prison term and disqualification for the sedition and misuse of public funds crimes. He was freed in June 2021 following a government pardon. 
Pilodeudorix infuscata is a butterfly in the family Lycaenidae. It is found in southern Nigeria, the Republic of the Congo, Uganda (from the western part of the country to Bwamba) and north-western Tanzania. The habitat consists of primary forests. 
The town was developed around the largest iron mine in Tunisia. Despite a downward trend in production, it still produces 120,000 tons of good quality iron ore as of 2005, 60 percent of Tunisia's iron production. In 1960, 1.033 million tons were mined at Jerissa. The mine is operated by the Jebel Djerissa Company. 
It is said that late on the 18th century, a wooden cross was found in a field, with the image of Jesus' body painted on it. Unable to move the cross, the local people decided to erect a hermitage there. The pagan celebrations include the visit of the sanctuary, a mass, and several musical and artistic events that last around 3 days. There is another celebration, called Fiesta Chica (Small Celebration) that takes place in September. 
In 1983, a sanctuary was constructed in the place to hold the cross, where 31 murals were painted by Julio Carreras. In 2003, a new altar was constructed. 
This article about a place in Santiago del Estero Province, Argentina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article relating to a myth or legend from South America is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Perillus exaptus is a species of predatory stink bug in the family Pentatomidae. It is found in North America. 
The Kinaidokolpitai next appear as one of the peoples subdued by the king of Aksum[g] according to the Adulis throne inscription, which dates from some time between the mid-2nd and early 3rd century. It is possibly contemporary with or even a little earlier than Ptolemy. There are two slightly different ways of translating this inscription: 
I sent both a fleet and an army of infantry against the Arabitai and the Kinaidocolpitai who dwell across the Red Sea, and I brought their kings under my rule. I commanded them to pay tax on their land and to travel in peace by land and sea. I made war from Leuke Kome to the lands of the Sabaeans. 
And I sent a fleet and land forces against the Arabitae and Cinaedocolpitae who dwelt on the other side of the Red Sea, and having reduced the sovereigns of both, I imposed on them a land tribute and charged them to make travelling safe both by sea and by land. I thus subdued the whole coast from Leuce Come to the country of the Sabaeans. 
In the Collection of Chronologies, written in 235, presents the Kinaidokolpitai as colonists from Midian. The author has probably identified them with the Kenites of the Bible (Septuagint Kinaioi), an identification he may have found strengthened by the spellings in Josephus (Kenetidai and Keneaidai). Nevertheless, the lands of the Kinaidokolpitai may at some point have extended northwest into former Nabataean lands. 
The earliest reference to the Kinaidokolpitai is an ostrakon found at Maximianon in Egypt and dated to 118 or perhaps closer 150. It records that two soldiers of the garrison, probably cavalrymen, were sent out on the 20th of the month Tobi "with a diploma (official missive) concerning the Chinedakolpitai". 
The implication of the Adulis throne inscription is that in the middle of the 2nd century or early in the 3rd, the Kinaidokolpitai were raiding the incense route, both its sea-lanes and overland roads, that connected South Arabia and the Horn of Africa with the Roman Empire. The main Aksumite port of Adulis, where the throne inscription was found, was located on the incense route. 
The Kinaidokolpitai are listed in Stephanus of Byzantium's Ethnika (5th century). All his information is derived from other written sources, such as Ptolemy and Marcian of Heracleia (who wrote at an unknown date). He gives the capital of the Kinaidokolpitai as Zadrame and quotes Marcian placing the Kinaidokolpitai alongside the Zadramites. His testimony cannot be taken as evidence for the continued existence of the Kinaidokolpitai in his time. 
Green Lake County is a county located in the U.S. state of Wisconsin. As of the 2010 census, the population was 19,051. Its county seat is Green Lake. In 2010, the center of population of Wisconsin was located in Green Lake County, near the city of Markesan. 
There were 7,703 households, out of which 29.40% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 58.50% were married couples living together, 6.90% had a female householder with no husband present, and 30.90% were non-families. 27.00% of all households were made up of individuals, and 13.80% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.43 and the average family size was 2.96. 
In the county, the population was spread out, with 24.20% under the age of 18, 6.60% from 18 to 24, 26.20% from 25 to 44, 24.20% from 45 to 64, and 18.80% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 41 years. For every 100 females there were 97.00 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 95.20 males. 
In 2010, the largest religious groups by number of adherents were Catholic at 5,290 adherents, Wisconsin Synod Lutheran at 2,498 adherents, Missouri Synod Lutheran at 1,173 adherents, ELCA Lutheran at 964 adherents, and Amish at 812 adherents. 
Paolo Cimini (born March 30, 1964) was a former Italian professional cyclist. He is most known for winning one stage in the 1987 Giro d'Italia. 
This biographical article related to an Italian cycling person born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Memunatu Sulemana  (born 4 November 1977) is a Ghanaian women's international footballer who plays as a goalkeeper. She is a member of the Ghana women's national football team. She was part of the team at the 1999 FIFA Women's World Cup, 2003 FIFA Women's World Cup and 2007 FIFA Women's World Cup. On club level she plays for Post Ladies in Ghana. She previously played for Pelican Stars in Nigeria Women Premier League. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Ghana is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"I Can Take You To The Sun" is a song that was composed and recorded by The Misunderstood at Philips Studio in London in 1966. The song is considered a psychedelic music classic. 
The single was released to critical acclaim but the band was forced to break up shortly thereafter when lead vocalist/harmonica player Rick Brown was drafted into the Vietnam War. 
In a release of early BBC Top Gear shows, host John Peel introduced the song with the comment, "This is to my mind the best popular record that's ever been recorded". Peel would later rank the song as his number 3 song for 1966 in his "Peelennium" (Greatest Songs of the 20th Century) list. 
Record Collector magazine, in a July 1999 article wrote, "The Misunderstood were a band of immense talent (...) Without apologies, the Misunderstood single stands (...) as one of the most powerful and best psychedelic singles ever released." "I Can Take You to the Sun" is mentioned in Record Collector's book "100 Greatest Psychedelic Records". 
Prolonged hot and dry weather, combined with an outbreak of mountain pine beetles and a large number of thunderstorms made the 2006 wildfire season of the most severe in Washington state history. The 2006 Pacific Northwest wildfire season began in late June, when an extended thunderstorm followed a three-day heat wave. Between June 27 and July 10, lightning strikes occurred almost daily. 
Stephen Paul Stoutt (born 6 April 1964) is an English former professional footballer who made 149 appearances in the Football League playing as a defender for Huddersfield Town, Wolverhampton Wanderers, Grimsby Town and Lincoln City. He went on to play non-league football for Boston United and Grantham Town, where he was briefly caretaker manager. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a defender born in the 1960s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Michele S. Swanson is an American biologist who is a Professor of Microbiology at the University of Michigan. She has investigated the water-borne pathogen Legionella pneumophila. Swanson is interested in the metabolic cues that underpin the virulence of L. pneumophila and how it is transmitted to humans. She served as President of the American Society for Microbiology in 2018. 
L. pneumophila can cause sporadic outbreaks of Legionnaires' disease. This was responsible for the Flint water crisis that started in 2014. Swanson has studied the mechanisms that permit L. pneumophila to persist in water, looking to create a microbiology based system to assess the safety of public water systems. 
Swanson serves as the Director of Postgraduate Studies and President's Advisory Commission on Women's Issues at the University of Michigan. She was elected President of the American Society for Microbiology in 2018 and hosts the ASM podcast This Week in Microbiology. She was elected Fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science in 2019. 
In November 2016, the gang drugged and kidnapped Griselda Mojarro, driving her in her own car to an isolated area. There, she was hit on the head with a hammer and stabbed 18 times in the torso and neck. Like the previous victim, the cause of death was ruled to be from hypovolemic shock. 
Substitutes:Siobhan Woods for Owens (44)Muireann Ni Scanaill for Caffrey (44)Sorcha Furlong for Lamb (50)O. Leonard for McEvoy (52)Lucy Collins for Murphy (53) 
Tim Maculan (born April 20, 1963) is an American film and television actor known for his recurring roles on Six Feet Under and Cybill. 
Maculan was born in Rockford, Illinois. He started acting in high school productions as well as in local community and professional theaters. He worked at the Falmouth Playhouse with Van Johnson and William Shatner. Maculan studied at the School of the Art Institute of Chicago and the Theatre School at DePaul University. He later left Chicago for New York City, where he began his professional acting career working in summer stock and regional theatre across the United States. 
Some of Maculan's film work includes Spider-Man 3 (by director Sam Raimi), Inside Out (with Steven Weber), Matchstick Men (by director Ridley Scott), Duplex (with Ben Stiller and Drew Barrymore). 
This article about an American television actor born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Silver is the self-titled debut studio album by American country rock band Silver, it was released in May 1976 through Arista Records. 
Rob Caldwell of AllMusic wrote, "Wham Bam, a fairly weak slice of bubblegum pop, was the hit from the album. Given to the band by Arista because the company didn't hear a single among the other tracks." 
All The Fat Children (ATFC) is a Bengaluru-based alternative rock band that was formed in June 2008. 
ATFC has its roots as a college band from Christ University. The three members met up at university while studying and decided to form the band. The name origin came from Eben Johnson, who said "When we started off, sometime in 2008, we all were chubby kids. Most of our material came from the fact that we were overweight." The band had performed in Bangalore with Motherjane and Pentagram. They have performed more than 200 shows so far with 30 original compositions to their credit. 
ATFC released their first single called "I Can Fly", which was also released as a video produced by Qyuki, an initiative by A.R. Rehman and Shekhar Kapur. 
A second single "Somebody Else" was released in 2015, also released as a self-produced video. The video also received air time on TV channels such as VH1 and Pepsi MTV Indies. The video was shot in a warehouse, which was painted and the process took less than twenty four hours. "Somebody Else" was selected by Rolling Stone India as one of its 10 Best Indian Singles of 2015. Sennheiser listed ATFC in the top twenty bands in India for 2016 and 2017. 
WLEY (1080 AM, "Radio Ley") is a radio station licensed to serve Cayey, Puerto Rico.  The station was founded on September 8, 1964 and it is owned by Media Power Group, Inc. WLEY is part of the Radio Isla Network. It airs a Spanish language News Talk Information format. 
In July 1999, Uno Radio of Ponce Inc., Caguas, P.R. (Jesus M. Soto, chairman) reached an agreement to purchase five radio stations in Puerto Rico from Ponce Broadcasting Corp. (Janero G. Scarano Sr., Julio C. Braum, Luis F. Sala, Catalina Scarano and Sala Business Corp., shareholders) for a reported sale price of $10.75 million. 
In June 2003, Media Power Group Inc. (Eduardo Rivero Albino, chairman, Gilberto Rivera Gutierrez, Jose E. Fernandez and Joe Pagan, shareholders) reached an agreement to purchase four AM radio stations in Puerto Rico, including WLEY, from Uno Radio Group. (Jesus M. Soto, owner) for a reported $6.8 million. 
Byrne made his first appearance for the team during the 1927 championship and became a regular player over the next decade. During that time he won three All-Ireland medals, seven Leinster medals and one National Hurling League medal. 
Byrne enjoyed a two-decade long career with Dicksboro, winning two county championship medals.[citation needed] 
Unlike his Edinburgh equivalent, Dr Robert Knox, Moir was said to have actively undertaken body-snatching himself. This is highly unlikely, but the strange stories that surround Moir extend into the 21st century due to illogical thinking and bad reporting. 
He studied Medicine at King's College graduating MA in 1826. He then went to London, where he became a member of the Royal College of Surgeons in 1828. He then returned to Aberdeen and opened a new anatomy room with some other surgeons. 
Following the exposure of the Burke and Hare murders in Edinburgh in 1828, anatomists came under scrutiny, and the anatomy rooms were nicknamed "Burkin' Houses" by the public, relating to the newly created verb "to burke". The actions initially resulted in the Offences Against the Person Act 1828. 
The Anatomy Act 1832 regulrised the whole situation, allowing parish councils to give the bodies of paupers for dissection, immediately stemming the demand for body-snatching. 
In 1843 his lecture rooms are listed as Kingsland Place and Flourmill Lane, and he lived at 63 Guestrow. 
He died of typhoid in February 1844, aged only 38, and is buried in the church of the Kirk of St Nicholas. His grave is an old-fashioned table stone on the east side of the path near the north entrance to the churchyard. 
Nam played in the Reading's Youth Academy through KFA Youth Project. In July 2009, his first professional contract signed in France with Valenciennes FC. He played his debut on 8 August 2009 against AS Nancy and is currently the youngest Asian player to play in the Ligue 1 at age 18. 
Nam made his debut on 1 January 2012 against Al Kharitiyath. He scored his first league goal from a free kick on 19 January 2012. 
He made his AFC Champions League debut on 7 March 2012, scoring the only goal against Saudi Al Ahli, thereby scoring the first ever goal for Lekhwiya in any regional competition. 
Nam has represented South Korea at U-13, U-15 and U-17, U-20 and U-23 levels. He made his debut for the Korean senior team on 9 February 2011 in a friendly against Turkey. 
Nam represented South Korea at the 2012 Summer Olympics. He appeared as a substitute as Korea beat Japan in the bronze medal match at Cardiff's Millennium Stadium. 
Nam is hailed as the 'Korean Messi' by Valenciennes fans and has also been touted as a 'magician' and 'wonderkid'. He was Most Valuable Player three times in his youth career in the National Championships in South Korea. Nam became the youngest Korean footballer to play in a professional league in Europe as a result of this game. He is known for his very energetic playing style. 
The highway crosses over the new highway portion of U.S. Route 44 in Kingston, but there is no interchange; however, Commerce Way in Plymouth provides access between the two highways. Route 80 ends at Route 3A in Kingston along the Jones River between Routes 3 and 106. 
The state highway portion of the road is also concurrent with the Claire Saltonstall Bikeway which runs for 135 miles between Boston and Cape Cod.  
Sacred Heart High School and Camp Mishannock, a summer camp for girls along Lake Providence, are on the Kingston portion of this highway. 
Hypercompe leucarctioides is a moth of the family Erebidae first described by Augustus Radcliffe Grote and Coleman Townsend Robinson in 1867. It is found in Mexico and Guatemala. 
Retiring in July 1954, Admiral Joy subsequently made his home in La Jolla, California. He died at the U.S. Naval Hospital in San Diego, California on 6 June 1956. He is interred at the United States Naval Academy Cemetery. 
Beginning with the 2007, the show cutback its onsite presence by having its main anchor team at ESPN studio's in Bristol, but still kept a set at the actual game site. 
The Bristol team was Berman, Jackson, Mortensen, Mike Ditka, Keyshawn Johnson, and Cris Carter. The on-site team is Scott, Young, and Emmitt Smith. 
The Bristol team was Berman, Jackson, Mortensen, Ditka, Johnson, and Carter. The on-site team was Scott, Young, and Matt Millen (later Trent Dilfer) in the third spot. 
Suzy Kolber, who substituted for the then-ailing Stuart Scott during most of the 2014 season, took over Scott's role permanently as an on-site host.  She was previously a sideline reporter for Monday Night Football from 2006-2010.  Additionally, Monday Night Countdown debuted a new logo resembling its other NFL-themed studio-show properties, along with a new graphics package that is also used for MNF. 
Monday Night Countdown, along with most of ESPN's NFL-themed studio shows, moved to the network's South Street Seaport studios in New York City for the 2020 season.  With the exception of Louis Riddick, who switched roles with Booger McFarland & moved to the Monday Night Football broadcast booth (the latter of whom took over Riddick's previous role of studio analyst), the lineup remained the same from the previous season. 
After being at the network's New York City facilities due to the COVID-19 pandemic the previous year, Monday Night Countdown returned to the game site for the first time in two seasons.  Kolber, McFarland, Moss and Young all returned from the previous season. The show originated from New York instead of Baltimore October 11. Young didn't do the show October 18; Alex Smith did the show for the first time. 
Kula also refers to miners in the Chanthaburi and Pailin, Cambodia regions who are believed to be of Burmese descent. At the end of the 19th century, it was discovered that the Mon had also immigrated to the area, further muddying the definition. Cambodians sometimes refer to themselves as "the jungle people," as the jungle in the region originally stretched from Dawei to Mawlamyine. 
The Kula style of dress is similar to that of people in Pailin, including the traditional umbrella. Kula used to be referred to as "Burmese Cambodian" or "Khmer Shan" but are no longer called either of those. 
The Kula language is an amalgamation of words from Shan and Dai, both of which were native Shan peoples. Kula has adapted to include words from other peoples in Northern Thailand and Lan Na like the Northern Thai language, especially those languages spoken in the border communities between Burma and Thailand. 
Other Kula who live between Pailin and Stung Treng speak Shan language rather than the Kula mixed tongue. Among them, the Lao language has become the language of business, especially to those living on the border with Laos. However, after the Khmer Rouge, the Kula language has been almost lost, with the language becoming highly Thai-influenced. 
Kula merchants traded in Isan and along the banks of the Mekong. Their presence in Isan is recorded as early as the reign of King Rama IV. The first written record of Kula in the region comes from a dispute between a Kula merchant over the purchase of 577 cattle from the governors of Roi Et, Suwannaphum, and Khon Kaen, who refused to hand over the cattle. The Kula were protected at that time by Britain, therefore Bangkok acted as mediator and returned the 2764 baht owed. 
Kula would sometimes settle in a community once they married, while others returned to Cambodia once the trading era was over. Many Kula traditions and customs have disappeared over the generations through assimilation with local Thai and Lao communities. 
 During the 19th century, many Kula immigrated to Pailin, Cambodia. According to R. Blandat, a group of Shan from Chanthaburi found a precious stone that they mined. They told the Kula, who, as traders, made money from the venture. Rumours of the gem attracted Chinese, Laos and Vietnamese to the area. The wealthier Kula in Bangkok and the Shan royalty also immigrated to Cambodia, due to economic reasons. 
The Kula who lived in Pailin worked in the mines and also in the new business of heating. During the French Indochina period, a French gem merchant conducted experiments with the Pailin stones, which showed their efficacy in heat retention. The local French maintained a good relationship with the Kula, and as such many Kula travelled to France to study, returning to Cambodia afterwards. 
During that time, Pailin's economy grew and the livelihood of the Kula people grew with it. In the 1960s, Pailin became a tourist destination, jolting the Kula people into the modern-day, forcing their culture to change. For example, Kula traditionally kept their hair long and braided, and the men wore sarongs but with increased knowledge of the outside world, many Kula cut their hair cut and started wearing trousers. 
The Khmer Rouge rule struck the Kula people hard. Pailin became a Khmer Rouge stronghold for 30 years, while the Kula people were forced to become soldiers on the border of Lao. Some fled to Thailand while the rest were put to hard labour in the mines. This era is known as the time when the Kula culture was lost. 
The majority of travelling merchants were male and dressed differently from the locals. Most of their attire was described as similar to the clothing of Burma, Mon, Dai or Shan while some dressed like Karieng. Kula pants are mostly made from cotton and dyed in dark colours. Pants were wide-legged and ankle or knee-length, much like Chinese shorts, and were fastened with drawstrings. Men would also wear sarongs, checkered and in dark colours. 
Saint-Maurin, the only village in France of that name, is named after the saint to whom the village's 11th-century abbey is dedicated. The abbey, parts of which still stand beside the village square, was built by Benedictine monks. Reliefs cut into the stone of an archway portray Maurin having the top of his head cut off and his brain spooned out. 
The abbey was destroyed by the Albigeois war, then rebuilt. It was again ravaged in the 14th century, this time by troops on the English side in the Hundred Years War. It was again rebuilt in the 15th century but was then attacked once more by Huguenots. 
The abbey passed into the ownership of the village in 1645 and was never rebuilt. Many of the walls were demolished as a source of building stone but much of the main arch still stands. The monks' garden exists and so do the stables, now houses. The abbey is now a Monument de France and is being restored. 
Beneath and beside the town hall is a museum of artefacts from the village's agricultural past. The village has a school, sports ground, swimming pool and small businesses. 
Overland Stagecoach is a 1942 American Western film directed by Sam Newfield and written by Fred Myton. The film stars Robert Livingston as the Lone Rider, Al St. John as his sidekick "Fuzzy" Jones, and Dennis Moore as Sheriff Smoky Moore, with Julie Duncan, Glenn Strange and Ted Adams. The film was released on October 11, 1942, by Producers Releasing Corporation. 
This is the twelfth movie in the "Lone Rider" series, and the first starring Robert Livingston. The first eleven movies star George Houston. 
This was the last film in the series to feature Dennis Moore as Sheriff Smoky Moore; he co-starred in six of the Lone Rider films, beginning with 1942's The Lone Rider and the Bandit. 
"Fuzzy" Jones gets a job as a driver for the Pioneer Stagecoach Company, and he learns that the stagecoach company's owners, Jeff Clark and Harland Kent, are opposing the construction of a new railroad line through the area. Jeff Clark is killed in a gunfight with some outlaws. Before he dies, he tells "Fuzzy" to send for his daughter, Susan, who is also a partner in the stage line. Little does anyone know that Kent was actually behind Jeff's murder. 
This biographical article related to a Spanish cycling person born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The important celebrations on this day take place at Ayodhya (Uttar Pradesh), Bhadrachalam (Andhra Pradesh), Vayoor and Ramapada Temple, Rameswaram (Tamil Nadu), thronged by thousands of devotees. Rathayatras, the chariot processions, also known as Shobha yatras of Rama, Sita, Lakshmana and Hanuman, are taken out at several places. 
There are various ways to reach the temple, most visitors approach the temple as they reach mahabir chowk. Rambhadra and Helabazar, Hajipur is located near the temple. 
Pseudocaecilius is a genus of false lizard barklice in the family Pseudocaeciliidae. There are more than 50 described species in Pseudocaecilius. 
Howard began her professional career as a singer-songwriter in 1997, writing for Patty Loveless, John Michael Montgomery, Jessica Andrews, Lila McCann and others. After signing to Rising Tide Records Nashville, she earned the first of two Grammy Awards with her cover of the hymn "Softly and Tenderly" for the soundtrack of the film The Apostle before the label closed in March 1998. Later, she signed with Decca Records. 
Her self-titled debut album was released by MCA Nashville in 2000 and included the singles "When My Dreams Come True," "Out Here in the Water" and "I Don't Paint Myself into Corners," all of which charted on the Billboard country singles charts. 
In 2001, accompanied on the piano by Jim Brickman, Howard sang "Simple Things," the lead single from his album of the same name. The song peaked at No. 1 on Billboard's Adult Contemporary Chart. 
Howard performed "Forgive" on the NBC primetime television drama series Providence. The song featured prominently in the Season Five episode "The Sound of Music," with Howard credited as herself. 
Howard has been nominated twice for the Academy of Country Music Awards and is a two-time recipient of the International Bluegrass Music Awards (for "If I Could Only Win Your Love" and "Love Please Stay" on Larry Sparks's album 40.) 
In 2017, Howard announced the debut of her new company, the Second Say, which features Rebecca Lynn Howard as a motivational speaker for corporate and trade association meetings. Her company also provides leadership workshops and musical performances. "I'm here to connect with people," Howard said. "When I'm singing, I'm speaking to people. I feel like this venture is an extension of who I am." Additionally, she serves as a creativity consultant for business leaders. 
In 2017, Loving Mary joined Gretchen Wilson on a multi-city tour in support of her album Ready to Get Rowdy. 
However, the Police Service of Northern Ireland (formerly the Royal Ulster Constabulary), Northern Ireland Security Guard Service, Ministry of Defence Police, Civil Nuclear Constabulary, Belfast Harbour Police, Belfast International Airport Constabulary, and some of the Specialist Operations units of the Metropolitan Police involved in firearms and counter-terrorism policing are all issued firearms as a matter of routine. Every force also has a firearms unit, with armed response vehicles. 
The vast majority of officers are instead issued with other items for personal defence, such as speedcuffs, extendable "ASP" batons, and incapacitant sprays such as PAVA or CS spray. While not firearms, incapacitant sprays are subject to some of the same rules and regulations as a projectile firing firearm under Section 5 (b) of the Firearms Act 1968. 
Since 2004, police forces have issued Tasers to Authorised Firearms Officers for use against armed assailants which are considered by the authorities to be a less-lethal alternative to conventional firearms. 
The Irish Constabulary (later known as the Royal Irish Constabulary), the police force in Ireland from 1822 until 1922, when the country was part of the United Kingdom, was a paramilitary force. Its members were armed with carbines and sword bayonets. 
Northern Ireland also has a ballistics register, which covers both police and civilian-held firearms. It is mandated that during registration, all weapons undergo test firing and that the fired bullet and cartridge case must be stored by the police for the purpose of forensic examination. This is in the event that the weapon is used in a crime or when determining lawful shooting for police officers. 
There is an emerging view that the exceptionalism of the Northern Ireland police force is already fading. This is, however, not due to changes at PSNI but on account of the increasing adoption of its policing methods and practices in the rest of the UK. 
To allow armed officers to respond rapidly to an incident, most forces have patrolling Armed Response Vehicles (ARVs). ARVs were modelled on the Instant Response Cars introduced by the West Yorkshire Police in 1976, and were first introduced in London in 1991, with 132 armed deployments being made that year. 
In September 2004, the Parliamentary Under-Secretary of State for the Home Office approved the use of tasers throughout England and Wales by Authorised Firearms Officers following a trial. In November 2008, the Home Secretary approved the use of tasers throughout England and Wales for all officers, lifting the Authorised Firearms Officer restriction, with officers who receive training and carry a taser known as 'specially trained units' (STU's). 
In 2013, Police Scotland was formed with the inaugural Chief Constable granting a standing authority for ARV officers to overtly wear handguns, instead of being secured or concealed, and to deploy their weapons without requiring approval and also to be tasked for routine incidents (non-firearms incidents). A survey conducted by the Scottish Police Authority showed that 53% of the public supported sending ARV officers to routine calls and incidents while wearing a visible sidearm.  
In May 2014, the Firearms Act 1968 was amended to recognise the British Transport Police (BTP) as a police force under the Act in order to provide BTP a firearms licensing exemption the same as other police forces. BTP had, since armed policing commenced in February 2012, required an Authorised Firearms Officer (AFO) to apply to their local police force in a private capacity for a firearms certificate to enable them to perform the AFO role. 
In February 2015, The Times reported that most forces in England and Wales dispatch armed officers to domestic incidents and other routine police call-outs based on information released under Freedom of Information laws; of the 43 police forces sent a request by the Times, half gave only partial information or rejected requests outright. 
Surveys by the Police Federation of England and Wales have continued to show police officers' considerable resistance to routine arming. Although in the Federation's most recent (2017) Officer/Arming survey, 66% of respondents were against the routine arming of police compared to 82% in 2006. Furthermore, 42.5% of respondents wanted firearms not to be issued routinely to all officers, but for more officers to receive training and issued firearms as needed. 
The use of firearms by the police in England and Wales is covered by statute (such as the Police and Criminal Evidence Act 1984 and the Human Rights Act 1998), policy (such as the Home Office Code of Practice on Police use of Firearms and Less Lethal Weapons and the ACPO Manual of Guidance on Police Use of Firearms) and common law. 
United Kingdom law allows the use of "reasonable force" to make an arrest or prevent a crime or to defend oneself. If the force used is fatal, then the European Convention of Human Rights only allows "the use of force which is no more than absolutely necessary". Firearms officers may therefore only discharge their weapons "to stop an imminent threat to life". 
ACPO policy states that "use" of a firearm includes both pointing it at a person and discharging it (whether accidentally or negligently, or intentionally). As with all use of force in England and Wales, the onus is on the individual officer to justify their actions in court. 
Different police forces use a variety of firearms. Although, for forces in England and Wales, guidance is provided from ACPO and the Home Office decisions on what weapons will be employed by an individual force largely rest with the Chief Constable. 
In Northern Ireland, the PSNI issues all of its police officers with the Glock 17 pistol, and allows its officers to carry their issue sidearm off-duty. 
The national media has criticised the policies of police forces which they have deemed "shoot to kill." Police firearms training teaches the use and discharge of firearms to "remove the threat" rather than to kill.  Following the 11 September 2001 attacks new guidelines were developed for identifying, confronting, and dealing forcefully with terrorist suspects. These guidelines were given the code name "Operation Kratos". 
Sir Ian Blair appeared on television 24 July 2005 to accept responsibility for the error on the part of the Metropolitan Police in shooting Jean Charles de Menezes, mistakenly identified as a suicide bomber three days prior, and to acknowledge and defend the policy, saying that "There is no point in shooting at someone's chest because that is where the bomb is likely to be. There is no point in shooting anywhere else if they fall down and detonate it." 
Wife Wanted is a 1946 American crime film directed by Phil Karlson, and starring Kay Francis, Paul Cavanagh, and Robert Shayne. The film's screenplay was written by Caryl Coleman and Sidney Sutherland, based on the novel Wife Wanted by Robert E. Callahan. 
Carole Raymond (Francis) is a film star whose best years are behind her; so, she decides to buy in a real estate plan with Jeff Caldwell (Cavanagh), who is really running an illegitimate matrimonial service. 
Kay Francis was unhappy with the first script; so, she and director Phil Karlson set about obtaining a re-write, and became a producer on the film. 
Pseudonymization is a data management and de-identification procedure by which personally identifiable information fields within a data record are replaced by one or more artificial identifiers, or pseudonyms. A single pseudonym for each replaced field or collection of replaced fields makes the data record less identifiable while remaining suitable for data analysis and data processing. 
Pseudonymization (or pseudonymisation, the spelling under European guidelines) is one way to comply with the European Union's new General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) demands for secure data storage of personal information. Pseudonymized data can be restored to its original state with the addition of information which then allows individuals to be re-identified, while anonymized data can never be restored to its original state. 
(2) Protects at the record and data set level versus only the field level so that the protection travels wherever the data goes, including when it is in use; and 
(3) Protects against unauthorized re-identification via the Mosaic Effect by generating high entropy (uncertainty) levels by dynamically assigning different tokens at different times for various purposes. 
Before the Schrems II ruling, Pseudonymization was a technique used by security experts or government officials to hide personally identifiable information to maintain data structure and privacy of information. Some common examples of sensitive information include postal code, location of individuals, names of individuals, race and gender, etc. 
After the Schrems II ruling, GDPR-compliant Pseudonymization must satisfy the above-noted elements as an "outcome" versus merely a technique. 
The choice of which data fields are to be pseudonymized is partly subjective. Less selective fields, such as Birth Date or Postal Code are often also included because they are usually available from other sources and therefore make a record easier to identify. Pseudonymizing these less identifying fields removes most of their analytic value and is therefore normally accompanied by the introduction of new derived and less identifying forms, such as year of birth or a larger postal code region. 
Data fields that are less identifying, such as date of attendance, are usually not pseudonymized. It is important to realize that this is because too much statistical utility is lost in doing so, not because the data cannot be identified. For example, given prior knowledge of a few attendance dates it is easy to identify someone's data in a pseudonymized dataset by selecting only those people with that pattern of dates. This is an example of an inference attack. 
The pseudonym allows tracking back of data to its origins, which distinguishes pseudonymization from anonymization, where all person-related data that could allow backtracking has been purged. Pseudonymization is an issue in, for example, patient-related data that has to be passed on securely between clinical centers. 
An example of application of pseudonymization procedure is creation of datasets for de-identification research by replacing identifying words with words from the same category (e.g. replacing a name with a random name from the names dictionary), however, in this case it is in general not possible to track data back to its origins. 
GDPR compliant pseudonymization not only enables greater privacy-respectful use of data in today's "big data" world of data sharing and combining, but it also enables data controllers and processors to reap explicit benefits under the GDPR for correctly pseudonymized data.The benefits of properly pseudonymized data are highlighted in multiple GDPR Articles, including: 
Espino entered the Liga Mexicana de Beisbol in 1962 with the Sultanes de Monterrey (Monterrey Sultans) as an outfielder and right-handed batter. He batted a .358 average with 23 home runs and 12 triples, driving in 105 runs (tying for the league lead) while scoring 106 times. He helped lead Monterrey to a league championship and was named Rookie of the Year. 
In 1963, Espino missed some games due to an injury and his average dipped slightly to .346. In 99 games, he managed to hit 24 home runs and 80 runs batted in. 
In 1965 the Cardinals invited Espino to spring training, but he did not report. Jamie Marshall writes that it was because Espino wanted a "fair share of the sale price." He hit .335 with 17 HR in just 67 games in the Mexican League that year. 
In 1967 and 1968 Espino repeated as batting champ with marks of .379 and .365, respectively. He hit 34 homers, slugged .706 and scored 106 runs in 1967, winning in 1968 his second home run title with 27. His fourth batting title tied Al Pinkston for the Mexican League record. In the late 1960s, the California Angels tried to sign Espino several times without success. 
In 1969, after winning three straight batting titles, Espino's batting average fell to .304. He won another home run crown, leading the league with 37 homers. He also set a new single season record with 125 walks (this record would be broken the following year). 
In 1970, Espino began a slight slump during his prime. He still hit .319, but only 18 home runs. The next year he moved to the Alijadores de Tampico (Tampico Lightermen), and hit .311 with a subpar 20 home runs and 58 RBI. 
In 1972, Espino bounced back to a .356 average and clinched his fourth and final home run title (37). He also scored 101 runs and drove in 101 more, with a league-high 94 walks. In 1973 his average rose again, to .377, good to win his fifth and final Mexican League batting championship. He also drove in 107 runs and hit 22 homers; while it was 15 fewer than his previous season, the 34-year-old slugger would never again hit as many. 
From 1974 through 1980, Espino remained in double digit homers, reaching 20 once, though he remained a .300 hitter through 1980 except for one .297 season. 
In 1975 Espino helped lead Tampico to a Mexican league championship, while setting a league record for the most consecutive hits in 11 straight at-bats. His statistics declined drastically in his early forties, retiring in 1984 at the age of 45. 
Overall, Espino won 13 batting crowns, six home run titles, and six Most Valuable Player awards. He is the only player in LMP history with a career average over .300. The runner up, Matias Carrillo, is 36 points behind Espino. He also played in six Caribbean Series, being named the Most Valuable Player in the 1974 and 1976 editions. In 1996, he gained induction into the Caribbean Baseball Hall of Fame as part of their first class. 
The commission is headquartered at Dholpur House, in New Delhi and functions through its own secretariat. Pradeep Kumar Joshi has been the Chairman of UPSC since August 2020. 
Established on 1 October 1926 as Public Service Commission, it was later reconstituted as Federal Public Service Commission by the Government of India Act 1935; only to be renamed as today's Union Public Service Commission after the independence. 
The Royal Commission on the superior Civil Services in India was set up under the chairmanship of Lord Lee of Fareham by the British Government in 1923. With equal numbers of Indian and British members, the commission submitted its report in 1924, recommending setting up of a Public Service Commission. The Lee Commission proposed that 40% of future entrants should be British, 40% Indians directly recruited, and 20% Indians promoted from the provincial services. 
This led to the establishment of the first Public Service Commission on 1 October 1926 under the chairmanship of Sir Ross Barker. A mere limited advisory function was granted to the Public Service Commission and the leaders of the freedom movement continually stressed on this aspect, which then resulted in the setting up of a Federal Public Service Commission under the Government of India Act 1935. 
The Federal Public Service Commission became the Union Public Service Commission after independence. It was given a constitutional status with under of Constitution of India on 26 January 1950. 
As per Art. 316, the Chairman and other members of Union Public Service Commission shall be appointed by the President. In case the office of the Chairman becomes vacant his duties shall be performed by one of the other members of the Commission as the President may appoint for the purpose. 
As per Art. 317, the Chairman or any other member of a Public Service Commission shall only be removed from their office by order of the President on the ground of "misbehaviour" after the Supreme Court, on reference being made to it by the President, has, on inquiry reported that the Chairman or such other member ought to be removed. The President may suspend the Chairman or other member of the Commission until report of the Supreme Court is received. 
As per Art. 320, it shall be the duty of the Union Public Service Commissions to conduct examinations for appointments to the services of the Union. It shall also assist two or more States, if requested so, in framing and operating schemes of joint recruitment for any services. 
It shall be the duty of a Union Public Service Commission to advise on any matter referred to them; provided that the President has not made any regulations specifying the matters in which it shall not be necessary for Union Public Service Commission to be consulted. 
As per Art. 322, the expenses of the Union Public Service Commission, including any salaries, allowances and pensions payable to or in respect of the members or staff of the Commission, shall be charged on the Consolidated Fund of India. 
As per Art. 321, an Act made by Parliament may provide for the exercise of additional functions by the Union Public Service Commission w.r.t. services of the Union. 
As per Art. 323, it will be the duty of the Union Commission to annually present a report to the President of the work done by the Commission. On receipt of such report, the President shall present a copy before each House of Parliament; together with a memorandum, if any, explaining the reasons where the advice of the Commission was not accepted by him. 
The Commission consists of a chairman and other members appointed by The President of India. Usually, the Commission consists of 9 to 11 members including the chairman. Every member holds office for a term of six years or until he attains the age of sixty-five years, whichever is earlier. 
The terms and conditions of service of chairman and members of the Commission are governed by the Union Public Service Commission (Members) Regulations, 1969. 
The Commission is serviced by a Secretariat headed by a Secretary with four Additional Secretaries, a number of Joint Secretaries, Deputy Secretaries and other supporting staff. The secretariat, for administrative purpose, is further divided into divisions, each undertaking having a specific responsibility: 
Nebria chelmosensis is a species of ground beetle from Nebriinae subfamily that is endemic to Greece. 
He became the curator of the Museums of Le Mans in March 1920 and stayed so until his death in 1930. 
Melaleuca wilsonii, commonly known as Wilson's honey-myrtle or violet honey-myrtle, is a plant in the myrtle family, Myrtaceae, native to parts of South Australia and Victoria. It is a shrub with narrow, pointed leaves and heads of purplish-pink flowers on the sides of the branches. It is adaptable to a wide range of soils, frost hardy and often cultivated. 
This melaleuca occurs from the south-east corner of South Australia to western and central Victoria. It grows in seasonally flooded and poorly drained soils in open scrubland, eucalypt forest and mallee heath. 
This species is often cultivated, thriving in light to heavy soils and preferring a sunny, well-drained position. It is frost- and drought tolerant. It may flower less in humid areas and the flowers that appear wilt quickly. It was brought into cultivation in England in 1874 and is rarely seen in the United States. The flowers attract birds and insects. It is highly regarded as a horticultural subject. Melaleuca wilsonii can be propagated by seed or cutting. 
Hypsioma inornata is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by James Thomson in 1868. It is known from Argentina and Brazil. 
Suq Al Masgouf is an indoor market place in the centre of the city of Samawah in southern Iraq. Dating back to the Ottoman period, the area surrounding the Suq Al Masgouf is the old Byzantine city of other crowded markets and streets. 
This article about a building or structure in Iraq is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Stonestreets Coaches is an Australian bus company operating services in the Dalby, Gladstone, Ipswich and Toowoomba regions in Queensland. Initially a route and school bus operator, it has diversified into providing transport for energy and mining projects and operating tours. 
Stonestreets Coaches was formed when in April 1993 the Stonestreet family purchased the Centenary Heights & Middle Ridge Bus Service in Toowoomba. Expansion came through the purchase of a shareholding in Dunkley's Coaches and a further three school runs from Cambooya, Greenmount and Wyreema. 
In 2006, seven school runs in Dalby were purchased from French's Coaches. Geeford Coaches was also acquired in June 2006. In the next few years a number of other companies and services were acquired including additional Dalby school runs, the Ipswich Grammar and Ipswich Girls Grammar school runs, Aries Tours, the remainder of French's Coaches and Toowoomba Transit Coaches, the latter operating a service to Brisbane. 
A Good Country Mile is a collaboration between Kevn Kinney and The Golden Palominos, released independently on February 21, 2012. 
Bishop was born November 22, 1874, in Grand Rapids, Michigan. Bishop attended the United States Military Academy at West Point, graduating with the class of 1897. 
In 1916, during the Mexican Revolution, Bishop served on the U.S.-Mexico border.  In 1917, attempting to fly as a passenger in an airplane from San Diego, California to Calexico, California, he was forced to land in Mexico and was lost for nine days before being recovered by a search party. 
Following the conclusion of the war, Bishop was made Chief of the Philippine Department. In 1925, he returned to the United States and commanded the 15th Field Artillery at Fort Sam Houston in Texas.  Other appointments included Chief of the Hawaiian Department. While stationed in Hawaii, he commanded the 8th Field Artillery at Schofield Barracks. 
In 1930, Bishop was promoted to Major General and made Chief of Artillery, subordinate only to the Chief of Staff of the United States Army, and relocated to Washington, D.C.. 
Bishop's wife was Ella Van Horn Foulois, who had earlier divorced Maj. Gen. Benjamin Delahauf Foulois, Chief of the Army Air Corps. 
On August 31, 1934, after suffering for a year from painful colitis, Bishop was notified that he was being retired for disability, with the rank of major general. He returned to his residence on 16th Street in Washington, and shot himself in the head.[citation needed] He was buried at Arlington National Cemetery, in Arlington, Virginia. 
As a young man, Bishop wrote several short stories, some of which would now be considered science fiction.  These were: 
The legacy Amy Woodforde-Finden leaves is one of bridging cultures with music and words. She interpreted the sounds and motives of Asian-South Asian music to an American-European audience and transported the listener to a world of romance and the exotic. 
Kashmiri Song and, to a lesser extent, Till I wake were frequently recorded, including by tenor Richard Tauber with Percy Kahn at the piano. Two complete sets of the Four Indian Love Lyrics were made by the English tenor Frank Titterton; and three by the Australian bass-baritone Peter Dawson, in 1923, 1925 and 1932. 
This biographical article relating to New Zealand rugby union, about a person born in the 1870s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
High Season is a 1987 British romantic comedy film directed by Clare Peploe. It is a comedy about tourism, set on the Greek island of Rhodes; vacationers from rich countries taking over the most spectacular scenery at the most desirable times of the year. There are nine principal characters, a mixture of English, Greek, and a Greek-American. It was written by director Clare Peploe with her brother Mark. 
Katherine (Jacqueline Bisset) is an English photographer who, with her husband Patrick (James Fox), came to live at a coastal town on Rhodes before the tourists discovered it. Their thirteen-year-old daughter Chloe (Ruby Baker) grew up there, and even though Kath and Patrick have separated, they have both stayed on. He supports himself through his sculpture pieces, which Kath despises, and she, by her photography books featuring antiquities and peasant life, which he finds fuddy-duddy. 
Kath needs money; her latest book isn't selling. She will be forced to give up her house and leave the island she loves unless she can find a buyer for a vase that was given to her many years earlier by a famous, now elderly art historian, Basil Sharp (Sebastian Shaw), who arrives for a visit. Katherine's  widowed friend Penelope (Irene Papas) regards the tourists as enemies, an army of occupation, and battles with her son Yanni, who appreciates the prosperity the tourists bring. 
Rick (Kenneth Branagh), a practical-minded Englishman, fixes Kath's toilet, and becomes smitten by Kath after she rewards him with a passionate kiss. His wife Carol (Lesley Manville) occupies herself with Byron's poetry and the tourist-loving Yanni. The group is completed by Konstantinis (Robert Stephens), a wealthy Greek-American who wants to buy Kath's vase, but needs it to be declared a fake so that he can take it out of Greece. 
High Season was director Peploe's first major feature film. She had previously made the half-hour short Couples and Robbers.  Married to Italian director Bernardo Bertolucci, she was one of the screenwriters on Michelangelo Antonioni's Zabriskie Point. She was credited as a writer and an assistant director on Bertolucci's La luna. Her brother Mark, with whom she collaborated on the script, previously wrote The Passenger for Antonioni, and the screenplay for The Last Emperor with Bertolucci. 
Behavior trees  are a formal, graphical modelling language used primarily in systems and software engineering. Behavior trees employ a well-defined notation to unambiguously represent the hundreds or even thousands of natural language requirements that are typically used to express the stakeholder needs for a large-scale software-integrated system. 
Single and composite or integrated behavior tree forms are both important in the application of behavior trees in systems and software engineering. 
These genetic parallels, in another context, were originally spelled by Woolfson, (A. Woolfson, Living Without Genes, Flamingo, 2000) 
Probabilistic timed behavior trees have recently been developed by Colvin, Grunske and Winter so that reliability, performance and other dependability properties can be expressed. 
A behavior tree is used to formally represent the fragment of behavior in each individual requirement. Behavior for a large-scale system in general, where concurrency is admitted, appears abstractly as a set of communicating sequential processes. The behavior tree notation captures these composed component-states in a simple tree-like form. 
Behavior is expressed in terms of components realizing states and components creating and breaking relations. Using the logic and graphic forms of conventions found in programming languages, components can support actions, composition, events, control-flow, data-flow, and threads. 
A basis of the notation is that behavior is always associated with some component. Component-states which represent nodes of behavior are composed sequentially or concurrently to construct a behavior tree that represents the behavior expressed in the natural language requirements. A behavior tree with leaf nodes may revert (symbolized by adding the caret operator ^) to an ancestor node to repeat behavior, or start a new thread (symbolized by two carets ^^). 
A behavior tree specifies state changes in components, how data and control is passed between components and how threads interact. There are constructs for creating and breaking relations. There are also constructs for setting and testing states of components as well as mechanisms for inter-process communication that include message passing (events), shared variable blocking and synchronization. 
For a complete reference to behavior tree notation, version 1.0, see: Behavior Tree Notation v1.0 (2007) 
The formal semantics of behavior trees is given via a process algebra and its operational semantics. The semantics has been used as the basis for developing simulation, model checking and failure modes and effects analysis. 
Requirements translation is the vehicle used to cross the informal-formal barrier.  Consider the process of translation for requirement R1 below. The first tasks are to identify the components (bold), identify the behaviors (underline) and identify indicators of the order (italics) in which behaviors take place. The corresponding behavior tree can then be constructed. 
What is clear from the outcome of this process is that apart from pronouns, definite articles, etc., essentially all the words in the sentences that contribute to the behavior they describe have been accounted for and used. 
Once the set of requirements are formalized as individual requirement behavior trees, two joint properties of systems and requirements need to be exploited in order to proceed with composing the integrated behavior tree: 
For requirements represented as behavior trees this amounts to finding where the root node of one tree occurs in some other behavior tree and integrating the two trees at that node. 
The example below illustrates requirements integration for two requirements, R1 and R3. In other words, it shows how these two requirements interact. 
Once an integrated behavior tree has been composed, there are a number of important operations that can be performed upon it. 
A model behavior tree can be readily simulated to explore the dynamic properties of the system. Both a symbolic tool and a graphics tool have been constructed to support these activities. 
A translator has been written to convert a model behavior tree into the "actions systems" language. This input can then be fed into the SAL Model-checker in order to allow checks to be made as to whether certain safety and security properties are satisfied. 
Model-checking has often been applied to system models to check that hazardous states cannot be reached during normal operation of the system. It is possible to combine model-checking with behavior trees to provide automated support for failure mode and effects analysis (FMEA). The advantage of using behavior trees for this purpose is that they allow the formal method aspects of the approach to be hidden from non-expert users. 
The ideal that is sought when responding to a change in the functional requirements for a system is that it can be quickly determined: 
Because a system is likely to undergo many sets of changes over its service time, there is also a need to record, manage and optimize the system's evolution driven by the change sequence. 
Behavior tree models are executed in a virtual machine called the behavior run-time environment (BRE). The BRE links together components using middleware, allowing components to be independent programs written in one of several languages that can be executed in a distributed environment. The BRE also contains an expression parser that automatically performs simple operations to minimize the amount of code required to be manually implemented in the component. 
The implementation of components is supported by views that are automatically extractable from the DBT.  These views provide the component behavior trees (CBTs) of individual components together with the interfaces of individual components. This information, together with the information in the integrated composition tree (ICT) captured about each individual component, provides the information that is needed to implement each individual component. 
Several BRE's can be linked together to form complex systems using a system-of-systems construct and the behavior engineering component integration environment (BECIE). BECIE is also used to monitor and control the behavior tree models being executed within a BRE, similar to supervisory control and data acquisition (SCADA) systems used in industrial process control. 
Executable behavior trees have been developed for case studies including automated train protection, mobile robots with dynamic object following, an ambulatory infusion pump and traffic light management systems. A version of the BRE suited for embedded systems (eBRE) is also available that has reduced functionality to tailor it to small-footprint microcontrollers. 
Behavior tree modelling can and has been applied to a diverse range of applications over a number of years. Some of the main application areas are described below. 
While BTs have become popular for modeling the artificial intelligence in computer games such as Halo and Spore, these types of trees are very different from the ones described on this page, and are closer to a combination of hierarchical finite state machines or decision trees.  Soccer-player modeling has also been a successful application of BTs. 
 is an approach to software testing that requires testers to create test models from requirements of Software Under Test (SUT). Traditionally, UML state charts, FSMs, EFSMs, Flow charts are used as the modeling language. Recently, an interesting approach in which Event-Driven Swim Lane Petri Net (EDSLPN) is used as the modeling language also appears. Behavior tree notation should be considered as a good modeling notation to MBT also, and it has a few advantages among other notations: 
Such an attempt has been made here. The MBTester is composed of a modeler and a test case generation engine. Business owners or testers translate their requirements into behavior trees using the modeler, and then (optionally) integrate a few related behavior trees into a composite one. A behavior tree can be fed into the backend engine to generate test cases, test scripts, and test data automatically. 
As a behavior modelling representation, behavior trees have a number of significant benefits and advantages: 
Liasis mackloti savuensis is a python subspecies found in Indonesia. It is known by the locals as sanca mata putih (white-eyed python). 
In 1898, at the age of 55, Jessop entered Ontario politics, successfully standing as the Conservative candidate for the riding of Lincoln.  This began a twenty-year political career of which twelve were spent as a member of the Legislative Assembly of Ontario. 
Jessop died of heart problems while still in office and is buried at Victoria Lawn Cemetery in St. Catharines. 
This article about a Ontario Progressive Conservative Party MPP is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Takahashi would go on to participate in 16 A-side and 30 B-side songs, as well as a variety of television dramas, movies, variety shows and stage plays in her 7-year tenure. 
On 4 March 2019, Takahashi announced she was graduating from AKB48 in May 2019. In the same report, she revealed she had signed an exclusive contract with the South Korean label Woollim Entertainment, after they e-mailed her. 
On 23 July 2019, Takahashi was announced as a member of Rocket Punch, a new six-member girl group from Woollim. The group debuted on 7 August 2019, with their first extended play (EP) Pink Punch. In 2020, Takahashi ran a series of vlogs on Rocket Punch's YouTube channel titled Juriful Days. 
Epirochroides hovanus is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae, and the only species in the genus Epirochroides. It was described by Fairmaire in 1904. 
Black Point is a locality in the Australian state of South Australia located on the east coast of Yorke Peninsula about 72 kilometres (45 miles) northwest of the state capital of Adelaide. 
Black Point consists of an area of land bounded to the west by the St Vincent Highway and to the east by Gulf St Vincent where the coastline forms a bay gazetted as Port Alfred which faces to the north-east and concludes in the headland gazetted both as Black Point and the Narungga word, Gudliwardi. 
As of 2015, the majority land use within the locality is agriculture.  A secondary land use is conservation which concerns the strip of land immediately adjoining the coastline.  Tertiary uses include the use of land along the Port Alfred coastline for both residential use and short-term tourist accommodation with the latter being provided in the form of a caravan park. 
The 2016 Australian census which was conducted in August 2016 reports that Black Point had a population of 48 people. 
Black Point is located within the federal division of Grey, the state electoral district of Narungga and the local government area of the Yorke Peninsula Council. 
The 2012 CIS football season began on August 31, 2012 with the Saskatchewan Huskies hosting the Alberta Golden Bears at Griffiths Stadium. The season concluded on November 23 in Toronto, Ontario with the 48th Vanier Cup championship, won by the Laval Rouge et Or after they defeated the McMaster Marauders 37-14. This year, 26 university teams in Canada are scheduled to play Canadian Interuniversity Sport football, the highest level of amateur Canadian football. 
Ranks in italics are teams not ranked in the top 10 poll but received votes. NR = Not Ranked, received no votes. Number in parentheses denotes number votes, after the dash number of first place votes. 
This geographical article about a location in Batman Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Microcerculus is a genus of birds in the wren family Troglodytidae that are endemic to Central America and tropical regions of South America. 
These are small wrens with very short tails, long legs and a long bill. They forage on or near the ground in humid forests. 
Calliopsis subalpina is a species of bee in the family Andrenidae. It is found in Central America and North America. 
Van der Merwe was born on 28 February 1922 to Dorslandtrekkers (Afrikaner farmer-settlers) Johannes Marthinus van der Merwe and Catharina Margaretha van der Merwe in Humpata, Angola. Although his parents both came from large families - his father had four siblings and his mother had five siblings - he was an only child. 
In 1928, he and his family moved to what was formerly South-West Africa (now Namibia). It is believed that they travelled by ox-wagon. During his formative years the family moved between present day Outjo and Gobabis and finally settled in Otjiwarongo, where he first attended an actual primary school. He attended secondary school in Windhoek. 
In 1941 he attended the University of Stellenbosch, South Africa on a bursary. After obtaining a BSc in engineering at the University of Stellenbosch, he was persuaded by the head of the applied mathematics department to change to an MSc in applied mathematics, which he completed in 1945. In 1946 he was appointed junior lecturer in the department of applied mathematics. 
Between 1947 and 1949, he did a PhD in theoretical solid state physics at the University of Bristol under Nevill Francis Mott. During his time in Bristol he befriended several people who went on to become noted physicists including C.F. Powell (a Physics Nobel Laureate), Arthur Tyndall and Doris Kuhlmann-Wilsdorf. In late 1949, he returned to the CSIR. 
From 1953 to 1964 he served as senior lecturer and Associate Professor in the physics department at the University of Pretoria. He completed his MSc in Mathematics from the University of Pretoria in 1956. During this period he again worked with a colleague from Bristol, Frank Nabarro who was then head of Physics at the University of the Witwatersrand, South Africa. 
In 1961 he took a sabbatical to the University of Virginia which led to a refinement of his initial model of thickening two-dimensional interfaces in 1963. 
The theory of epitaxy was a major focus of his career and he published many seminal papers, which resulted in him becoming known as the "Father of Epitaxy". With the advance of the semiconductor industry from the 1960s onward, epitaxy became extremely important as it depends on the  growth of perfect single crystals for the manufacturing of transistors and IC circuits. An essential role in understanding how to grow such perfect crystals was provided by his theory. 
In 1965, he was invited by an ex-CSIR colleague, Ernst Marais, to the University of Port Elizabeth where he was appointed head of the applied mathematics department. During this period Van der Merwe was invited to present plenary talks at many international conferences, during which he made enduring friendships with several surface scientists including Ernst G. Bauer of the Technical University of Clausthal-Zellerfeld and Ralf Vanselow of the University of Wisconsin, Milwaukee. 
In 1969 he moved to UNISA where he became Professor of applied mathematics. In 1970 he spent a seven-month sabbatical at the University of Virginia where he collaborated with William A. Jesser. Almost 30 years later, in 1999 he co-authored a paper with Jesser. 
In 1972, he accepted the position of head of the physics department at the University of Pretoria. From this point on he regularly collaborated with Gary Shiflet of the University of Virginia. Almost 20 years later, Shiflet and Van der Merwe co-authored papers on interphase boundaries. 
After his mandatory retirement at age 65, he became Professor Extraordinarius at UNISA from 1990 to 2003, and Honorary Professor in the Department of Physics at University of Pretoria from 2004 to 2016. 
In 1981 and 1989 he was Visiting Professor at the Technical University of Clausthal-Zellerfeld, Germany and Visiting Researcher to Kodak Research Labs, USA in 1981. 
In 2000 a Symposium in honour of Van der Merwe was arranged by the American Society for Metals, Materials and Minerals to celebrate the 50th anniversary of his discovery of Interfacial Dislocations. 
The Materials Research Society published a Focus Issue titled "Jan van der Merwe: Epitaxy and the Computer Age" in November 2017.  
In 1947, just before leaving South Africa for Bristol, he married Minnie de Villiers and they had their honeymoon on the ship to the UK. In late 1949 they returned to Pretoria, South Africa in time for the birth of their first child Pauline (1950). Willem was born in 1954, Jan in 1957 and Anna was adopted in 1957. 
His son Jan died in 1994, his daughter Pauline in 1999 and his wife in 2006. Van der Merwe died on his birthday, 28 February 2016 at the home of his son Willem. 
This article about a location in Doddridge County, West Virginia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2011 FIBA U16 European Championship Division C was held in Serravalle, San Marino, from 12 to 17 July 2011. Six teams participated in the competition. 
During his early years, Dadashov played at the football academies of SV Wehen Wiesbaden, Eintracht Frankfurt and RB Leipzig. 
On 19 May 2017, Dadashov signed a three-year contract with Bundesliga side Eintracht Frankfurt. He scored 14 goals and 9 assists in 22 matches for Eintracht Frankfurt U-19 in the Under 19 Bundesliga. 
Born in Germany to a Lezgin family from Azerbaijan, Renat was eligible to play for both countries. He played for the Azerbaijani U-16 team during the summer of 2014. He was later invited to the German U-16 where he scored 4 goals in 6 games. On 9 September 2015, Dadashov debuted for German U-17 team and played 15 matches with 13 goals during the next year. He reached the semifinals of the 2016 UEFA European Under-17 Championship with the German team. 
In early 2017, it was announced that Renat will represent the Azerbaijani national team. He made his senior international debut on 5 September, against San Marino in 2018 FIFA World Cup qualification. 
On 18 February 2020, Dadashov signed a sponsorship deal with German sportswear and equipment supplier, Adidas. 
USS George W. Rodgers (1861) was a schooner captured  by the Union Navy during the American Civil War. She was initially intended to be used as part of the stone fleet of sunken obstructions; however, she was retained and used as a picket boat and dispatch vessel and, later, as a survey ship, concentrating her efforts in the waterways of the Confederate South. 
George W. Rodgers, originally blockade runner Shark, was captured by the screw steamer South Carolina off Galveston, Texas, 4 July 1861 and sent to the U.S. East Coast.  
Later chartered by the Union Navy under a civilian master, Shark served during 1862 and 1863 as a dispatch ship with the South Atlantic Blockading Squadron until taken over by the Union Navy off Charleston, South Carolina, 5 September 1863 by order of Admiral John A. Dahlgren.  
Although Shark was purchased to be sunken obstruction at Charleston, she was retained. Renamed George W. Rodgers, she sailed to Port Royal, South Carolina, for arming and repairs, and commissioned there 17 January 1865, Acting Master Loring G. Emerson in command. 
During the remainder of the war, George W. Rodgers served as a picket boat along the coast of Georgia in Wassaw Sound and in Ossabaw Sound and on the Vernon and Great Ogeechee Rivers.  
Occasionally used for special dispatch service, between February and May she joined Coast Survey steamer Bibb on an important coastal survey in the sounds and rivers of the Georgia coast. She resumed picket duty 2 May and operated along the Georgia and Florida coasts until departing Ossabaw Sound for Boston, Massachusetts, 25 July.  
She arrived Boston Navy Yard 7 August; decommissioned 16 August; and was sold to C. H. Miller by public auction 8 September. 
This article incorporates text from the public domain Dictionary of American Naval Fighting Ships. The entry can be found here. 
Edward Vilga (born Manchester, Connecticut) is an American wellness authority and author of books, plays, and films. His work is often themed around transformation, connections between spirituality and wealth, and the power of forgiveness and stems from his experiences as an American yoga teacher. Edward Vilga graduated from Yale University after majoring in English Literature. 
He also wrote Acting Now: Conversations on Craft and Career (Rutgers University Press; 1997), a collection of interviews. 
His book The Yoga of Money Manifesto was released by Stone Heap Publishing in March 2017 and hit #1 for all of New Thought. 
The play was also featured at the United Nations in a special performance for the 25th Commemoration of the 1994 genocide against the Tutsi in Rwanda. 
Vilga wrote and directed the feature film "Dead Broke" (Warner Brothers DVD, 2006). It won several best direct-to-DVD awards and on May 3, 1999 in a joint venture with the TriBeCa Film Center, Microsoft and ifilm.com, became the first film to debut simultaneously on the Internet and the big screen. 
Edward Vilga is the creator of six bestselling courses on DailyOM, particularly "A Year to Get Rich With Purpose" that currently has over 30,000 students enrolled. 
Indigo Grey: The Passage  is a 2015 American science fiction film directed by Sean Robinson and written and produced by Jason Oremus and Garrett Coleman.  It features Aidan Lok, neo-Irish dance troupe Hammerstep, and has received international attention for its soundtrack composed by Amy Lee, Dave Eggar and Chuck Palmer. 
Out Magazine announced on January 8, 2016 that the film would be premiering at the Film Society of Lincoln Center. IrishCentral reviewed the film January 14, 2016 "Brilliant short film combines Irish dance and martial arts"  
This property is part of the land originally granted to Robert Campbell senior by Crown grant under the hand of Sir Richard Bourke, formerly Governor of the Colony in 1834. Robert Campbell's will gave to each of his sons and daughters one sixth of his property. 
In December 1900 the Observatory Hill Resumption Act was gazetted and the Perpetual Trustee Company Ltd. released the property to the King and the Minister for Public Works in May 1903. In 1910 the Central City Mission used No. 41 George Street. 
From 1969 No. 35 was occupied by Nita McRae, one of the founders of the Rocks Residents' Group and Green Bans activist. Much of the background work to coordinate the residents' action to save The Rocks community took place in this house. A plaque was placed in her memory in 1996. 
Tenders were called in the early 1980s for the lease of the buildings for their current use of shops and offices. In June 1982 the Sydney Cove Redevelopment Authority (SCRA) issued an invitation to tender for lease and establishment of a medical centre at No. 37-39 George Street. 
The name of the buildings, 'Sergeant Major's Row', appears to have been adopted by SCRA as a reminder for an early term for George Street, though this related more specifically the northern end of the street. In the early 1800s it was also known as "High Street", becoming "George Street" in 1810 after the then reigning monarch, King George III. 
The name given the buildings by SCRA is a reminder of an early term for George Street which was begun as a track for water carriers carrying water from the Tank Stream to the marine encampment and the hospital - its original name was Spring Row. Then it was humorously altered unofficially to Sergeant-Major's Row, then officially to High Street by Governor King and finally to George Street by Governor Macquarie. 
Style: Victorian Filigree; Storeys: Two; Facade: Stone and Brick; Roof Cladding: Galvanised Iron; Floor Frame: Timber. 
As at 3 May 2001, Archaeology Assessment Condition: Partly disturbed. Assessment Basis: Floors level with George Street. Stone quarried out at rear. 
As at 26 June 2002, Sergeant Major's Row, a grouping of five terrace buildings located at 33-41 George Street and site is of State heritage significance for its historical, aesthetic and scientific values. The site and buildings are also of State heritage significance for their contribution to The Rocks area, which is of State heritage significance in its own right. 
Originally constructed as a speculative type development, the terraces have been occupied by a number of occupants and tenants as residences and later as commercial premises which generally reflects the growth and development of The Rocks. They are significant for their association with Robert Campbell, Edward Stanley Ebsworth and Nita McCrae who all had significant impact in the local area. 
Sergeant Major's Row was listed on the New South Wales State Heritage Register on 10 May 2002 having satisfied the following criteria. 
The place is important in demonstrating the course, or pattern, of cultural or natural history in New South Wales. 
The terraces are historically significant as they are representative the late nineteenth century development in The Rocks. Constructed in 1881 as residences by a local merchant, Edward Stanley Ebsworth, they were intermittently used as boarding houses and then commercial, retail and office spaces from the late 1970s which is reflective of a shift and changing nature, growth and development of the area. 
The place has a strong or special association with a person, or group of persons, of importance of cultural or natural history of New South Wales's history. 
Sergeant Major's Row is significant for its associations with Robert Campbell, to whom the land was first granted, with Walter Stanley Ebsworth, a prominent merchant and industrialist, and with Nita McRae, a founder of The Rocks Residents' Group and a Green Bans activist. 
The place is important in demonstrating aesthetic characteristics and/or a high degree of creative or technical achievement in New South Wales. 
The place has a strong or special association with a particular community or cultural group in New South Wales for social, cultural or spiritual reasons. 
The terraces have generally been occupied by a number of other individuals since construction and businesses from the late 1970s. The terraces have some association with The Rocks Residents' Group and Green Bans group through Nita McCrae who occupied No. 35 George Street during the 1970s. No. 39 was also occupied by the Nature Conservation Council during the 1980s. 37 & 39 also provided medical services to The Rocks community during this period. A Doctors' practice remains at No. 37. 
The place has potential to yield information that will contribute to an understanding of the cultural or natural history of New South Wales. 
The terraces clearly demonstrate and retain planning of a late Victorian residence and way of life of that period. The site, which retains the stone cut along its western boundary, that it would appear was quarried at some stage, emphasises and is a reminder of the early form and topography of The Rocks and modifications that were undertaken during its growth and development. 
The place possesses uncommon, rare or endangered aspects of the cultural or natural history of New South Wales. 
The terraces located at 33-41 George Street are good and intact representative examples of late Victorian terraces that generally retain their fundamental character and detail, however have been adapted which reflects the general shift and growth of The Rocks area. 
The place is important in demonstrating the principal characteristics of a class of cultural or natural places/environments in New South Wales. 
The terraces demonstrate the typical design characteristic of the "standard" terrace type that is not rare or uncommon in The Rocks or the wider context with a number of similarly scaled and styled buildings located throughout the inner suburbs of Sydney. 
 This Wikipedia article was originally based on Sergeant Majors Row (terrace), entry number 1579 in the New South Wales State Heritage Register published by the State of New South Wales and Office of Environment and Heritage 2018 under CC-BY 4.0 licence, accessed on 14 October 2018. 
Nashik East Vidhan Sabha constituency is one of the 288 Vidhan Sabha (legislative assembly) constituencies of Maharashtra state, western India. This constituency is located in Nashik district. It is one of the six assembly segments under Nashik (Lok Sabha constituency).  
The constituency comprises parts of Nashik taluka viz. the following wards of Nashik Municipal Corporation - 1 to 10, 14, 16, 30 to 35, 40 to 42 and 67 to 70.  
This biographical article related to an Indian cricket person born in 1999 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Melaleuca eleuterostachya is a plant in the myrtle family, Myrtaceae and is endemic to Western Australia and South Australia. It is a shrub or tree with arching branches, narrow leaves and small spikes of cream or white flowers. 
Melaleuca eleuterostachya was first formally described in 1886 by Ferdinand von Mueller in Fragmenta Phytographiae Australiae. The specific epithet (eleuterostachya) is from the ancient Greek eleutheros meaning "free" and stachys, "spike", referring to the way the flower spikes appear on the sides of the branches below the leaves. 
Melaleuca eleuterostachya occurs in central-southern South Australia and is most common in the Eyre Peninsula. It is widespread in Western Australia, especially the central and southern areas and in a broad band between Geraldton and Albany. It grows in sandy or clayey soils, on plains, low hills and wet depressions. 
Melaleuca diosmifolia is listed as "not threatened" by the Government of Western Australia Department of Parks and Wildlife. 
Wang Su-bak, the eldest daughter of the Wang family, had married into a wealthy family, but after her husband Go Min-joong goes bankrupt, she and her family have to move back into her parents' home. 
Second daughter Ho-bak is also having financial difficulties with her jobless husband Heo Se-dal, while third daughter Gwang-bak suddenly decides to quit her stable job as a teacher to pursue her dream of becoming a writer. 
The Wang family must now face a number of challenges in Korean society, such as elitism, discrimination, the power dynamics between husband & wife and between parent & child, and the decision when to marry & have a child. 
Manuel Gomes (born 12 August 1966) is an Angolan boxer. He competed in the men's bantamweight event at the 1988 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to an Angolan boxer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Filodrillia is a genus of sea snails, marine gastropod mollusks in the family Borsoniidae, the cone snails and their allies. 
Filodrillia is a genus from deep water which resembles Etrema in the form of the sinus, but not of the protoconch, but differs in the thin slender shell, turreted whorls, absence of ribs and varix. The spiral sculpture predominates. 
This marine genus is endemic to Australia and occurs off New South Wales, South Australia, Tasmania and Victoria. 
He won 11 Bengal Film Journalists' Association Awards for the last three films. He made a documentary on the rebel poet Kazi Nazrul Islam, produced by the Ministry of External Affairs, Government of India and was inaugurated by the then External Affairs minister, Pranab Mukherjee at a function at Habitat Centre, New Delhi. 
Anjan Das' trademark was that all his films were based on literature. Three of his films are based on eminent poet Joy Goswami's novels. All his films are labelled as lyrical and poetic. 
DC Universe launched in the U.S. on September 15, 2018, and was available on iOS, Android, Roku, Apple TV, Android TV, Amazon Fire TV, and Xbox One in addition to web and mobile web access. Each subscription to DC Universe could be used on two devices at a time. Pre-orders for the streaming service became available starting on July 19, while an early beta-version was made available to select users in August. Live-action series were streamed in 4K Ultra HD HDR. 
DC Universe was only available in the United States. At Fan Expo Canada 2018, DC editor Dan DiDio claimed the service was being beta tested in Canada with plans to launch at an unspecified date. Meanwhile, several original shows from the service were acquired by Corus Entertainment (for broadcast on its Teletoon, Adult Swim, and Showcase cable networks), while Doom Patrol was acquired by Bell Media for its CTV Sci-Fi Channel. Titans was distributed internationally on Netflix. 
According to the 2002 Poland census, there were 312 people residing in Sufczyce village, of whom 52.6% were male and 47.4% were female. In the village, the population was spread out, with 25.3% under the age of 18, 35.3% from 18 to 44, 17.3% from 45 to 64, and 21.2% who were 65 years of age or older. 
This article related to the geography of County Laois, Ireland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A chambon is a piece of horse tack. It is a strap that runs forward from the bottom of the girth or surcingle, and forks.  The forks continue to a ring on either side of the bridle or halter, at the base of the crownpiece. Running through those rings, the forks follow the cheekpieces to the bit.  They may attach to the bit or pass through the bit rings and attach to themselves below the horse's neck. 
If a horse is not lunged properly, he may begin to go on his forehand. Chambons can also cause sore neck muscles if overused. 
Loricula is a genus of minute bladder bugs in the family Microphysidae. There are more than 20 described species in Loricula. 
Jacques Plumain (born August 14, 1973), known as The Ghost of Kehl, is a French serial killer who claimed four victims (including one who escaped) in France and Germany between October 1999 and May 2000. Plumain was sentenced in France on June 3, 2005 to 30 years of imprisonment; however, there was an appeal of the decision and Plumain was sentenced a second time to life imprisonment with a security sentence of 20 years. 
In January 2001, Plumain was arrested for assaulting a motorist with a katana. He claims he had an account to settle with the motorist with whom he violently disputed a few months earlier. 
During his interrogation on the crimes Plumain quite quickly confessed and told at the same time that on the evening of Brelowski's murder he went out to kill because he felt impulses which grew stronger and stronger. Moreover, he admitted that he never wanted to kill Barbel Zobel but that he had attacked her because he was stealing bicycle tires and that she surprised him. On the other hand, he denies any involvement in the murder of Hatice Celik. 
In September 2003, the trial of Jacques Plumain began at a cour d'assises of Bas-Rhin in Strasbourg, for the attempted murder of the motorist in 2001. He was sentenced to 12 years in prison. 
On May 18, 2005, the trial of Jacques Plumain for murders began at the cour d'assises of Bas-Rhin. The defense of Plumain was provided by Emmanuel Karm and Jean Guibert. Gioia Zirone was the lawyer of Barbel Zobel, Thomas Mutter was the lawyer of Marc Fisher, the former companion of Ursula Brelowski and Brice Raymondeau-Castanet was the general counsel. 
On June 3, 2005, Jacques Plumain was sentenced to 30 years' imprisonment with a 20-year prison sentence. He was acquitted of Celik's murder. The prosecution appealed the decision. 
On March 27, 2006, the appeal process for Plumain began at a cour d'assises at Bas-Rhin court in Colmar. 
On April 12, 2006, Plumain was re-sentenced to life imprisonment with a 20-year sentence of imprisonment. 
In 1848, Hermann Schlegel named the Calabar "python", Calabaria reinhardtii, in his honor. Reinhardt's caecilian, Mimosiphonops reinhardti, was named for him in 1992, more than 100 years after he had collected the holotype. 
Oblique Landsat image of Tabun-Khara-Obo crater draped over digital elevation model (x5 vertical exaggeration); screen capture from NASA World Wind. 
The Long Road is the fourth studio album by Canadian rock band Nickelback, released on September 23, 2003. The album was recorded at famed Greenhouse Studios in Vancouver, British Columbia. It is the band's last album with Ryan Vikedal as drummer, The album features a notable change in style towards more aggressive riffs and double bass drumming. 
Country music singer Travis Tritt released a cover version of the track "Should've Listened" on his 2007 album The Storm. 
 All lyrics are written by Chad Kroeger except where noted; all music is composed by Nickelback except where noted.
This Blagoevgrad Province, Bulgaria location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Packera castoreus is a rare species of flowering plant in the aster family known by the common names Beaver Mountain groundsel and Beaver Mountain ragwort. It is endemic to Utah in the United States, where it occurs only in the Tushar Mountains. 
This small alpine plant grows just a few centimeters tall with one or more woolly stems. The lower leaves have blades one or two centimeters long with woolly undersides. The flower heads have purple-green, woolly  phyllaries and no ray florets. 
There are about 7 to 10 known occurrences of this plant on the high slopes of the Tushar Mountains of central Utah, mostly within the Fishlake National Forest. It occurs on Mt. Belknap and Gold Mountain, and probably other peaks. It grows on barren talus on windy, exposed mountain slopes in alpine tundra habitat above the tree line. Other plants in the sparsely vegetated habitat include sky pilot (Polemonium viscosum), Mt. Belknap draba (Draba ramulosa), and various grasses. 
 Museum of Art of the Parliament of Itapevi 'Emanuel von Lauenstein Massarani' (Museu de Arte do Parlamento de Itapevi 'Emanuel von Lauenstein Massarani'), is a contemporary art museum housed in the Parliament of Itapevi. The Palace is located in Nord-Est of the city.   
Founded in August 2019, the museum was named after Emanuel von Lauenstein Massarani, Brazilian journalist, art critic, diplomatic, writer, historian, museologist. The Museum was created for disseminating the cultural heritage of the Municipality of Itapevi. It is managed by the 'Escola do Parlamento de Itapevi, Doutor Osmar de Souza'. 
The museum collects paintings, sculptures, photographs and prints. The collection include an important contemporary art collection and a 'Outdoor Sculptures Collection' (Esculturas ao Ar Livre). The museum preserves, among others, works by Iwao Nakajima, Joseph Pace, Giuseppe Ranzini, Carlos Araujo.  
Sergio Rouco is an assistant coach for the Samford University men's basketball team. He is also the former head men's basketball coach at Florida International University in Miami, Florida. 
In his first season with Ole Miss, Rouco helped the Rebels win 20 games and earn an NIT bid. Long known for his ability to coach defense, Ole Miss became one of the SEC's stingiest squads in 2011-12, ranking third in the league in field-goal percentage defense (.405), while Buckner was named to the SEC All-Defensive Team. 
Prior to Ole Miss, Rouco was the head coach at FIU in his hometown of Miami, Fla. and led the Panthers to a 55-94 overall record. In his first season at the helm, Rouco guided FIU to the semifinal game of the Sun Belt Conference Championships, the longest postseason run for the program since 1998. He mentored four players to All-Sun Belt Conference status, including two-time honorees Ivan Almonte and Alex Galindo. Freddy Asprilla was the 2009 SBC Freshman of the Year. 
Rouco began his college coaching career as an assistant at FIU from 1987-91, including one season under former Ole Miss head coach Bob Weltlich. Rouco returned to FIU as an assistant from 2000-03 before being hired by Billy Gillispie as an assistant at UTEP for the 2003-04 season. 
Rouco was credited for much of the team's success in his one season at UTEP, which saw the Miners win 24 games and advance to the NCAA Tournament. 
Born in Cuba and raised in Miami, Fla., Rouco found much success as a high school coach in his hometown, with head coaching stops at Loyola (1986-87) and Miami Norland (1991-95). He directed Loyola to a school-record 22 wins in 1986, while he led Miami Norland to 29 wins and a No. 1 state ranking for a portion of the 1994-95 season. 
He boasts head coaching experience at the professional level for Club Mauricio Baez (1995) and Los Minas (1996) in the Dominican Republic, helping both squads reach the semifinals of the playoffs. In 1996-97, he was the head coach of the Trotamundos de Carabobo in Venezuela, and he returned to that country in 2010 to coach the Marinos de Anzoategui. 
He also spent three years as an associate director at the Boys & Girls Club of Miami, where his duties included supervising athletic programs, 30 employees and 8,000 youth, as well as spearheading fund-raising efforts and payroll budgeting. 
A 1987 graduate of Nova Southeastern with an education degree, Rouco and his wife, Kelly, have two sons - Sergio Alessandro and Fabian. 
This biographical article relating to a Cuban basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Daren O'Leary (born 27 June 1973 in Harold Wood, England) was a rugby union player who represented Saracens, Harlequins, Gloucester, Worcester and Moseley.  Now retired, he is a professional rugby union agent with Top Marque Sports. 
Whilst at Gloucester he started in the 2002 Zurich Championship Final (the year before winning the play-offs constituted winning the English title) in which Gloucester defeated Bristol. 
O'Leary was part of the senior England squad for the 1993 Five Nations Championship and the 1997 England rugby union tour of Argentina and Australia, but was ultimately never capped at that level. 
Lecithocera baeopis is a moth in the family Lecithoceridae. It was described by Edward Meyrick in 1929. It is found in Assam, India. 
The draw for this round took place on 13 August 2018. 12 teams out of the original 53 did not participate in the draw. The majority of the games were held on 26 August 2018, with the exception of matches 12 and 16, which will take place on 2 September. 
The draw for this round took place on 27 August 2018. All Games were held between 5-12 September 2018. 
AO Kardia, Apollon Paralimnio, Aris Avato, Niki Volos, Tilikratis, O.F. Ierapetra, Ermionida, Korinthos 2006, Thyella Kamari, Ethnikos Piraeus and PAS Cithaeron Kaparelli advanced on walkover. 
The draw for the group stage was held on 18 September 2018, 12:00 EEST, at the headquarters of the Hellenic Football Federation in Goudi, Athens. The 32 teams were drawn into eight groups of four. For the draw, the teams were seeded into four pots based on the following principles: 
Teams in each group will play one another in a round-robin basis, with the top two teams of each group advancing to the knockout stage. Match-day 1 matches will be held between 25-27 September, Match-day 2 matches will be held between 30 October and 1 November, while Match-day 3 will be held between 4-6 December 2018. 
In the knockout phase, teams play against each other over two legs on a home-and-away basis, except for the one-match final.The mechanism of the draws for each round is as follows: 
The Fund was constituted at Toynbee Hall on 19 September 1982. Trustees were: Mrs Ann Crisp, wife of Toynbee Hall Deputy Warden, John Crisp; Mr John Crisp, Mrs Freny Kapadia (Toynbee Hall Resident); Mr Robert (Bob) Le Vaillant (Toynbee Hall Resident); and Mr Derek Noblett (Police Constable, H District Metropolitan Police Youth & Community Section). 
In 1986 on Bob Le Vaillant's retirement from the Forces and with a pledge by British Petroleum (BP) of salary funding for a Director, Toynbee Hall appointed Bob Le Vaillant to set up and run a Children's Department. The department effectively absorbed Stepney Children's Fund work but nevertheless continued using the Fund's name as it was well-established and respected especially in areas of the countryside where 'Stepney' children camped or were sent on holidays. 
In 2000, Bob and his wife were in the process of adopting 3 children. Bob retired from Toynbee Hall in 2005 and moved with his family to Kent. The final edition of Stepney Children's Fund Annual Report "Who Cares?" was published in the Winter of 2002. 
His first major title came in 2009, winning the Spanish GT Championship along with fellow Portuguese driver Ricardo Bravo. 
This biographical article related to Portuguese auto racing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The women's kumite 68 kilograms competition at the 2018 Asian Games took place on 27 August 2018 at Jakarta Convention Center Plenary Hall, Jakarta, Indonesia. 
That is, the first row is constructed of the polynomial coefficients in order, and the second row is the first row in reverse order and conjugated. 
The third row of the table is calculated by subtracting        a  n    a  0       {\displaystyle {\frac {a_{n}}{a_{0}}}}   times the second row from the first row, and the fourth row is the third row with the first n elements reversed (as the final element is zero). 
The expansion of the table is continued in this manner until a row containing only one non-zero element is reached. 
If       a  0    > 0   {\displaystyle {a_{0}}>0}   then for every value of      a  0   ,  b  0   ,  c  0     {\displaystyle a_{0},b_{0},c_{0}}  ... that is negative, the polynomial has one root outside of the unit disc.  This implies that the method can be stopped after the first negative value is found when checking for stability. 
This method is very easy to implement using dynamic arrays on a computer. It also tells whether all the modulus of the roots (complex and real) lie inside the unit disc. The vector v contains the real coefficients of the original polynomial in the order from highest degree to lowest degree. 
Sasneham is a Malayalam television soap opera launched on 8 June 2021 in Malayalam entertainment Channel Asianet and also streaming on Disney+Hotstar, starring Rekha Ratheesh and KPAC Saji in lead roles. This series focusses on trials and tribulations of older generation who are thrown into Old age homes. 
Asianet Serial Sasneham depicts the story of Indira and Balachandran, past lovers, they reunited in an old age home. They two are neglected by their own family. After meeting Maduri and Nandan their life get a new dimension and meaning. 
Tettenhall Regis is a ward of Wolverhampton City Council, West Midlands. The population of this ward at the 2011 census was 11,911. 
The modern ward of Tettenhall Regis is one of two covering the Tettenhall area, the other being Tettenhall Wightwick. It is situated on the western edge of the city, bordering South Staffordshire and the Oxley, St Peter's, Park and Tettenhall Wightwick wards. It forms part of the Wolverhampton South West constituency. 
Historically, Tettenhall parish was divided into two manors, Tettenhall Regis ("Tettenhall of the king") and Tettenhall Clericorum ("Tettenhall of the clergy"). Likewise, the smaller prebend of Tettenhall was divided into two constablewicks called Tettenhall Regis and Tettenhall Clericorum. 
The A41 runs through the western area of the ward, this section of A41 "Holyhead Road" was designed by Thomas Telford who organised blasting through Tettenhall Rock. Adjacent to the A41 is Tettenhall Green which was gifted to Tettenhall Parish Council by a Miss Jenks, the Green contains Tettenhall pool (a well known local paddling pool). Adjacent to Tettenhall Green is Wolverhampton Cricket Club and also nearby is the South Staffordshire Golf Club. 
During her school years, she played volleyball. At the age of 17, she assisted with her sister their father in a football match as referee. And one year later, she assisted her later husband in a match. 
Born at Strathardle, Atholl, he was the son of Patrick Small of Leanoch in Glen Shee, Scotland and Magdalen Robertson, daughter of Alexander Robertson, 5th Laird of Straloch, Perthshire. His brothers were Alexander Small, who became an army surgeon, and James Small, who was a factor. 
John Small was a first cousin and close friend of John Robertson Reid, who became a general in the British Army. His niece, Magdalen (Small) MacDonald, was the mother of John MacDonald of Garth and Mrs. William McGillivray.  John Small and his relatives were members of the Smalls of Dirnanean, and are also related to the Small-Kiers of Kindrogan House. 
At an early age Small's family purchased a commission for him to enter the Scots Brigade, and he served with them in the Netherlands. He was promoted to 2nd lieutenant in the Earl of Drumlanrig's Regiment when it was raised for service of the States General in 1747. In 1756, Small obtained a commission in the British Army, becoming a lieutenant in the Black Watch just before its departure for North America to fight in the Seven Years' War. 
Lieutenant Small went to North America to fight for Great Britain against French Canadian forces in the Seven Years' War. On that front, the war became known to the colonists of the Thirteen Colonies as the French and Indian War, referring to France and its Native American allies. Small fought at the Battle of Fort Oswego in New York. Two years later, in 1758, he fought at the Battle of Ticonderoga, also in New York, under General James Abercrombie. 
It may have been during the interval between the Seven Years' War and the American Revolution that Small began to acquire his estate, Selmah Hall, in Nova Scotia. He later bequeathed part of it to his first cousin, friend, and heir General John Robertson Reid. During this period, Small became interested in local politics and formed friendships with several influential Anglo-American politicians. 
In 1765, Captain Small was placed in command of a company of the 21st Regiment of Foot, serving with them throughout the American Revolution. In 1775, he received an unofficial assignment from General Gage. Promoted to the rank of major, Small was sent to Nova Scotia to raise at his own expense the Young Royal Highlanders Regiment. This regiment was afterwards amalgamated into the 84th Regiment of Foot (Royal Highland Emigrants). 
Small spent the most part of his time in New York on staff duty. Small was commander of the 84th Regiment of Foot (Royal Highland Emigrants), 2nd Battalion. 
In describing the painting for a catalogue of his works, Trumbull explained why he chose to emphasize Major Small's role. He said that Small, whom he had met in London, "was equally distinguished by acts of humanity and kindness to his enemies, as by bravery and fidelity to the cause he served." 
In 1793, Small was appointed as Lieutenant Governor of Guernsey and received his final promotion to major general. He died on Guernsey three years later, on 17 March 1796. He is buried within Saint Peter Port Church. 
Small never married. At his death, his principal heir was his first cousin and good friend, John Robertson Reid. He left a valuable estate of four or five thousand acres in Nova Scotia to the general. 
Shortly before her death, Saboeut was interviewed extensively for the 2015 documentary film on the history of Cambodian rock music, Don't Think I've Forgotten, in which her sister Sothea is profiled in detail. Saboeut died of complications from a fall at age 72 on March 5, 2014. She is survived by her daughter, her three grandchildren, and her last living sibling Ros Sabeoun. 
Born in Brookings, South Dakota, Lindahl served in the United States Army Air Forces during World War II. Lindahl received his bachelor's degree from University of Minnesota and taught science. He was also involved in the teachers union. Lindahl served in the Minnesota House of Representatives from 1965 to 1971 from Saint Paul, Minnesota and was involved in the Democratic Party. 
This is an overview of the geological subdivisions of the Romanian section of the Carpathian Mountains. The broadest divisions are shown in the map on the right. The last level of the division, i.e. the actual mountain ranges and basins, is usually called "units". The lowest-level detail for those units is maintained on separate pages. 
Traditional Romanian naming conventions differ from this list.  In Romania, it is usual to divide the Eastern Carpathians in Romanian territory into three geographical groups (North, Centre, South), instead in Outer and Inner Eastern Carpathians. 
The Transylvanian Plateau is encircled by, and geologically a part of, the Carpathians, but it is not a mountainous region and its inclusion is disputed in some sources. Its features are included below.   
The Outer Carpathian Depressions lay outside the broad arc of the entire formation and are usually listed as part of the individual divisions of the Carpathian Mountains, i.e. of Western Carpathians, Eastern Carpathians etc. 
The Romanian Carpathians chain is classified, according to the geomorphological and geological differences, into three major morphotectonic units: 
The Eastern Carpathians are divided into three geographical groups; the Romanian approach is shown by adding the following abbreviations to the names of units within Romania: 
Muhammad Nur Aiman Bin Rosli (born 22 March 1999) is a Malaysian professional racing cyclist, who currently rides for UCI Continental team Team Sapura Cycling. 
This biographical article relating to Malaysian cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Reagon was born in Nashville, Tennessee, and was named for Cordell Hull, the Secretary of State under President Franklin D. Roosevelt from 1933 to 1944.  Reagon's powerful tenor voice spread the message of the civil rights movement throughout the United States and Canada in the 1960s. 
Reagon was 16 years of age in 1959 when he emerged as a leader of the civil rights movement in Albany, Georgia. James Forman, who became the executive secretary of SNCC, called him "the baby of the movement." Reagon, who was arrested more than thirty times in the South for his anti-segregation activities, conducted nonviolent training workshops for hundreds of volunteers who journeyed to the South to work on voter registration campaigns and other civil rights projects. 
Cordell Reagon remained an activist until his 1996 death at age 53 in his Berkeley, California, apartment, the victim of a still-unsolved homicide. 
 defaults is a command line utility that manipulates plist files. Introduced in 1998 OPENSTEP, defaults is found in the system's descendants macOS and GNUstep. 
defaults is also able to read and write any plist specified with a path, although Apple plans to phase out this utility in a future version. 
DOMAIN should be replaced by the plist file name sans extension ('.plist'). plist files are named with reverse domain name notation. For example: 
plist files store keys and values. The PROPERTY_NAME key is the name of the property to modify. For example, to remove the search field from Safari's address bar: 
defaults prints values in the OpenStep format. It allows the VALUE to be arrays and dicts, as long as they conform to old-style plist syntax. 
SS64 documents a set of other keys that can be changed for each software (not the global domain) in macOS. Other sites also document settings to be changed using defaults. Apple does not publish a complete list of these "secret knobs", but their support site does occasionally provide defaults commands for user to change a certain setting, such as the creation of .DS_Store. 
GNUstep documents its defaults more clearly, so that there is no such thing as a "hidden settings" community like there is for macOS. 
 Saint FM 94.7 was a radio station serving the South Atlantic island of Saint Helena. The station's studios and administration offices were located at Association Hall, Main Street, Jamestown. It was the only independent radio station broadcasting on Saint Helena, and was also the island's only FM station. 
The station also broadcast via the Internet and was relayed by stations in Ascension Island and the Falkland Islands. The organisation also produces a weekly newspaper, the St Helena Independent which continues despite the closure of SaintFM. 
The radio channels vacated by Saint FM have been taken over by Saint FM Community Radio. Also Saint Fm 94.7 closed down on 31 April 2018 at midnight. 
Saint FM was started by Johnny Drummond, whose bequest provided the initial funding for the station. Talks about the new station began in August 2003 between Drummond and the current station manager of Saint FM, Mike Olsson. Negotiations started soon afterwards and the broadcasting licence was issued on 22 July 2004. 
The station commenced test transmissions on the Internet on 28 September 2004, and on FM via a temporary aerial on 27 September 2004. 
After three months of test transmissions Saint FM officially opened with scheduled broadcasts on 3 January 2005. 
The decision was taken earlier today [Wednesday] to close Saint FM permanently at 4:00pm this coming Friday, 21 December. 
Unlike the weekly Independent newspaper Saint FM broadcasts 24 hours a day, seven days a week and relies on a minimum number of paid staff and a lot of goodwill from volunteers, the public, the government and other business interests to keep going. It has become increasingly difficult to continue broadcasting as relations and co-operation with government have worsened in recent months and weeks. 
Mike Olsson said it is the total effect of the continual and increasing number of obstacles and awkwardness put in the path of the daily job and increasing the workload which makes you wonder if all the hours needed to keep a private sector radio station on the air can be sustained. 
SaintFM closed down at 4p.m. on 21 December 2012.  After a brief speech from the station's owner, Mikael Olsson, the final record played was The Carnival Is Over by The Seekers.  Then the transmitter was switched off. 
The majority of programming was music-based with a significant number of requests being played for islanders from relatives and friends overseas and vice versa. 
As befits the musical preference of the many Saint Helenians much country music was played, but most popular music styles from the last 50 years were featured. 
Weekday daytime programmes were usually presented by station staff, with evenings and weekends programming done by 'voluntary presenters'. 'Local news' (which also included events on Ascension Island and the Falkland Islands) was broadcast throughout the day. The station also did international news bulletins as well as international and local sports updates throughout the day. 
As a commercial station, Saint FM played adverts for local businesses. Some of these are still available online. 
Although Saint Helena is a small island its terrain is such that island-wide coverage requires more than one transmitter. 
Umbrella sampling is a technique in computational physics and chemistry, used to improve sampling of a system (or different systems) where ergodicity is hindered by the form of the system's energy landscape. It was first suggested by Torrie and Valleau in 1977. It is a particular physical application of the more general importance sampling in statistics. 
Umbrella sampling is a means of "bridging the gap" in this situation. The standard Boltzmann weighting for Monte Carlo sampling is replaced by a potential chosen to cancel the influence of the energy barrier present. The Markov chain generated has a distribution given by: 
with U the potential energy, w(rN) a function chosen to promote configurations that would otherwise be inaccessible to a Boltzmann-weighted Monte Carlo run. In the example above, w may be chosen such that w = w(Q), taking high values at intermediate Q and low values at low/high Q, facilitating barrier crossing. 
Values for a thermodynamic property A deduced from a sampling run performed in this manner can be transformed into canonical-ensemble values by applying the formula: 
The effect of introducing the weighting function w(rN) is equivalent to adding a biasing potential V(rN) to the potential energy of the system. 
If the biasing potential is strictly a function of a reaction coordinate or order parameter     Q   {\displaystyle Q}  , then the (unbiased) free energy profile on the reaction coordinate can be calculated by subtracting the biasing potential from the biased free energy profile. 
Series of umbrella sampling simulations can be analyzed using the weighted histogram analysis method (WHAM) or its generalization. WHAM can be derived using the Maximum likelihood method. 
Subtleties exist in deciding the most computationally efficient way to apply the umbrella sampling method, as described in Frenkel & Smit's book Understanding Molecular Simulation. 
Alternatives to umbrella sampling for computing potentials of mean force or reaction rates are free energy perturbation and transition interface sampling.  A further alternative which functions in full non-equilibrium is S-PRES. 
Audrey Parra (born 16 November 1987) is a French rugby union player. She represented France at the 2010 Women's Rugby World Cup. 
The 1975 All-Big Eight Conference football team consists of American football players chosen by various organizations for All-Big Eight Conference teams for the 1975 NCAA Division I football season.  The selectors for the 1975 season included the Associated Press (AP). 
He was co-founder (in 1974) and secretary of the Proletarian Unity Party for Communism (or PdUP), which later merged with the Italian Communist Party in 1984. When the latter renounced communism to become the Democratic Party of the Left in 1991, Magri adhered to the Communist Refoundation Party, founding an internal movement whose structure recalled that of PdUP. 
In 1995 his movement split, to form the Movement of Unitarian Communists, established to support a centrist cabinet led by Lamberto Dini. When the Movement entered the newly formed Democratic Party of the Left, Magri abandoned it, devoting himself only to il manifesto. 
In 2009 he published an essay on the history of the Italian Communist Party, entitled Il sarto di Ulm. Una possibile storia del PCI (The Tailor of Ulm. A possible history of the P.C.I.).  In 2011, Verso Books published 'The Tailor of Ulm: Communism in the Twentieth Century'.  Reviewing the book in Review 31, John Green praised it as 'an invaluable platform for understanding the apparent impasse of the present global and systemic crisis'. 
In his later years, Magri suffered from depression, exacerbated by the death of his wife Mara in 2008. He chose to take up assisted suicide, passing away in Zurich, Switzerland. He was survived by a daughter, Jessica, and a granddaughter, Emma. 
Shavar Jeffries is an American civil rights attorney who in September 2015 became the president of Democrats for Education Reform which promotes  more charter schools, school funding and stricter teacher evaluations to revamp public education and resigned in 2017. A former assistant state Attorney General, he was a candidate in the 2014 election for Mayor of Newark, New Jersey, after which he became a partner at Lowenstein Sandler in August 2014. 
After law school, Jeffries clerked for Judge Nathaniel R. Jones of the U.S. Court of Appeals. He then worked as an associate with Wilmer Cutler & Pickering. Since 2001, Shavar has been counsel at Gibbons P.C., a firm based at the Gateway Center in Newark. 
Jeffries has been an associate professor at the Center for Social Justice at Seton Hall Law School since 2004. In 2008-2010, he took a leave of absence to serve as Assistant Attorney General and Counsel to New Jersey Attorney General Anne Milgram and led several departments, including the Juvenile Justice Commission and the Civil Rights Division. 
In April 2010, Jeffries was elected to the Newark Public Schools Advisory Board. He became a partner at Lowenstein Sandler in August 2014. In September 2015 he became the president of Democrats for Education Reform which promotes  more charter schools, school funding and stricter teacher evaluations to revamp public education.  
Jeffries announced his election bid on May 20, 2013. Jeffries was relatively unknown in Newark, where typically one runs first for council and then for mayor. Jeffries introduced a public safety plan in October 2013 As of January 2014, Jeffries had raised the most campaign financing of the candidates. 
The election took place May 13, 2014 and Jeffries was defeated by Municipal Council of Newark Council Member Ras Baraka. Other potential candidates, Council Members Anibal Ramos, Jr. and Darrin S. Sharif,  had earlier dropped out of the race. 
Jeffries' eight-member council slate includes incumbents East Ward Councilman Augusto Amador, North Ward Councilman Anibal Ramos, Jr. and At-large Councilman Carlos Gonzalez and candidates Brian Logan (South Ward). Kevin Waters (West Ward) and Andre Speight (Central Ward). Lynda Lloyd (At-large), and former Assemblyman Wilfredo Caraballo (At-large). 
In 2015 Jeffries has established the Donna Johnson Memorial Scholarship to support the educational development of a young person who has experienced the loss of a parent, guardian, or loved one because of domestic violence, or whose life has otherwise been touched by violence against women. 
Shavar Jeffries resigned from the Board of Directors of the Success Academy Charter Schools in 2017. Jeffries is a critic of Education Secretary Betsy DeVos and President Donald Trump. This position was in conflict with Success Academy chief executive officer Eva Moskowitz, who had supported Hillary Clinton, but was muted in her criticism of Trump until several days after Jeffries' resignation. 
Education reform remains a controversial policy concern in the USA. The National Assessment of Educational Progress published a gloomy report showing many American high school senior students are not yet ready for college. This woeful situation stimulates the schools choice movement and supporters of charter schools which include Shavar Jeffries. He demonstrated disappointment regarding the low-key political discussion regarding the worsening quality of primary and secondary education. 
Denis than focused in working, along with his father, in their machining design firm Basing in neighboring town Jesenice, which was moved to Bled in Jan. 2006. 
2012 he formed a small Hotel chain at the lake Bled Vile Bled and later extend his work to alternative healing to promote bio-energy healing and learning. Since 2015 he runs independent healing, revitalizing and learning center Revive Temple Bled to promote healthy life style and self-healing through proper nutrition, use of bio-energy and detoxification. 
Denis is a father of three sons Gal (17 March 1994), Maksim (25 September 1998) and Isak (3 July 2000) and lives his hometown of Bled. 
The park was established in 1953 and gradually expanded in the 1960s. It was initially known as Gerald Cove State Park, but the spelling was corrected in 1966 upon the request of the Hartstene Island Grange. 
The Malta Rugby Football Union (MRFU) is the governing body for all Rugby Union in Malta. The MRFU is a full member of Rugby Europe and World Rugby. The MRFU is a  member of SportMalta, the Maltese islands national sports body. 
On September 14, 2016, Steve Busuttil defeated the incumbent Brian Dalton in the election for President of the Union. 
This is part of the list of United Kingdom locations: a gazetteer of place names in the United Kingdom showing each place's locality and geographical coordinates. 
Dominic Rau (born 29 November 1990) is a German footballer who most recently played for SC Hessen Dreieich. 
On 27 September 2019 it was confirmed, that Rau had signed with FC Bayern Alzenau. In January 2020 29-year old Rau confirmed, that he would retire to complete his education as a police officer. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a defender born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Royal Cellar[where?] is a historical monument in Odobesti, in Vrancea county of the historical region of Moldavia, Romania, dating from the 16th century. The building that houses the Royal Cellar is inscribed in the Romanian National Register of Heritage Tourism and the UNESCO conservation lists. 
According to documents, this cellar exists there since the time of Stephen the Great, prince of Moldavia.  In 1834, on the estate of Prince Mihail Sturdza, were preserved the ruins of two stone cellars covered with shingles. 
One of them, the Royal Cellar was consolidated with pumice from Milcov River, becoming an ideal place for aging wine in oak barrels and bottles. 
The age of the building is strengthened by the inscription above the entrance in Cyrillic letters, along with the coat of arms of Moldova (Bull Head) framed by the flags. 
This article about a Moldovan building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In his congressional term, Knollenberg was known as a staunch supporter of the North American Free Trade Agreement, President George W. Bush's stance on protecting manufactured goods and for voting against expanding SCHIP in the later years of his career. 
After graduation, he served in the United States Army from 1955 to 1957 as a corporal in Germany, where he specialized in petroleum chemistry. He then spent more than three decades as an insurance agent. Initially working for New York Life Insurance Company as an assistant manager and later for Sears, he founded his own agency, Knollenberg Agency in the late 1980s. He served as chairman of the Oakland County Republican Party from 1978 to 1982. 
In 1992, Knollenberg signed on as campaign manager for Congressman William Broomfield, who had represented most of Oakland County in Congress since 1957. However, at a meeting with Knollenberg and other advisers, Broomfield announced he would not run for a 19th term. He then asked Knollenberg to run in his place in the 11th District, which had been renumbered from the 18th District after the 1990 census. 
Despite being the only candidate in the three-way Republican primary not holding elected office, Knollenberg won the nomination by over 13 points. As the 11th was one of the most Republican districts in Michigan and the nation at the time, he was virtually assured of becoming only the third person to represent the district. He was reelected six times without serious difficulty, never dropping below 55 percent of the vote. 
Knollenberg was re-elected to his seventh term in 2004 with 58% of the vote. In 2006, however, Knollenberg faced a tough campaign against Democrat Nancy Skinner, a liberal talk show host in the Detroit area, ultimately winning by six points. Two years later, in a more difficult election cycle for Republican candidates, Knollenberg lost re-election to former state senator Gary Peters. 
Generally, Knollenberg's voting record was conservative. He supported the North American Free Trade Agreement and led the campaign against President George W. Bush's steel tariffs. In 2002 he was awarded the Mkhitar Gosh Medal by the president of the Republic of Armenia. On September 29, 2008, he voted against the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008. 
Knollenberg was challenged in the 2006 Republican primary by moderate Republican Patricia Godchaux. Democratic candidate Nancy Skinner, a popular former radio-talk show host in the Detroit area, was her party's nominee for the 9th district. Matthew R. Abel of the Green Party and Adam Goodman of the Libertarian Party were third-party candidates also in the race. 
Prior to 2006, Knollenberg's election was widely considered to be relatively easy given the traditionally Republican leanings of Troy, the largest city in his district. The 2000s round of redistricting made Knollenberg's district much friendlier to Democrats.  While the district lost heavily Democratic Southfield, it picked up equally Democratic Pontiac and lost a Republican-leaning spur of Wayne County. 
In the 2006 election, Knollenberg was nearly defeated, taking only 52 percent of the vote to Skinner's 46 percent.  Abel received .9%, and Goodman received 1.3%.  This was the closest a Democrat had come to winning the district in 48 years; in 1958 Broomfield only won a second term by 5.5 points. 
In January 2006, Congressman Knollenberg announced his intent to seek re-election in 2008. The narrowness of his 2006 reelection bid, combined with his district's changing demographics led the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee to target him for defeat. The Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee targeted Congressional Districts where Republicans garnered less than 55% of the vote. 
The Democratic nominee was Gary Peters, the former state lottery commissioner. Skinner initially made plans for a rematch, but bowed out to clear the field for Peters. In March 2008, Jack Kevorkian announced that he would challenge Knollenberg as an independent candidate. The Libertarian nominee was Adam Goodman and the Green nominee was Douglas Campbell. Kevorkian, Goodman and Campbell each raised and spent less money than the mandatory reporting threshold. 
On November 4, 2008, Knollenberg was defeated, garnering 43 percent of the vote to Peters' 52 percent. Knollenberg's candidacy was likely hurt by a heavy Democratic tide in the Detroit area; Barack Obama carried Oakland County by a 15-point margin, six percentage points more than Peters' margin over Knollenberg. A potential factor in Knollenberg's defeat was a series of advertisements criticizing his vote against expanding SCHIP. 
Knollenberg had two sons, Stephen and Martin with his wife, Sandra "Sandie" Moco, whom he married in September 1962 at St Frances Cabrini Church in Allen Park, Michigan. His son, Martin, was elected in November 2006 by a 58%-42% margin to the Michigan State House of Representatives from the 41st District. 
Knollenberg died on February 6, 2018, due to complications from Alzheimer's disease at a care facility in Troy, Michigan at the age of 84. 
Born in New York City to a wealthy, well-connected political family, Welles graduated from Harvard College in 1914. He entered the Foreign Service at the advice of Franklin Roosevelt, who was a family friend.  Welles was excited by Woodrow Wilson's ideas about how American principles could reorder the international system based on liberal democracy, free-trade capitalism, international law, a league of nations, and an end to colonialism. 
Welles specialized in Latin American diplomatic affairs and served several posts in Washington and in the field.  President Calvin Coolidge distrusted Welles because of his divorce and private sex life. He left public service and from bases in his two mansions in the Washington area he wrote a book on the history of the Dominican Republic. 
Welles was forced out of government service by Secretary Hull when it was revealed he had solicited two men for sex.  Returning to private life, he continued to write books on foreign relations and became an advisor to media organizations.  He was a target of the House Un-American Activities Committee during the post-war "red scare", though he was never formally sanctioned.  He died in New Jersey in 1961, survived by his third wife and several children. 
Welles attended Harvard College where he studied "economics, Iberian literature and culture", and graduated after three years in 1914. 
Welles soon became a specialist in Latin American affairs. He served in Buenos Aires, Argentina in 1919 and became fluent in Spanish. In 1921, Secretary of State Charles Evans Hughes appointed him to head the Division of Latin American Affairs. 
Coolidge, however, disapproved of Welles' 1925 marriage to Mathilde Scott Townsend, who had only recently divorced the President's friend, Senator Peter Gerry of Rhode Island. He promptly ended Welles' diplomatic career. 
During the presidential election of 1932, Welles provided foreign policy expertise to the Roosevelt campaign. He was a major contributor to the campaign as well. 
In April 1933, FDR appointed Welles Assistant Secretary of State for Latin American Affairs, but when a revolution in Cuba against President Gerardo Machado left its government divided and uncertain, he became instead the President's special envoy to Cuba. He arrived in Havana in May 1933. His mission was to negotiate a settlement so that the U.S. could avoid intervening as U.S. law, namely the Platt Amendment of 1901, required. 
In 1937, FDR promoted Welles to Under Secretary, and the Senate promptly confirmed the appointment. Indicative of ongoing rivalries within the State Department, Robert Walton Moore, an ally of Secretary of State Hull was appointed the department's Counselor at the same time, a position equal in rank to that of Under Secretary. 
In the week following Kristallnacht, in November 1938, the British government offered to give the major part of its quota of 65,000 British citizens eligible for emigration to the United States to Jews fleeing Hitler. Under-Secretary Welles opposed this idea, as he later recounted: 
Welles headed the American delegation to the 21-nation Pan American conference that met in Panama in September 1939. He said the conference had been planned in earlier hemispheric meetings in Buenos Aires and Lima and he emphasized the need for consultation on economic issues to "cushion the shock of the dislocation of inter-American commerce arising from the war" in Europe. 
In February and March 1940 Welles visited Italy, Germany, France (he visited President Albert Lebrun on March 7) and England to discuss peacemaking proposals. Hitler feared that the purpose of his visits was to drive a wedge between Germany and Italy. 
The declaration was a source of contention during the subsequent alliance between the Americans, the British, and the Soviets, but Welles persistently defended the declaration. In a discussion with the media, he asserted that the Soviets had maneuvered to give "an odor of legality to acts of aggression for purposes of the record." 
In a 1942 memorandum describing his conversations with British Ambassador Lord Halifax, Welles stated that he would have preferred to characterize the plebiscites supporting the annexations as "faked." In April 1942, he wrote that the annexation was "not only indefensible from every moral standpoint, but likewise extraordinarily stupid." He believed any concession on the Baltic issue would set a precedent that would lead to additional border struggles in eastern Poland and elsewhere. 
A New York Times profile described Welles in 1941: "Tall and erect, never without his cane,... he has enough dignity to be Viceroy of India and... enough influence in this critical era to make his ideas, principles, and dreams count." 
He appeared on the cover of Time on August 11, 1941, and in that issue Time assessed Welles' role within Hull's Department of State: 
Roosevelt was always close to Welles and made him the central figure in the State Department, much to the chagrin of secretary Cordell Hull, who could not be removed because he had a powerful political base. 
The clash became more public in mid-1943, when Time reported "a flare-up of long-smoldering hates and jealousies in the State Department".  After Welles was forced out of office, journalists noted that two men who shared "aims and goals" were at odds because of a "clash of temperament and ambitions". 
The U.S. still awaits a clarification of its foreign policy and the forced resignation of Sumner Welles made an already murky issue even more obscure. 
Continuing his career-long focus on Latin America, he said that "if we are to achieve our own security every nation of the Western Hemisphere must also obtain the same ample measure of assurance as ourselves in the world of the future." He also foresaw the end to colonialism as a guiding principle of the new world order: 
In 1944, Welles lent his name to a fundraising campaign by the United Jewish Appeal to bring Jewish refugees from the Balkans to Palestine. 
Welles became a prominent commentator and author on foreign affairs. In 1945, he joined the American Broadcasting Company to guide the organization of the "Sumner Welles Peace Forum," a series of four radio broadcasts providing expert commentary on the San Francisco Conference, which wrote the founding document of the United Nations. He undertook a project to edit a series of volumes on foreign relations for Harvard University Press. 
Later that year, the American Jewish Congress presented Welles with a citation that praised his "courageous championing of the cause of Israel among the nations of the world." 
On December 7, 1948, Welles appeared before HCUA as part of its investigation into allegations between Whittaker Chambers and Alger Hiss (part of the Hiss Case). Later that month (and after the death of his friend Laurence Duggan), he suffered a serious heart attack. 
In April 1950, Senator Joseph McCarthy repeatedly charged that the Institute of Pacific Relations (IPR), an organization that fostered the study of the Far East and the Pacific, was a communist front. Welles was a member of the American branch of the IPR. 
He sold his estate outside Washington in 1952, when Oxon Hill Manor became the home of a "huge collection of Americana." 
On April 14, 1915, Sumner Welles married Esther "Hope" Slater of Boston, the sister of a Harvard roommate, in Webster, Massachusetts. She came from a similarly prominent family that owned a textile empire based in Massachusetts. She was descended from industrialist Samuel Slater and granddaughter of the Boston painter William Morris Hunt. Welles and his wife had two sons: 
In 1923, Slater obtained a divorce from Welles in Paris "on grounds of abandonment and refusal to live with his wife". 
Welles occasionally gained public notice for his art dealings. In 1925, for example, he sold a collection of Japanese screens that had been on exhibit at the Metropolitan Museum of Art for several years. 
Welles spent the bulk of his time a few miles outside of Washington in the Maryland countryside at a 49-room "country cottage" known as Oxon Hill Manor designed for him by Jules Henri de Sibour and built on a 245-acre property in 1929. He entertained foreign dignitaries and diplomats there and hosted informal meetings of senior officials. FDR used the site as an occasional escape from the city as well. 
On January 8, 1952, Welles married Harriette Appleton Post, a childhood friend (and a granddaughter of architect George B. Post, designer of the New York Stock Exchange) who had previously married and divorced twice, and had resumed the use of her maiden name, in New York City at the bride's home on Fifth Avenue. 
He died on September 24, 1961, at age 68 in Bernardsville, New Jersey. He is buried in Rock Creek Cemetery in Washington, D.C. 
Winston Churchill, who made the phrase "No comment" famous, cited Welles as his source for the cryptic response. 
Welles' papers are held by the National Archives at the Franklin D. Roosevelt Library in Hyde Park, New York. 
The street adjacent to the current Embassy of the United States in Riga, Latvia was named after Sumner Welles (as Samnera Velsa iela) in 2012. 
Valle competed in an early preview of Ultra Street Fighter IV's Omega Mode, in which he lost against Ryan "Filipino Champ" Ramirez. Valle is known for having an offensive playstyle when playing with Ryu, as determined by Justin Wong in his Step Up Your Game series of articles. Valle announced his retirement from competitive gaming in April 2017. 
Valle is the CEO and co-founder of Level Up and is the man behind the SoCal Regionals tournaments as well as the Wednesday Night Fights Online Tournaments. Valle formerly ran ReveLAtions, The Runback, and Super Smash Sundays; the former being a major that happens once a year, and the latter two being weeklies. He was born in Lima, Peru. 
Grandpa was a British comic strip which originally appeared in the magazine The Beano from 1955 to 1957, drawn by Ken Reid. It was later revived from 1971 until 1984, but this time by Robert Nixon and afterwards Jimmy Glen. 
Grandpa was first published in issue 680, illustrated by Ken Reid.  It was a gag-a-day comic about a mischievous old bearded man.  
Some of the stories involved his dad, an even older man with an even longer beard than him. Despite their advanced ages, they enjoyed a father-son relationship similar to that of Dennis the Menace and his dad; a typical story would be about Grandpa getting involved in some kind of mischief, being caught by his father and ending up getting a spanking. In a June 1956 strip, Grandpa was revealed to have been born in 1874, making his age 82. In 1957 the series was terminated. 
From 1971 until 1984 Grandpa was relaunched. Robert Nixon drew it for the first years, after which Jimmy Glen took over until 1984. This series ran from issue 1522 to issue 2200. 
In his sophomore season, Harrison led the Kangaroos to a second-place WAC finish and after averaging 17.5 points and 3.9 assists per game was named first-team all-conference and the WAC Player of the Year.  A few weeks later, he was named an honorable mention All-American by the Associated Press, making him the first All-American in program history. 
In mid-November 2016, Harrison was suspended for a domestic assault charge under Title IX. Harrison was suspended indefinitely and was dismissed from the program on December 12, 2016. The charges were later dropped. 
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball player, coach, or other figure born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The interbank market is an important segment of the foreign exchange market. It is a wholesale market through which most currency transactions are channeled. It is mainly used for trading among bankers. The three main constituents of the interbank market are: 
Central banks also play a role in setting currency exchange rates by altering interest rates. By increasing interest rates they stimulate traders to buy their currency as it provides a high return on investment and this drives the value of the corresponding central bank's currency higher with comparison to other currencies. 
It has been criticized because of its image as a stereotypical "smoke-filled room" where lobby groups gain access to government officials, a few of whom have been known to use taxpayer funds to pay their way to New York. Other observers criticize the retreat for being held in New York instead of within Pennsylvania. 
The Pennsylvania Society has become known as the "unofficial start of the next year's big political season" because of its reputation as a place for potential political candidates to make contacts, meet fundraisers, and make a name for themselves early in the electoral process. 
Former Speaker of the Pennsylvania House of Representatives Bill DeWeese said in 2003 that the Pennsylvania Society is "a magnificent re-creation of the gilded age and the era of the robber barons of the late 19th century, when Fricks and Carnegies and Pews dominated Pennsylvania's commercial and political scene. Slender elements of its original purpose endure. However, it is primarily a hell of a party." 
Public watchdogs have criticized the event as a chance for "wealthy special interests to mingle with the movers and shakers in state government" or as a gathering for "fat cat" politicians away from their Pennsylvania constituents. 
Attendees have been known to enjoy the New York City tourist attractions, including the Broadway theatre and the Fifth Avenue shopping district almost as much as, if not more than, the political networking opportunities. 
Kuroki was a cast member of the Takarazuka Revue, belonging to the Moon Troupe (Tsuki). Kuroki was the voice of Helen Parr/Elastigirl/Mrs. Incredible in the Japanese dub of The Incredibles. She won the award for best actress at the 22nd Hochi Film Award for Lost Paradise. 
The leaves are flat, the lower ones being elliptical in shape, while the upper ones are linear.  They are wooly on both sides. 
It is found in Eastern France to Denmark as well as on the mountains of Uzbekistan on sandy grasslands, and heathland. It is also widely spread on the Dalmatian coast in Croatia where locals regularly pick and sell it throughout the summer (local Mediterranean climate permitting even as late as September and October). 
Helichrysum stoechas  is similar to the Helichrysum arenarium species, but the leaves are all linear, with rolled under edges. It is found in western France on dunes near the sea. 
In February 1811, before the birth of his son, Napoleon I decided to build a palace on Chaillot hill calling it the palace of the king of Rome. Grand and beautiful, it was to be the center of an administrative and military imperial city. The ambitious premise and the fall of the empire meant that the palace was never built. Its designer, architect Pierre Fontaine, stated that the palace could have been "the most vast and most extraordinary work of our century." 
The small palace of Rambouillet, originally intended for secondary use, was rebuilt by Auguste Famin. Due to the preparations for the French invasion of Russia and the diminishing resources of the French state work on the larger Chaillot palace was halted and on March 2, 1812 the Rambouillet palace was officially given the title "palace of the King of Rome" and it was the only one of the two palaces that was finished. 
Born  in Oneida, New York, he studied at the Art Students League of New York with Kenyon Cox, Henry Siddons Mowbray and with William Merritt Chase at the New York School of Art. His early works were influenced by the paintings of his friend Albert Pinkham Ryder, and depict figures in phantasmagorical landscapes. 
Although he used traditional methods and was hostile to artistic modernism, Miller believed that good art is always radical in nature. He was a socialist, and intended his art to have a political dimension. 
By the time of his death in New York City in 1952, his reputation was in eclipse, but he was rediscovered in the 1970s. 
Written in 1984 by Joelle Kopf and Christian Dingler under the label EMI Music, the song was a great success in the 1980s. 
The song, released as a single on July 1, 1984, fell within the context of an era marked by the emergence of thoughtless songs which mocked some popular themes of society at the time. According to Elia Habib, an expert on French charts, the song reduced "freed women with a tender irony in an archetypal caricature" at a time when "the look is gaining importance and makes you 'in' or not". 
In 1984, the song gained the price of the Union Nationale des Auteurs et Compositeurs awarded by the SACEM. 
In 2005, Soma Riba band featuring DJ Fou covered the song but did not manage to reach success: The single peaked at #33 on the French singles chart on July 4, 2005 and remained on the top 100 chart for 16 weeks. 
The Beloved are a British electronic music group best known for the singles "Sweet Harmony", "The Sun Rising", "Hello", "Your Love Takes Me Higher", and "Satellite". 
Originally a post-punk/new wave band formed in 1983, they underwent a change of direction in the late 1980s to a house/alternative dance sound and experienced chart success in the UK and elsewhere. 
According to a commonly known account of the band's formation, Jon Marsh placed an advertisement in the music press in 1983, which read as follows: 
"I am Jon Marsh, founder member of the Beloved. Should you too wish to do something gorgeous, meet me in exactly three years' time at exactly 11am in Diana's Diner, or site thereof, Covent Garden, London, WC2." 
While "Sweet Harmony" went on to become their biggest hit in the UK, reaching number 8 in 1993, the other two tracks taken from the Conscience album, did not achieve the former's success. The double A-side single "Celebrate Your Life" / "You've Got Me Thinking" peaked at number 23, and "Outerspace Girl" peaked at number 38. "Rock to the Rhythm of Love" was also released as a single, however, only in the US. The album itself reached no. 2 on the UK Albums Chart. 
After X, the compilation Single File followed in 1997, promoted by a re-release of "The Sun Rising" (which reached number 31, only five positions lower than the original 1989 release) which included some new remixes. 
Marsh later became a respected club DJ, holding monthly residencies at Ministry of Sound between 1994 and 1998, and Fabric between 1999 and 2004. He played all over the UK and Europe on a regular basis until he stopped to focus more on his family. He has also collaborated with original band member Steve Waddington and others on new material, most of which remains unreleased. 
Chart placings are from the UK Singles Chart and UK Albums Chart, except those marked *, which are from the UK Indie Chart. 
Nadine Flora Gasman Zylbermann is the president of the National Women's Institute of Mexico, and the representative of UN Women in Brazil. 
Gasman has worked in public policy to help women and promote human rights and intercultural understanding for over 30 years. Nadine Gasman has worked in Brazil, Guatemala, and Mexico to address gender inequalities and violence against women, among other human rights violations. She also works with indigenous women, women of African descent, and young people. 
She advocates for expanded access to legal abortion in Mexico and helped strengthen 911 services to guard against an increase in domestic violence during quarantines for the COVID-19 pandemic. 
This biographical article related to medicine in Mexico is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The terrace is connected to the South Court by two flights of steps; the library proper is approached by another flight above the terrace. Known as "the Steps", the "Low Steps", or the "Urban Beach", they are a popular meeting area for Columbia students. They also serve as a connection between the northern and southern sections of Columbia's campus. 
Architecture critic Paul Goldberger said of the Steps in 1987: "The building itself, for all the power of its immense scale and huge dome, seems almost to recede, deferring to the stairs before it." During commencement speeches, Columbia's "graduation mace" is customarily carried down the stairs. The stairs have also been used for other speeches, such as a 1991 speech by novelist Salman Rushdie after the Iranian government targeted him for assassination. 
The Low Memorial Library was built from 1894 to 1897 and designed by Charles Follen McKim of McKim, Mead, & White. McKim was assisted in the design by William M. Kendall, Austin W. Lord, and Egerton Swartwout. The library was designed in the Neoclassical style, incorporating many of the elements of Rome's Pantheon, as well as the Baths of Caracalla. It was funded by Seth Low, the president of Columbia University and later the mayor of New York City, in memory of his father Abiel Abbot Low. 
The ambulatory is an octagonal hallway around the rotunda. It consists of alternating longer and shorter passages; the longer passages correspond to the cardinal directions, while the shorter passages correspond to the intercardinal directions (northwest, northeast, southwest, southeast). The floor has alternating squares and circles, made of marble and laid in hues of red, yellow, and black-and-white. There is a bronze bas-relief of the university's seal at the center of the floor. 
In the shorter passages, the decoration is simpler. The walls are made of plaster and unornamented, with arched doorways that are recessed and flanked by simple pilasters. The halls also have arched ceilings. They are illuminated by bronze lamps that are placed on marble pedestals, with lions' heads below them and glass globes above. Staircases rise to the upper levels, adjacent to each of the shorter sections of the ambulatory. 
In 1954, during the University's bicentennial, Low was commemorated on a postage stamp. For the University's semiquincentennial in 2004, an image of the library was placed on a pre-stamped postcard. 
 Linda Ogugua (born 12 April 1978) is a Nigerian women's basketball Center. Ogugua attended Biola University in California, United States and with the Nigeria women's national basketball team at the 2004 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to a Nigerian basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Oberea mimetica is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Heller in 1915. It is known from the Philippines. 
Ahn Ji-young (born September 14, 1995) is a South Korean singer and songwriter. She is the main vocalist and only remaining member of South Korean indie band Bolbbalgan4. 
In 2014, she was featured on the television program Superstar K 6, and debuted as a member of Bolbbalgan4 along with Woo Ji-yoon in 2016. After Woo left the band in early 2020, it was announced that Ahn would continue to promote under the duo name. 
In 2015 she released her second single "Leave Your Man". She is currently in the process of recording her self-titled debut studio album. 
Logan began performing professionally at age 17 in a Brazilian restaurant in Penang, singing mainly jazz songs in English, Spanish and Portuguese. She became a regular in the Penang music scene, performing at various venues such as Bagan, China House and GSpot. 
After moving to Kuala Lumpur, she began making waves in the music industry in Malaysia with regular performances at prestigious music venues such as No Black Tie, Mezze and Alexis. In May, she traveled to London in the hope of meeting producers and other musicians. It was there that she met Amy Winehouse's guitarist Robbin Banerjee. The two would go on to record a music video together in late 2011 and later to perform multiple sold-out shows at No Black Tie in 2016 and again in 2019. 
As of 2020, Logan was working on her first studio album. Self-titled, "Dasha Logan" is expected to be released in December 2020. 
This biographical article related to an Australian boxer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In geometry, the parabidiminished rhombicosidodecahedron is one of the Johnson solids (J80). It is also a canonical polyhedron. 
A Johnson solid is one of 92 strictly convex polyhedra that is composed of regular polygon faces but are not uniform polyhedra (that is, they are not Platonic solids, Archimedean solids, prisms, or antiprisms). They were named by Norman Johnson, who first listed these polyhedra in 1966. 
It can be constructed as a rhombicosidodecahedron with two opposing pentagonal cupolae removed. Related Johnson solids are the diminished rhombicosidodecahedron  (J76) where one cupola is removed, the metabidiminished rhombicosidodecahedron (J81) where two non-opposing cupolae are removed and the tridiminished rhombicosidodecahedron (J83) where three cupolae are removed. 
Ventures Platform (VP) is an African early stage investment fund that supports startup companies in Africa..  If a startup team has successfully introduced a Minimum Viable Product into a marketplace with existing positive offline indicators, VP will support the startup,  
(VP) was launched by Kola Aina  on 3 June 2016 as an accelerator program for technology startups.  It is headquartered in Lagos. 
Between 2016 and 2017, VP invested in over 20 companies including Mobileforms, Wesabi, Payconnect, Jalo, Proteach, Lizzie's creations, drivers.ng, myPadi.ng, Accounteer, LastPrice, VivaXD and ThriveAgric In 2017, VP expanded to Lagos. 
In 2020, VP launched the iNOVO accelerator with Startupbootcamp to invest in Agriple, Farmer First Technologies, Rural Farmers Hub, Afrilearn, DigiLearns, Schoola, Gleeworld Pharmacy, Pharmaserv Health Project, and Wellvis. 
Events include: Aso Villa Demo Day 2016 BootCamp, Slush 2016 Local Competition, CodeBusAfrica, SheLeadsAfrica speed networking night, Starta Silicon Drinkup, Techstars Atlanta in Abuja. 
Ventures Platform Foundation is the social impact arm of Ventures Platform that builds and supports social impact tech-entrepreneurs in Africa. 
This article related to members of the insect family Ulidiidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was a native of Saint Louis, Missouri.  As a child, he attended the Pleasant Green Missionary Baptist Church along with his mother, Martha Bass, a member of The Clara Ward Singers gospel group. His sister was R&B/soul singer Fontella Bass. 
David Peaston was also a veteran of traveling gospel plays such as "Momma Don't." Singer Cheryl Pepsii Riley toured with him in "Momma Don't" and other shows. He enlisted on the gospel show "His Woman, His Wife: The Musical," touring across the U.S. In his last years, he still ran Pea-Stain Productions, his own production company. 
Peaston died from complications of diabetes in St. Louis, Missouri, on February 1, 2012, at the age of 54. 
The Angelina & Neches River Authority (ANRA) is an independent government agency in Texas. It was established in 1949 or 1950, though it did not become active until the 1970s. 
The Angelina & Neches River Authority receives its governance from a nine-member Board of Directors, who are appointed by the Governor of Texas for six-year terms. The board serves to create policy and provide oversight. The agency receives no tax revenues from the state and is not able to levy taxes. It gets its money through consumer payments for its services. 
A company known as Tomlin Infrastructure Group is partnered with the Angelina & Neches River Authority for a water supply operation based on surface water. This is highly unusual, as surface water supply operations are typically done by the private sector. 
The Angelina & Neches River Authority was established in 1949 or 1950 as the Neches River Conservation District, which was formed from the Sabine-Neches River Conservation District, which was itself established in 1935. The agency was not active until the 1970s, when a nine-member Board of Directors was appointed by then-governor of Texas, Preston Smith. 
In the 1980s, the Angelina & Neches River Authority was contracted by the Texas Department of Water Resources to carry out studies on sewage treatment. One such study was a study of seven municipal sewage treatment plants in East Texas in 1982. Another study, in 1985, concerned sludge disposal methods for sewage treatment plants in the upper part of the Neches River watershed. 
Glen Grant is a distillery founded in 1840 in Rothes, Speyside, that produces single malt Scotch whisky.  Previously owned by Chivas Brothers Ltd, best known for their Chivas Regal blended scotch whisky, Glen Grant was purchased by the Italian company Campari Group in December 2005.  It is the biggest selling single malt Scotch whisky in Italy. 
Glen Grant was founded in 1840, by brothers John and James Grant, two former illegal distillers and smugglers who decided to take out a license. With the sea and port of Garmouth nearby, the River Spey at its feet and barley-growing plains nearby, all the basic ingredients of malt whisky were close at hand. This time the distillery was legal. 
In 1931, Major Grant, the last Glengrant, died, survived by his three daughters and a distillery that had become one of the most famous in the world. Douglas MacKessack, his grandson, was to become his successor. 
In 1972, the Glenlivet and Glen Grant Distilleries Ltd amalgamated with the blending concerns of Hill, Thomson and Co.Ltd and Longmorn Distilleries Ltd to become The Glenlivet Distillers Ltd. The original family interest in the distilleries was maintained, with two substantial outside shareholders: Courage Ltd, the brewing concern and Suntory Ltd, the Japanese distilling company. 
In 2006, Campari acquired Glen Grant, its only whisky, when Allied Domecq was acquired by Pernod Ricard. To this day, Glen Grant continues to be one of the biggest selling single malts worldwide. 
Scotland's Malt Whisky Trail is a tourism initiative featuring seven working Speyside distilleries including Glen Grant, a historic distillery (Dallas Dhu, now a museum) and the Speyside Cooperage.  According to a BBC article, visitors can tour the distillery and warehouse, . 
She is the widow of football coach Joe Paterno, who led the Penn State Nittany Lions from 1966 to 2011. 
Suzanne Pohland was born on February 14, 1940 in Latrobe, Pennsylvania. She studied English literature at Penn State University, where she met then-assistant coach Joe Paterno. Shortly after her graduation in 1962, Joe and Sue were married. She taught at a local school in Centre County, Pennsylvania for a year before leaving to give birth to her first child, Diana. 
Joe and Sue had 5 children together: Diana, Mary Kay, David, Scott, and Jay; they all graduated from Penn State. 
Together, Joe and Sue Paterno donated millions of dollars to Penn State and to other charities, most notably, the Special Olympics. 
In 2010, Sue Paterno led the charge to build a Catholic student faith center on the Penn State University Park campus. The Suzanne Pohland Paterno Catholic Student Faith Center opened in 2012. 
Ordained to the priesthood in 1963, Barahona Castillo served as auxiliary of the Catholic Diocese of San Vicente, El Salvador, from 1982 to 1983. He then served as diocesan bishop of the San Vincente Diocese from 1983 to 2005. 
This article about a Catholic bishop from El Salvador is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
George Robinson is a former football (soccer) player who represented New Zealand at international level. 
This biographical article related to New Zealand association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
The 2023 Seville City Council election, also the 2023 Seville municipal election, will be held on Sunday, 28 May 2023, to elect the 12th City Council of the municipality of Seville. All 31 seats in the City Council will be up for election. The election will be held simultaneously with regional elections in at least seven autonomous communities and local elections all throughout Spain. 
The City Council of Seville (Spanish: Ayuntamiento de Sevilla) is the top-tier administrative and governing body of the municipality of Seville, composed of the mayor, the government council and the elected plenary assembly. Elections to the local councils in Spain are fixed for the fourth Sunday of May every four years. 
The mayor is indirectly elected by the plenary assembly. A legal clause requires that mayoral candidates earn the vote of an absolute majority of councillors, or else the candidate of the most-voted party in the assembly shall be automatically appointed to the post. In the event of a tie, the appointee will be determined by lot. 
 Below is a list of the main parties and electoral alliances which will likely contest the election: 
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Toronto International Film Festival People's Choice Award for Documentaries is an annual film award, presented by the Toronto International Film Festival to the film rated as the year's most popular documentary film with festival audiences. The award was first introduced in 2009; prior to its introduction, documentary films were eligible for the Toronto International Film Festival People's Choice Award. 
The voting process is the same as for the feature film People's Choice: at each documentary film screening, attendees are invited to "vote" for the film by leaving their ticket stubs in voting boxes outside the theatre after the show. 
Nobin Chandra Das left his confectionery business to his only son Krishna Chandra Das. Krishna pioneered an exploratory spirit in the family confectionery business, enabling it to grow as a leading Indian confectioner. 
Sapporo - Iwamizawa - (Bibai) - (Sunagawa) - Takikawa - Fukagawa - Asahikawa - Kamikawa - (Shirataki) - (Maruseppu) - Engaru - Ikutahara - Rubeshibe - Kitami - Bihoro - Memanbetsu - Abashiri 
Okhotsk services are normally formed of 4-car KiHa 183 series diesel multiple unit (DMU) trains as shown below, with car 1 at the Sapporo and Abashiri end (train reverses at Engaru Station). 
From the start of the revised timetable in October 1961, services were upgraded to "Express" status, and were operated using KiHa 56 4-car DMU formations, including a KiRo 26 Green (first class) car. 
From the start of the revised timetable on 2 October 1972, services were upgraded to "Limited express" status, and were operated using KiHa 80 series DMU formations. 
From the start of the revised timetable in November 1986, the KiHa 80 series rolling stock was replaced with KiHa 183 series 6-car DMUs. 
JR Hokkaido operates seasonal SL Okhotsk services formed of 14 series passenger coaches hauled by a JNR Class C11 steam locomotive and assisted by a JNR Class DE15 diesel locomotive. 
The first sections near Werder, Schwanebeck and Spreeau were opened between 1936 and the outbreak of World War II in 1939 as part of the Reichsautobahn program. Construction works were not resumed until 1972, when the East German authorities began to complete the orbital, in order to bypass West Berlin on the way from the capital East Berlin to Potsdam and the motorways leading to Magdeburg and Leipzig.  The final stretch opened in 1979. 
Deon Birtwistle (born 4 September 1980 in Launceston) is an Australian former lightweight rower. He was twice a national champion, an U23 World Champion and a silver medallist at the 2003 World Championships. 
Birtwistle came into Tasmanian state contention at a time when his state dominated Australian lightweight rowing. He was down the order behind seasoned national champions Shane Broad, Samuel Beltz, Darren Balmforth and Simon Burgess. It was 2003 before Birtwistle was selected to represent Tasmania in the men's lightweight four who contested and won the Penrith Cup at the Interstate Regatta within the Australian Rowing Championships. It was his only Penrith Cup appearance. 
In 2009 in North Esk colours and rowing in a composite Tasmanian eight, Birtwistle won the national lightweight eight championship title at the Australian Rowing Championships.  
Birtwistle made his Australian representative debut in a lightweight quad scull at the 2002 World Rowing Cup II in Lucerne. He then raced in that same quad that year at the World Rowing U23 Championships in Genoa to a gold medal. In 2003 he was elevated to the Australian senior lightweight squad. He competed in the lightweight quad at the 2003 World Rowing Cup III in Lucerne. Then at the 2003 World Rowing Championships in Milan he raced in the bow seat of the quad scull to a silver medal. 
In Sichuan province, in an area incorporating the traditional Tibetan areas Kham and Amdo, Tibetan monks and police clashed in riots on 16 March in Ngaba county (Aba) after the monks staged a protest. It formed part of the 2008 Tibetan unrest and was one of two major events to happen in Sichuan during 2008, the other being the 2008 Sichuan earthquake in May 2008. 
On 16 March, Tibetan monks staged a protest against its harsh treatment by the Chinese government. The word got out and the police became involved. The monks and local residents clashed with police, killing at least one policeman, and setting fire to three or four police vans.[citation needed] 
In Aba, an eyewitness said 17 people were killed, including a young girl that attended middle school. By 18 March, the witness described the area as teeming with police and soldiers, and the people as anxious. Protests continued for several days. 
On 24 March, AP reports that Chinese state-run Xinhua said "381 people involved in protests...had surrendered to police" in Aba, which was not verified by independent sources. 
As reported by the BBC, the unverified reports in Sichuan and the "expulsions and restrictions of foreigners, and uncorroborated reports of vast convoys of paramilitaries entering areas of unrest, raise fears that the government has created a "black box" in which its security personnel can take action without scrutiny." 
The BBC also reports, "Unrest was also said to have flared again in Aba, Sichuan, where there are claims that police shot between 13 and 30 protesters after a police station was set on fire. Like Tibetan exiles' claims that at least 80 have died in Lhasa, the reports of deaths are impossible to verify because of the restrictions on journalists." 
During the week of 22 March, authorities and security forces in the city of Chengdu, the capital of Sichuan, locked down a Tibetan neighborhood located near the Southwest University for Nationalities and the Wu Hou Temple. The lockdown comes amid unconfirmed reports of Tibetan protests earlier in the week and unconfirmed reports of a stabbing attack of a Han Chinese man by a Tibetan. Cars and other vehicles are not allowed to drive through the neighborhood, which has a large police presence. 
In Sichuan's Ngaba prefecture, Chinese authorities fired on protestors. The Tibetan government-in-exile's Central Tibetan Administration states the police shot and killed 19 people during the protest. The Chinese authorities denied killing anyone. Photographs of bodies with bullet wounds were released by a rights group. 
The Foreign Correspondents Club of China has reported "official interference with journalists in Chengdu", and that travel by foreign journalists to other areas of the province has been restricted. 
On Monday, 24 March 2008 in Drango county, Garze prefecture, a Tibetan rights group reports 200 monks, nuns, and ordinary people gathered to march before clashes with police began. Police fired shots into the crowd, killing a monk and critically wounding another monk, as reported to Associated Press by the Tibetan Center for Human Rights and Democracy (TCHRD). 
On 25 March, Chinese state-run Xinhua News Agency, citing local authorities, reported that one police officer was dead and "several others" injured, as sympathy protests spread in western Tibet, and added the police were "forced to fire warning shots" and had "dispersed the lawless mobsters." 
On 27 and 30 March, the suicides by two monks in Amdo have been reported by TCHRD as an act of freeing from oppression. Independent verification is however outstanding. 
South West is a constituency represented in the London Assembly.  It was represented, since its creation in 2000, by Tony Arbour, a Conservative from Richmond upon Thames. Following Tony Arbour's retirement, the seat was won by Nicholas Rogers in the 2021 election. 
It covers the combined area of the London Borough of Hounslow, the Royal Borough of Kingston upon Thames, and the London Borough of Richmond upon Thames. 
Below are the results for the candidate which received the highest share of the popular vote in the constituency at each mayoral election. 
This article about the geography of Henry County, Iowa is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Court Clerk's Office-County & Circuit, on East Court St. in Greensburg, Kentucky, was built in 1818.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1987. 
It is Federal in style, and was built of dry stone construction, the best building method available during Kentucky's settlement period.  The building served as the clerk's office until 1842.  After 1877 it was the home of "Aunt Eunice", a former slave.  The building was later bought and repaired by the City of Greensburg. 
This article about a property in Green County, Kentucky on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Burdur is located in the Lakes Region of Turkey and has many lakes of various sizes, the largest of which, Burdur Lake, is named after the province. Salda Lake is the second largest lake in the province and is considered to be one of the cleanest lakes in the world. 
This article about a Mediterranean Region of Turkey location is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pre-Islamic Arabic can be considered a polycentric language. In Arabic-speaking countries different levels of polycentricity can be detected. Modern Arabic is a pluricentric language with varying branches correlating with different regions where Arabic is spoken and the type of communities speaking it. The vernacular varieties of Arabic include: 
In addition, many speakers use Modern Standard Arabic in education and formal settings. Therefore, in Arabic-speaking communities, diglossia is frequent. 
The Armenian language is a pluricentric language with the liturgical Classical Armenian and two vernacular standards, Eastern Armenian and Western Armenian. Speakers outside of the former Armenian Soviet Socialist Republic (including all Western Armenians as well as Eastern Armenians in Iran) use the Classical Armenian orthography, while others adopt the reformed Armenian alphabet. 
British and American English are the two most commonly taught varieties in the education systems where English is taught as a second language. British English tends to predominate in other parts of Europe and the former British colonies of the West Indies, Africa, and Asia, where English is not the first language of the majority of the population. In contrast, American English tends to dominate instruction in Latin America, Liberia, and East Asia. 
Philippine English (which is predominantly spoken as a second language) has been primarily influenced by American English. The rise of the call center industry in the Philippines has encouraged some Filipinos to "polish" or neutralize their accents to make them more closely resemble the accents of their client countries. 
Countries such as Australia, New Zealand, and Canada have their own well-established varieties of English which are the standard within those countries but are far more rarely taught overseas to second language learners.[citation needed] 
English was historically pluricentric when it was used across the independent kingdoms of England and Scotland prior to the Acts of Union in 1707. English English and Scottish English are now subsections of British English. 
In the modern era, there are several major loci of the French language, including Standard French (also known as Parisian French), Canadian French (including Quebec French and Acadian French), American French (for instance, Louisiana French), Haitian French, and African French. 
Malayalam is a pluricentric language with historically more than one written form. Malayalam script is officially recognized, but there are other standardized varieties such as Arabi Malayalam of Mappila Muslims, Karshoni of Saint Thomas Christians and Judeo-Malayalam of Cochin Jews. 
The Persian language has three standard varieties with official status in Iran (locally known as Farsi), Afghanistan (officially known as Dari), and Tajikistan (officially known as Tajik). The standard forms of the three are based on the Tehrani, Kabuli, and Dushanbe varieties, respectively. 
The Persian alphabet is used for both Farsi (Iranian) and Dari (Afghan). Traditionally, Tajiki is also written with Perso-Arabic script. In order to increase literacy, a Latin alphabet (based on the Common Turkic Alphabet) was introduced in 1917. Later in the late 1930s, the Tajik Soviet Socialist Republic promoted the use of Cyrillic alphabet, which remains the most widely used system today. Attempts to reintroduce the Perso-Arabic script were made. 
The language spoken by Bukharan Jews is called Bukhori (or Bukharian), and is written in Hebrew alphabet. 
Brazilian and European Portuguese currently have two distinct, albeit similar, spelling standards. A unified orthography for the two varieties (including a limited number of words with dual spelling) has been approved by the national legislatures of Brazil and Portugal and is now official; see Spelling reforms of Portuguese for additional details. Formal written standards remain grammatically close to each other, despite some minor syntactic differences. 
Spanish has both national and regional linguistic norms, which vary in terms of vocabulary, grammar, and pronunciation, but all varieties are mutually intelligible and the same orthographic rules are shared throughout. 
In Spain, Standard Spanish is based upon the speech of educated speakers from Madrid. All varieties spoken in the Iberian Peninsula are grouped as Peninsular Spanish. Canarian Spanish (spoken in the Canary Islands), along with Spanish spoken in the Americas (including Spanish spoken in the United States, Central American Spanish, Mexican Spanish, Andean Spanish, and Caribbean Spanish), are particularly related to Andalusian Spanish. 
The United States is now the world's second-largest Spanish-speaking country after Mexico in total number of speakers (L1 and L2 speakers). A report said there are 41 million L1 Spanish speakers and another 11.6 million L2 speakers in the U.S. This puts the US ahead of Colombia (48 million) and Spain (46 million) and second only to Mexico (121 million). 
The Spanish of Latin Americans has a growing influence on the language across the globe through music, culture and television produced using the language of the largely bilingual speech community of US Latinos. 
Tamil is diglossic, with the literary variant used in books, poetry, speeches and news broadcasts while the spoken variant is used in everyday speech, online messaging and movies. While there are significant differences in the standard spoken forms of the different countries, the literary register is mostly uniform, with some differences in semantics that are not perceived by native speakers. There has been no attempt to compile a dictionary of Sri Lankan Tamil. 
As a result of the Pure Tamil Movement, Indian Tamil tends to avoid loanwords to a greater extent than Sri Lankan Tamil. Coinages of new technical terms also differ between the two. Tamil policy in Singapore and Malaysia tends to follow that of Tamil Nadu regarding linguistic purism and technical coinages. 
There are some spelling differences, particularly in the greater use of Grantha letters to write loanwords and foreign names in Sri Lanka, Singapore and Malaysia. The Tamil Nadu script reform of 1978 has been accepted in Singapore and Malaysia, but not Sri Lanka. 
Patricia Annie Kaliati is a Malawian politician and former educator who has held various ministerial positions in the Cabinet of Malawi. 
Patricia Kaliati was born in 1967 in the village Nkando, Mulanje, Southern Region, Malawi. She trained as a teacher in 1988 receiving a  Primary School Teaching Certificate from Bembeke Teachers College and later obtained a Diploma in Human Resource Management. Upon completion of her formal education, she taught in primary and secondary schools from 1993 to 1999.  She is a staunch Catholic. 
In the May 2009 elections Patricia Kaliati was again elected on the Democratic Progressive Party ticket. Kaliati was appointed Minister of Gender, Children and Community Development in the cabinet that became effective on 15 June 2009. She was dropped from the cabinet on 9 August 2010.  She was appointed Minister of Information and Civic Education in September 2011. 
Summers appeared as Bertha/Clara in 32 episodes of The Andy Griffith Show and was one of only a few characters (the others being Andy Taylor, Aunt Bee, and Opie Taylor) who appeared in all eight seasons of the show's run. The character migrated to the show's spin-off series Mayberry R.F.D.. 
Clara is a descendant of the town's settlers, and a widow. (However, in Episode 14 of Season 6, she pointedly tells the guest character, Harlan Robinson, played by Woody Chambliss, that she is not "Mrs." but "Miss" Edwards.) She has a brother (who never appears on the show), and an adult nephew Ferdie, who makes one appearance. She also has a son, Gale, who never appears on the show. She occasionally looks after Sheriff Andy Taylor and son Opie, when their Aunt Bee is out of town. 
Clara and Bee rival for the attentions of visiting single gentlemen, one of whom is Hubert Saint John,  who takes a fancy to Bee as she reminds him of his late wife. When Bee cuts ties, Clara attempts to charm him. 
In season one of TAGS, the character appeared twice (including Episode #23) as "Bertha Edwards". In the second season she became "Clara Johnson" and remained so until the fifth-season episode "The Pageant," when she morphed into "Clara Edwards." She remained Clara Edwards until the end of the series' run with the exception of "Bargain Day" when Mr. Foley refers to her as Mrs. Johnson. In spite of the name changes, the character was the same. 
The mid-island resort has an intentionally rustic theme and this property very much caters to kids. The rooms, grounds and location clearly accommodate a family crowd. 
The rooms are spacious, clean and have kitchens and balconies. "South Carolina Lowcountry" is the theme and style of Disney's Hilton Head Island resort. The grounds are well-kept and modern, with amenities that include hammocks and grills. 
Disney Hilton Head is top-heavy with activities for children, including nature programs, campfires, magic shows, "Kids Night Out", crabbing, art, swimming pool & pool games, biking, kayaking, tennis and more things to do. 
The Disney Hilton Head resort is on Hilton Head's Broad Creek, which is technically a land locked tidal marsh. A shuttle bus transports guests to the Disney Beach House in Palmetto Dunes, which is about a mile-and-a-half away. There guests enjoy a private swimming pool with bathrooms and a snack shop right on the Atlantic Ocean. 
Signals and Tide Me Over both serve American Casual themed lunch; however, at the main resort Tide Me Over also serves breakfast. 
Sahlin began making puppets at age 11, initially building a shadow theater and cardboard figurines. As an adult he built several puppets for Kukla, Fran and Ollie and created special effects sequences for films such as G.I. Blues and The Time Machine. 
This article about an artist from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dalian Neusoft University of Information is ranked 97th in WURI Global Top 100 Innovative Universities Ranking 2021. 
The Dalian Neusoft University of Information opened in Dalian (Liaoning province) as a joint venture of Neusoft Group (60%) and Dalian Software Park Co., Ltd. (40%), as a private university attached to Northeastern University, Shenyang.  
In 2001, the Neusoft Institute Guangdong (Formerly known as Nanhai Neusoft Institute of Information) opened at Nanhai Software Park in Foshan (Guangdong province), as well as the Chengdu Neusoft University in Dujiangyan, near Chengdu (Sichuan Province). 
During the Sichuan earthquake in 2008, the campus at Chengdu was damaged. Approximately 3,000 students had to move to the Dalian campus. 
Each year, 4,000 new students are admitted to the Dalian campus. Graduation is possible in the following subjects: 
Ray Mason was an Australian rugby league footballer who played in the 1950s for South Sydney as a halfback. He played for the club during their golden era in the 1950s, when the club won 5 premierships with Mason being a member in 3 of those premiership victories. 
Mason coached the third grade South Sydney side from 1958 to 1965, and guided them to a premiership in 1963.  He was made a life member of the club in 1965, and served as a committee member.  Mason later became director of the South Sydney leagues club for seven years. 
She contracted malaria during her work at the hospital, and its lasting effects meant that she could not work after the war. Her congressman, William W. Rice, recommended that she receive a federal pension for her service. She was granted a pension of $12 per month by an act of Congress, in 1887. 
Adeliza Perry donated two eighteenth-century items to the American Antiquarian Society in 1866. She returned to educational work; she taught school in Worcester from 1867, and through the 1870s. She published two more books after the war, A Windfall (1880) and The Schoolmaster's Trial (1881). 
Germany felt threatened by Russia, responding with its own mobilization and a declaration of war on 1 August 1914. At the outset of hostilities, Russian forces led offensives against both Germany and Austria-Hungary. 
Defeat in the 1905 Russo-Japanese War and Britain's isolation during the 1899-1902 Second Boer War led both parties to seek allies. The Anglo-Russian Convention of 1907 settled disputes in Asia and allowed the establishment of the Triple Entente with France, which was still largely informal. In 1908, Austria-Hungary annexed the former Ottoman province of Bosnia and Herzegovina, and Russia responded by creating the Balkan League to prevent further Austrian expansion. 
In the 1912-1913 First Balkan War, Serbia, Bulgaria and Greece captured most of the remaining Ottoman possessions in Europe. Disputes over their division resulted in the Second Balkan War in which Bulgaria was comprehensively defeated by its former allies. 
On 30 July, Russia declared general mobilisation in support of Serbia. On 1 August, Germany declared war on Russia, followed by Austria-Hungary on the 6th. Russia and the Entente declared war on the Ottoman Empire in November 1914, after Ottoman warships had bombarded the Black Sea port of Odessa in late October. Unlike its Allies, the Russian Empire was one contiguous landmass, but it also considered itself the defender of its fellow Slavs in places like Serbia. 
At the outbreak of war, each of the European powers began to publish selected, and sometimes misleading, compendia of diplomatic correspondence, seeking to establish justification for their own entry into the war, and to cast blame on other actors. The first of these color books to appear was the German White Book which appeared on 4 August 1914, the same day as Britain's war declaration. The British Blue Book came out two days later, followed by the Russian Orange Book in mid-August. 
Gradually, a war of attrition set in on the vast Eastern Front; the Russians were facing the combined forces of Germany and Austria-Hungary and suffered staggering losses. General Anton Denikin, retreating from Galicia wrote: 
Historians on the origin of the First World War have emphasized the role of Germany and Austria-Hungary. The consensus of scholars includes scant mention of Russia and only brief mentions of Russia's defense of Orthodox Serbia, its pan-Slavic roles, its treaty obligations with France, and its concern for protecting its status as a great power. 
Since 2019 he remains under arrest for a wide variety of crimes. He is charged with money laundering, tax evasion and document fraud. 
Nikolai Banev graduated from the Russian Language School in Haskovo, then Bulgarian Philology at Plovdiv University "of Plovdiv" and Labour Economics at HIE "Karl Marx". 
In 1990 he created one of the first private companies in Bulgaria. The company starts as one of the first security companies in Haskovo. Founders are Nikolai Banev Rosen Arakliev, the son of the commander of the partisan unit "Zlatarov" Ivan Arakliev Regiment. Kostadinov. 
In 2000, he bought about 70 thousand. USD complex "Kavaci" and camping "Garden", "Kavaci", "Goldfish", "Veselie" and "Chernomorets", Sozopol residence and restaurant "Wine Cellar" Tavern "and" horizon 'in Sozopol. 
Nikolai Banev was accused in dozens of cases of deliberate bankruptcy of over 100 privatized enterprises. Banev were brought against dozens of civil claims by residents of the town usurpation of private property and unauthorized use. Lawsuits are kept for unpaid wages of employees in numerous companies. 
Chairman and member of several non-profit organizations, including "Democracy Network"; "Southern Spring"; International Music Academy "Rusalka" and others. 
In 1997/98, he was president of PFC "Pirin" Blagoevgrad, briefly sponsor of September (Sofia), then became the owner of Beroe. 
Nikolai Banev had three marriages. His first wife, Krasimira, had a daughter. His second wife was a poet and public figure, Dochka Baneva, who died in 2005, from which they had a son. The third wife of Nicholas Banev is Eugenia Baneva who is the CEO of TX Rusalka Holidays. By Eugenia Baneva they have four children. Banev has a grandson. 
They were nominated for the Latin Grammy Awards of 2004 in the category "Best New Artist" but lost to Maria Rita. They were nominated again for the Latin Grammy Awards of 2009 in the category "Best Tropical Song". 
He played his first match for the Namibian cricket team in December 2006, as an opening batsman. In the second innings of his cricketing career, he was dismissed for a golden duck by Jandre Coetzee. 
This biographical article related to Namibian cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Subsequently, Coughlan applied for judicial review of the Health Authority's decision to close Mardon, and asserted that the Authority had acted unlawfully "in breaking the recent and unequivocal promise given by it that the applicant and their patients could lived there for as long as they chose". 
The Health Authority appealed against the decision of the High Court to the Court of Appeal of England and Wales. It contended that the promise was not one that was absolute and unqualified, and there were compelling public interests which justified the Health Authority's decision to close Mardon House. 
The Health Authority was unable to show that there were overriding public interest considerations which warranted a departure from the promise. The Court also took into account the fact that the Authority had failed to mention any alternative accommodation to be offered to the applicant. Thus, it concluded that the decision to close Mardon House constituted unfairness amounting to an abuse of power. 
... a more precise, structured test of review than the notion of abuse of power applied in Coughlan. When faced with a conflict between a legitimate expectation and an administrative decision purporting to achieve some objective, the court would check whether that action was necessary and suited to attain the objective, and whether it imposed excessive burdens upon the individual.
Iain Steele goes so far as to say: "In Coughlan, proportionality is the test that dare not speak its name". 
Stiliana's father, Iliya Dyakov was a football player who represented Bulgaria at the 1986 Football World Cup in Mexico. Her mother, Paulina Nikolova, was a group rhythmic gymnast, competing for Bulgaria and is the 1985 World Group All-Around champion. Stiliana has one sister, Paola, and a brother, Denis. 
She competed at the 2019 Bulgarian Junior National Championships where she won gold medal in All-around, Ball and Ribbon final, and silver medal in Rope and Clubs final. She competed at the 2019 Junior World Championships in Moscow, Russia where she placed 8th in Team competition and 16th in Clubs qualifications. 
W. Dale Warren is an American-born conductor. He is the senior Wind band director at the University of Arkansas and the professor of Music. 
He was born in Greenville, Kentucky, United States. He attended Muhlenberg Central High School where he played the euphonium in the band under the director Joe Allen. Warren received his bachelor's degree in music education from Austin Peay State University. W. Dale Warren received his masters of Music Education from University of Kentucky. 
Professor Warren worked at Bremen High School in Bremen, Kentucky (1980-1982) and at North Hardin High School in Radcliffe Kentucky (1982-1986). Warren was also the Associate band director at the University of Kentucky (1986-1991). Former University of Arkansas Razorback Marching band (1991-2000). Current senior wind band director at the University of Arkansas. 
Professor Warren has six guest appearances with the UA wind symphony at College Band Directors National Association. In 2000 the University of Arkansas performed at Carnegie Hall in New York City. During Warren's tenure as the director of the University of Arkansas Razorback Marching Band performed for President Bill Clinton multiple times and performed as the Grand Finale Band St. Patrick's Day Parade in Dublin, Ireland. 
Born in Marseille, France, she was the daughter of Henri Louis Firmin Clair Simon, a  French Jewish engineer and airplane pilot in World War II who died in a concentration camp, and Erma Maria Domenica Giorcelli, an Italian housewife. Before settling and growing up in Marseille, Simon lived in Madagascar, Budapest, Turin, and Berlin. She went to Paris in 1931 and worked briefly as a singer, model, and fashion designer. She also at one point wanted to become a sculptor. 
She returned to France to act, and appeared in La Ronde (Roundabout, 1950). Her film roles were few after this and she made her final film appearance in 1973. 
In 2011, British actor and writer Stephen Mosley paid tribute to her in his acclaimed book of strange tales The Boy Who Loved Simone Simon. 
Duane Paul Ludwig (born August 4, 1978) is an American mixed martial arts coach, retired professional kickboxer and mixed martial artist. 
Ludwig was trained by Bas Rutten during his early career. Although not an official title match, Ludwig nonetheless beat Jens Pulver, who was at the time ranked as the #1 Lightweight mixed martial artist in the world by many outlets, by first round K.O. 
On December 17, it was announced that Ludwig was set to return to the UFC at UFC 108, facing Jim Miller, replacing an injured Sean Sherk. He lost to Miller via armbar in the first round. 
Ludwig was scheduled to face Spencer Fisher on March 21, 2010, at UFC LIVE: Vera vs. Jones, but Fisher was forced off the card with an injury.  Ludwig instead faced UFC newcomer Darren Elkins.  Ludwig lost via TKO after he suffered a serious ankle injury during the first round. 
Ludwig was expected to face Amir Sadollah on March 26, 2011, at UFC Fight Night 24, but was unable to fight due to a sternum injury.  James Wilks took his place in the match instead. 
Ludwig vs. Sadollah eventually took place on August 14, 2011, at UFC on Versus 5. Ludwig won the fight via unanimous decision (29-28, 29-28, 29-28). Ludwig outstruck and rocked Sadollah in both the first and second rounds while also showing greatly improved takedown defense throughout the fight. 
Ludwig next faced Josh Neer on January 20, 2012, at UFC on FX: Guillard vs. Miller.  Despite hurting Neer on several occasions via punches, Ludwig lost the fight via technical submission in the first round. 
Ludwig fought Dan Hardy on May 26, 2012, at UFC 146. Ludwig suffered a knockout loss to Hardy when he was hit by a flush left hook and followed up elbows. 
Ludwig faced Che Mills on September 29, 2012, at UFC on Fuel TV 5.  The bout was stopped after Ludwig was unable to continue after tearing a knee ligament while attempting to defend a takedown in the opening round. 
From December 2012 to May 2014, Ludwig was the head coach at Team Alpha Male. Ludwig left Team Alpha Male after UFC 173 to focus on growing his own gym, BANG Muay Thai. 
Ludwig and his wife Jessica have three children; one daughter Jade, a son named Duane Jr., on November 10, 2010, and a son named Carter Bas Ludwig born in 2013.  Before becoming a professional fighter, Ludwig used to work as an electrician. 
Before his move to Colorado, Ludwig previously served as the camp's head coach, where his impact was believed to have had the "missing link" in elevating the team as one of the gold standards for training camps in the world. Ludwig has been voted the Coach of the Year in 2013 and 2014.  Ludwig was considered the key element in helping Team Alpha Male win Gym of the Year in 2013 by the World MMA Awards. 
Ludwig created BANG Muay Thai system (or BMT) which is a Muay Thai system. The philosophy draws upon experience from Ludwig's career and coaches such as Bas Rutten and Trevor Wittman.  The system is a striking style which includes Muay Thai, Dutch kickboxing, American boxing and traditional martial arts. Approximately 40 schools teach BMT.[citation needed] 
In October 2010, Ludwig opened his own Mixed Martial Arts Academy known as "Ludwig Martial Arts" where he trains fighters such as former UFC Bantamweight Champion TJ Dillashaw and perennial UFC Flyweight contender Joseph Benavidez as well as several others. 
Central High School is a public high school located in the unincorporated community of Pollok and classified as a 3A school by the UIL. It is part of the Central Independent School District serving students in northwest Angelina County, Texas. In 2015, the school was rated "Met Standard" by the Texas Education Agency. 
Juvenile xanthogranuloma  is a form of histiocytosis, classified as "non-Langerhans cell histiocytosis", or more specifically, "type 2". 
This article about an artist from the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a church building or other Christian place of worship in Poland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Enfant Bastard (also known as Les Enfant Bastard) is the performing name for Cameron 'Cammy' Watt, a musician and artist formerly based in Edinburgh, Scotland who has released albums spanning a number of genres including indie, alt-folk, Lo-fi, Chip music and House. He now resides in Gothenburg, Sweden where we works as an artist. 
Enfant Bastard was a prominent member of Edinburgh's alternative music scene of the 2000s alongside artists such as Meursault and Withered Hand. His work has been critically acclaimed in the Scottish music press, and he has been described by The Scotsman as 'Edinburgh's most beguiling musical innovator' and as a 'lo-fi genius' by The Skinny. He was also important in introducing Chip Music to Scotland. 
He moved to Gothenburg in 2012, where he now works as an artist. He held his first solo exhibition in Spring 2014 at the Lilla Galeriet. His artwork has appeared on the cover of releases by Wet Paint and Meursault. 
His early releases were largely guitar based songs described variously as indie, folk, and anti-folk. He later began releasing music in the chip tune genre, recorded mostly using a game boy, and he became influential in introducing the genre to Scotland, paving the way for artists such as Unicorn Kid. 
The Hogarth Shakespeare project was an effort by Hogarth Press to retell works by William Shakespeare for a more modern audience. To do this, Hogarth commissioned well-known writers to select and re-imagine the plays. 
Additionally, as far back as 2014, Gillian Flynn was supposed to be working on a re-telling of Hamlet, eventually due for release in 2021. but there is no longer a mention of this on the website of the publisher. 
In June 2013, Random House announced the Hogarth Shakespeare series, as part of which well-known novelists re-tell a selection of Shakespeare's plays. Hogarth intended to release the series in 2016 to coincide with the four-hundredth anniversary of Shakespeare's death.  
The Hogarth Shakespeare series intends to reimagine the entire canon, but no other adaptations have been announced. Sometimes before March 2021, what was the official URL for the series (hogarthshakespeare.com) started to link to the site of an online magazine specialising in animes and mangas, called Anime Shakespeare, which, together with the lack of an announcement for a new title in over two years, seems to imply that the project has been quietly shut down by Hogarth/Penguin. 
Winterson's The Gap of Time was a finalist for the 2016 Lambda Literary Awards in the category Bisexual Fiction. 
His major works include Reflections on Fieldwork in Morocco (1977 and 2007), Michel Foucault: Beyond Structuralism and Hermeneutics (1983) (with Hubert Dreyfus), The Foucault Reader (1984), French Modern: Norms and Forms of the Social Environment (1989), Making PCR: A Story of Biotechnology (1993), Essays on the Anthropology of Reason (1996), Anthropos Today: Reflections on Modern Equipment (2003), and Marking Time: On the Anthropology of the Contemporary (2007). 
As such, the Anthropology of the Contemporary consists of analytic work that helps develop modes of inquiry into under-determined, emergent and discordant relations. It seeks to develop methods, practices, and forms of inquiry and narration coherent and co-operable with understandings of the mode (or modes) taken by anthropos as figure and an assemblage today. 
Inquiry into the contemporary is both analytic and synthetic. It is analytic in that sets of relations must be decomposed and specified, synthetic in that these relations must be recomposed and given new form. In this sense, work on the contemporary falls within a zone of analytic consideration in that it consists of linking the recent past to the near future and the near future to the recent past. 
If the challenge of contemporary equipment is to develop a mode of thinking as ethical practice, it also involves the design or redesign of venues within which such formation is possible. Rabinow deals directly with the problem of venues in the work Synthetic Anthropos (with Gaymon Bennett) (2009). In that work Rabinow and Bennett argue that the question of where and how the composition of equipment takes place is itself a primary problem site. 
Rabinow called for the invention of new modes of collaboration where problem-spaces are unstable or emergent, and where prior problems and their significance can no longer be taken for granted and can fruitfully be contested. Such situations require the reworking of existing modes of reasoning and intervention, adjusting these modes to the topography of the emerging problem-space. It follows that collaboration is a mode of work appropriate to the anthropology of the contemporary 
Case work functions as an exercise in framing problems so as to identify potentially significant elements, relations, and interfaces. Case work underscores questions of how such material should be presented. Case work can indicate strengths and weaknesses in the venues in which inquiry is initiated and formed. Casework, therefore, is an essential aspect of inquiry neither reducible to theory nor an end-in-itself. 
(d) New Venues of Knowledge and Commerce: The Rise of Biotech Start-up Companies, (Cetus Corporation 1980s). 
(f) Philosophy as Inquiry: Fieldwork in Philosophy (Encountering Hubert Dreyfus, Robert Bellah and Michel Foucault, 1976-84). 
The Wabash Canal was completed in 1843 and the Miami and Erie Canal in 1845, but they only operated for about ten years before they started shutting down. The last canalboat on the Wabash canal made its last docking in 1874 in Huntington, Indiana, but other sections shut down years earlier. For instance, the section through Fort Wayne, Indiana had been sold in 1870, and filled in so the Pennsylvania Railroad could lay tracks.  
For twenty years, the reservoir provided little for area residents but a mosquito-breeding ground for the spread of "ague", a local term for what was later recognized as malaria. An effort had been made to have the State of Ohio abandon the reservoir, but the bill failed to pass.  
On the night of April 25, 1887, a band of some 200 men, residents of the county, proceeded to the lower end of the reservoir. They captured the guard and tended to his minor self-inflicted gunshot wounds; nobody else fired a shot. The band dynamited two locks, and spent the entire night cutting the dikes with pick and spade. Although this still did not entirely drain the reservoir, it was mortally wounded. The reservoir and canal were later abandoned by the state.  
The band attacking the reservoir wall carried a flag bearing the slogan, "No Compromise!"  The seal of Paulding County, Ohio bears this motto today. 
Football Huddle was a Canadian sports talk show television series which aired on CBC Television in 1960. 
This talk show concerned Canadian football topics, particularly college football. Series regulars on the panel were sportscasters Steve Douglas and Fred Sgambati with Lou Agase, who coached the Toronto Argonauts. Various guests were featured on their panel. 
This half-hour series was broadcast on Friday evenings at various times from September to December 1960. 
He is a professor at Tama Art University (Painting Department printmaking course), a member of "The Japan Print Association" and a member of "Japan Artists Association, Inc.". 
British Museum / Royal Academy of arts (the U.K.) Rue yellowtail hole international print center (Slovenia) Washington State University / Pueblo Museum (U.S.A.) Guanajuato state establishment Alhondiga de Granaditas Museum / Diego Rivera Museum (Mexico) Ticotin Japan Museum (Israel) New South Wales art museum (Australia) New Zealand National Gallery (New Zealand) Taipei City art museum (the Republic of China) Silpakorn University (Thailand) Ilmin Museum (Korea) 
Year 71 BC was a year of the pre-Julian Roman calendar. At the time it was known as the Year of the Consulship of Lentulus and Orestes (or, less frequently, year 683 Ab urbe condita). The denomination 71 BC for this year has been used since the early medieval period, when the Anno Domini calendar era became the prevalent method in Europe for naming years. 
Peter Nworah (born 15 December 1990) is a Nigerian footballer who plays for Al-Markhiya as a forward . 
This biographical article related to a football forward from Nigeria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It is a complex of buildings that is conformed by theaters, art school, galleries and cinema. From the beginning of functions, the Centro Cultural Genaro Estrada has been an essential space for the development of the cultural life of Sinaloa. Opened in 1980, with the purpose of encouraging artistic and cultural activity in the state, has been the forum in which various cultural programs have been developed covering the most diverse artistic activities aimed at all ages. 
Since the 70s the building was abandoned by its partners. However, for all that meant as undisputed meeting place for the local society for many years, the casino was rescued in 1994 by a decree of expropriation by the municipality, which respected much of its original structure. Thus, and as Casino de la Cultura, again has a chance to be reused, this time as a cultural center. 
The building is located within the Constitution Civic Center complex, that integrates libraries, sports areas and zoo. His style is inscribed within the mainstream of architectural functionalism, with a simplicity and effectiveness of that era. 
The Sinaloa Art Museum (MASIN) is one of the most important venues for the exhibition of hundreds of visual arts assemblies in Culiacan: exhibitions of painting, sculpture, photography, drawing, graphics, installation, video and art-object; and is a key forum for performing arts, cultural and academic events, as concerts, book presentations, conferences, symposia and workshops of various artistic disciplines. 
The building that houses it was built in 1837, and in 1890 it was remodeled by architect Luis F. Molina to become the Municipal Palace. From 1980 it was used as the headquarters of the municipal police. In 1990 it was renovated to accommodate the museum and opened as such on November 21, 1991. 
Opened in December 958, is undoubtedly an icon of the city, the zoo, is its most iconic image; currently, hanged by the space and the problem of their livelihood, remains being one of the most popular recreation centers in the capital. 
Wild Mouse is a steel roller coaster currently operating at Lagoon Amusement Park in Farmington, Utah. 
Wild Mouse opened as a wooden roller coaster in 1965 after being relocated from the Seattle World's Fair. After operating in its location in Lagoon's North Midway, it was eventually retired in 1971.  
In 1973, the Wild Mouse roller coaster returned to Lagoon as "The New Wilder Wild Mouse." The new version of the ride was located at the South Midway, in the same location where the current Wild Mouse operates. Since this ride featured the same layout and look of the previous Wild Mouse, it's assumed this is the same ride installed in 1965. This version of the ride operated until 1989, when Lagoon decided to retire the Wild Mouse again.  
A common myth among local Utah residents is that one of these Wild Mouse coasters has had one or more severe accidents causing injury or death. However, there has been no verifiable evidence to conclude there has ever been a major incident on any Wild Mouse ride at Lagoon.  
Wild Mouse originally had a purple and yellow color scheme, but it was repainted green and yellow for the 2013 season. Cars are painted to look like cats or mice to fit the theme of the ride. 
This biographical article about a Czech politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Klubi Sportiv Studenti is an Albanian sports club based in the country's capital Tirana, which represents the University of Tirana. The club consists of various departments including basketball, volleyball shooting and judo. The club is funded by the Ministry of Education and Sport 
Michael Whitaker (born 17 March 1960) is a British Olympic equestrian rider, who competes in the sport of show jumping. He was ranked 5th by the British Showjumping Association in March 2014. 
Younger brother of John Whitaker, Michael began competing on ponies at the age of 5. At the age of 16, he made his debut in international competitions and in 1980 he became the second youngest winner of the Hickstead Derby, at the age of 20. In September 1993 he took over from his brother John as the internationally top-ranked show jumping rider.[citation needed] 
In December 1980, Michael married Belgian show jumper Veronique. They separated in 1997, and later divorced 
Michael and Melissa married on the 13 August 2013 in a registry office in Nottinghamshire. They live at Whatton, Nottinghamshire with their children  Jack, Molly and Katy. 
Memory is commonly referred to as the ability to encode, store, retain and subsequently recall information and past experiences in the human brain. This process involves many proteins, one of which is the Histone-binding protein RbAp48 (also known as RBBP4 or NURF55), encoded by the RBBP4 gene in humans. 
The Horizon Air Summer Series was a unique 11-week baseball competition among collegiate summer baseball clubs. 
The Summer Series was founded in 2005 by Bob Bavasi, former owner of the Everett Aqua Sox, of the Northwest League. It is sponsored by Alaska Airlines' sister company, Horizon Air. It is hosted by the Marysville Gold Sox of Marysville, California. 
Among other leagues, teams from the Alaska Baseball League, West Coast Baseball League, Pacific International League, Southern California Collegiate Baseball Association, Sierra Baseball League, and California Collegiate League have competed in the series. 
The series was originally made up of two divisions: The 40-game "McCullough Division" and the 20-game "Engelken Division". In 2008 the series was expanded with the addition of a third division, the "Bavasi Division", named after the series founder's father and former Brooklyn Dodger and Los Angeles Dodger General Manager Emil "Buzzie" Bavasi. 
The grey nightjar (Caprimulgus jotaka) is a species of nightjar found in East Asia. It is sometimes treated as a subspecies of the jungle nightjar (C. indicus), its South Asian relative. 
The family name originated in the adoption of the additional surname of 'Brock' by Thomas Clutton, J.P., D.L., of Pensax Court, Worcestershire, in 1809, as per a stipulation in the will of his maternal great-uncle, Thomas Brock, of Chester, Cheshire, in which county the Clutton family had been resident since the reign of Henry III. 
Future Jihad: Terrorist Strategies Against America is a book by Middle East expert and scholar Walid Phares. 
In this book Walid Phares presents his analysis of the Jihadist movement and the strategies it employs in its war against America and Western governments. Its influence in Republican circles was demonstrated by the fact that in 2007 it was listed as one of six books for the party's representatives to read during the summer recess. 
This article about a book on politics of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The construction works of the church started in November 1895 within the framework of the construction of the Neustadt district. The church was designed by architect Ludwig Becker from Mainz, whose preliminary draft was selected during an architectural competition in 1893. After several years of construction works, the church was consecrated on 28 May 1899. It was originally the church of the Catholic garrison of the city. 
On 21 February 2013, the church was vandalised by a man who damaged about fifteen statues and laid an Islamic prayer rug and a Qur'an which he had stolen in a mosque. The man probably suffered from mental illness. 
A 1897 cast of Paul Dubois's statue of Joan of Arc is located to the east of St Maurice's Church. The statue used to stand at the entrance of the church but was moved after Place Arnold was renovated. 
The main altar shows the life of St. Maurice, while the upper crucifix is surrounded by representations of St. Mary and St. John. 
The organ of the church was made by Friedrich Weigle in 1899. It has 43 stops and 3 keyboards, as follows: 
Today, Sudbury retains its status as a market town with a twice-weekly market in the town centre in front of St Peter's Church, which is now a local community point for events such as concerts and exhibitions. In sport, the town has a semi-professional football club, A.F.C. Sudbury, which competes at the seventh level of the football pyramid. 
The Church of All Saints was established in the 12th century before being bought by Adam the Monk, who then passed the church and its lands to the Abbey of St Albans. St Bartholemew's Benedictine Priory and the Chapel of Holy Sepulchre were also established in the 12th century. 
A community of Dominicans established Sudbury Priory in the mid-13th century and gradually extended the size of their priory, which was one of three Dominican priories in the county of Suffolk. A leper hospital was founded on the outskirts of the town in 1272. 
Sudbury was one of the first towns in which Edward III settled the Flemings, allowing the weaving and silk industries to prosper for centuries during the Late Middle Ages. As the main town in the area, Sudbury prospered too, and many great houses and churches were built, giving the town a major historical legacy. The Woolsack in the House of Lords was originally stuffed with wool from the Sudbury area, a sign of both the importance of the wool industry and of the wealth of the donors. 
Sudbury and the surrounding area, like much of East Anglia, was a hotbed of Puritan sentiment during much of the 17th century. Sudbury was among the towns called "notorious wasps' nests of dissent." During the 1630s, many families departed for the Massachusetts Bay Colony as part of the wave of emigration that occurred during the Great Migration. 
In 1705 the River Stour Navigation Act was passed in Parliament, and work was undertaken to make the river navigable all the way from Manningtree. 
By the 18th century the fees charged to become a freeman, with voting rights, were exorbitant and the borough of Sudbury, along with 177 other English towns, was reformed by a Municipal Reform Act (1835). 
The 1832 Reform Act saw the villages of Ballingdon and Brundon appended to the town. In the 1841 general election Sudbury became the first place in the UK to elect a member of an ethnic minority to parliament, with David Ochterlony Dyce Sombre, the son of an Indian queen, winning the seat. However, he was not allowed to take his place in parliament as he was subsequently declared insane. 
A new workhouse was built in 1836 off Walnut Tree Lane, close to St Gregory's church. From 1946, with the foundation of the National Health Service, it became the local cottage hospital. 
Sudbury's Catholic Church, Our Lady Immaculate and St. John the Evangelist, was designed by Leonard Stokes and erected in 1893. The shrine of Our Lady of Sudbury sits within its nave. 
The Sudbury Society was formed in 1973 after a successful campaign to save the town's corn exchange from developers. However, in protecting its ancient centre the town has not shut itself off from modern development. As the town has expanded (to a population in 2005 of 12,080) modern retail and industrial developments have been added on sites close to the centre and on the eastern edge at Chilton. The 18th and 19th century houses near the town centre have been added to by modern developments. 
Sudbury was a borough, with its headquarters at Sudbury Town Hall, until the local government reorganisation of 1974. Since then it has been a civil parish. Being an urban area the parish council and its chair are known as the 'Town Council' and 'Town Mayor' respectively. The parish is part of Babergh, a district covered by Suffolk County Council. 
Sudbury is served by a daily newspaper, the East Anglian Daily Times, owned by the Archant group. There are also two weekly newspapers, both published on a Thursday. The Sudbury Mercury, again owned by Archant, is delivered free to households, and the Suffolk Free Press, owned by Anglia Newspapers, is sold in shops around south Suffolk and north Essex. 
The Kingfisher Leisure Centre, next to the railway station, has a 25m swimming pool, sauna, fitness centre and a soft play area for children. It is home to Sudbury Storms Swimming Club. 
Sudbury Rowing Club, formerly Sudbury Boat Club, was founded in 1874 and has held a regatta in the town every year since, except during the world wars. It has a boathouse and clubhouse in Quay Lane and rows on a 1500m stretch of the Stour by Friars Meadow. 
St Peter's Church, Sudbury a former church crowning the top of the Market Hill in the centre of Sudbury is now used as a cultural venue for live music and other performances, art exhibitions, and markets.  St Peter's is currently in the delivery phase of a major regeneration project to conserve and refurbish the building, lead by The Churches Conservation Trust. 
Valley Walk cycle route and footpath, starts at the Sudbury water meadows and continues along the disused railway track, finishing close to Long Melford Country Park, and then connects to Melford Walk. 
 Children's author Dodie Smith lived near to Sudbury, and part of her famous novel The Hundred and One Dalmatians, which inspired the Disney film One Hundred and One Dalmatians, takes place in the town including St Peter's Church.
Just before midnight they came to the market town of Sudbury. Pongo paused as they crossed the bridge over the River Stour. "Here we enter Suffolk" he said, triumphantly. They ran on through the quiet streets of old houses and into the market square. They had hoped they might meet some dog and hear if any news of the puppies had come at the Twilight Barking, but not so much as a cat was stirring. While they were drinking at the fountain, church clocks began to strike midnight.
By road, Sudbury is served by the A131 which runs from near Little Waltham, north of Chelmsford in Essex, and the A134 which runs from Colchester in Essex, through Bury St Edmunds, past Thetford in Norfolk to its west, before merging with the A10 south of King's Lynn. There is a taxi rank for Hackney carriages at Old Market Place. The bus station on Hamilton Road in the town centre provides services to neighbouring places, operated by Chambers and other operators. 
The Canadian city of Greater Sudbury, Ontario (formerly known as Sudbury and still referred to as Sudbury in everyday usage) was named after Sudbury, becoming a settlement in 1883 following the discovery of rich nickel and copper ores there during the construction of the Canadian Pacific Railway. The superintendent of the railway construction project James Worthington was married to Caroline Hitchcock, a woman who had been born in Sudbury, Suffolk, and the name was chosen to honour her. 
Sudbury has two namesakes in the New England region of the United States: Sudbury, Massachusetts, and Sudbury, Vermont. 
From 1970 to 1973, Limmer was selected by his fellow City Commissioners as Mayor. Under Limmer, the city agreed to acquire property and transfer those properties plus Wilson Park and parking lot & structures to the University of Michigan for its Flint branch campus to locate down town. 
Limmer was caught up in financial law violations for registration and anti-fraud regarding promissory notes from GT&T Limited Partnerships from 1987 to 1990. He was order on September 13, 1993 to stop violating federal securities acts. 
The CSX Bellwood Subdivision James River Bridge is a plate girder bridge that carries the Bellwood Subdivision over the James River in Richmond, Virginia.  The bridge was built by the Seaboard Air Line Railroad between 1897 and 1900. 
The bridge begins just south of the Main Street Station and constitutes the middle part of the Triple Crossing, going under the Rivanna Subdivision and over the Richmond District (Norfolk Southern) prior to crossing the James River. 
This article about a specific rail bridge in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Great Dinosaur Robbery is a now out-of-print book released in 1970 and written by David Eliades and Robert Forrest Webb under the pseudonym of David Forrest. The book was later the basis for the 1975 film One of Our Dinosaurs Is Missing. 
The film differed greatly from the book in the sense that it was aimed at children rather than adults, with the violence and sexual references toned down considerably. The setting was also changed from New York City to England, principally London, and the time period changed to the 1920s. In the book, the villains were agents of communist China, but the film featured agents from post-World War I China, with the Cold War undertones practically non-existent. 
Bart Davenport and Tony Sevener originate from California, while RV Salters was born in Paris and lived in France until joining the Quannum Projects in 1999. RV Salters displays a unique style of dancing while playing keyboard during their performances. They mostly perform in the San Francisco Bay Area, for example at notable places like The Independent. 
A cut-down version of Honeycut's song "Exodus Honey" released in 2006 was used by Apple for the late-2007 iMac commercial and the welcome video that plays upon installation of both Mac OS X Leopard and its successor Mac OS X Snow Leopard. 
On 4 April 2011, Honeycut released their second album, Comedians, for download only in France from iTunes and the Amazon MP3 store.  This is their first release on Discograph records. In February 2012, Honeycut released Comedians in the United States, for download only from iTunes and the Amazon MP3 store. 
This district was carved out in 2012 along with Shahdara, taking the total number to 11 administrative districts in Delhi. 
The South East Delhi district is bordered in west by South Delhi district, in south by the Faridabad district of Haryana, in east by River Yamuna, and by New Delhi district and East Delhi districts in north-west and north-east respectively. 
The district stretches from Jor Bagh, Lodhi Road, Khan Market, Sunder Nagar, Nizamuddin, Sarai Kale Khan, through Defence Colony, Lajpat Nagar, New Friends Colony, Nehru Place, Kalkaji, Chittaranjan Park, Govindpuri, Greater Kailash, Alaknanda to Jamia Nagar, Okhla, Sarita Vihar, Jaitpur and Badarpur. 
Administratively, the district is divided into three subdivisions, Defence Colony, Kalkaji and Sarita Vihar. Defence Colony is the administrative headquarters of the district. 
Since the district was created after the latest Census of India was completed in 2011, independent statistics for South East Delhi is not available yet. 
This article related to a location in the Indian state of Delhi is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The title of champion, or leading, sire of racehorses in Great Britain and Ireland is awarded to the stallion whose offspring have won the most prize money in Britain and Ireland during the flat racing season. The current champion is Galileo, who achieved his twelfth title (and eleventh in a row) in 2020. 
Unlike the similar title for leading sire in North America, the stallion in question does not need to have resided in Great Britain or Ireland during his stud career, although the vast majority have done so. Northern Dancer is the most notable example of a North American-based stallion who won this title. The Northern Dancer sire line has dominated the list for the last several decades, mostly through his son Sadler's Wells (14 titles) and grandson Galileo. 
The Red Line (Portuguese: Linha Vermelha) or Orient Line (Portuguese: Linha do Oriente) is one of the four lines of the Lisbon Metro. 
Pyrota plagiata is a species of blister beetle in the family Meloidae. It is found in Central America and North America. 
Born in England, Wedley came to Canada in his youth and played playground football with the city champion Moss Park team. After high school, he graduated to the ORFU's Toronto Balmy Beach Beachers. 
In all, Wedley collected seven Grey Cup championships, the most by any player until his record was later tied by Bill Stevenson and Hank Ilesic. He was also an all-star in 1941 and 1945 with the Argos. 
Wedley would go on to coach junior football, starting with the ORFU Oshawa Raiders intermediate team in 1953. 
Berta Ruck was widowed in 1961. She died in Aberdyfi on 11 August 1978, nine days after her 100th birthday. 
Guilherme Cavalcanti (born 1 February 1921) was a Brazilian sports shooter. He competed in the 25 m pistol event at the 1952 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to sport shooting in Brazil is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to Caribbean Netherlands association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Canberra Balloon Spectacular, formerly known as Canberra Balloon Festival, is an annual hot air balloon festival that takes place at the lawns of the old Parliament House in Canberra, Australia. Each year in March, approximately 50 hot air balloons launch daily at dawn over the two week festival from the forecourt of Old Parliament House and float over Canberra. 
Choondakkari is a 1977 Indian Malayalam film, directed by P. Vijayan and produced by Santhoshkumar. The film stars Adoor Bhasi, Anupama, Vijayaraj and Abutty in the lead roles. The film has musical score by Kannur Rajan. 
This biographical article about a football forward from Uruguay born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tales of a Wayside Inn is a collection of poems by American poet Henry Wadsworth Longfellow. The book, published in 1863, depicts a group of people at the Wayside Inn in Sudbury, Massachusetts as each tells a story in the form of a poem. The characters telling the stories at the inn are based on real people. The compilation, which Longfellow originally wanted to title "The Sudbury Tales", proved to be popular and he issued two additional series in the 1870s. 
"One Autumn night, in Sudbury town, Across the meadows bare and brown, The windows of the wayside inn Gleamed red with fire-light..." 
Many of the characters in Tales of a Wayside Inn were inspired by real people: Luigi Maria Monti (the Sicilian), Daniel Treadwell (the theologian), Thomas William Parsons (the poet), Henry Wales (the student), Isaac Edrehi (the Spanish Jew), Ole Bull (the musician), and Lyman Howe (the landlord). 
Modern scholar Robert Gale praises the book for showing Longfellow's wide interests and knowledge of other cultures and its use of a wide variety of poetic formulas and styles such as blank verse, ballads, dactylic hexameter, octosyllabic lines, ottava rima, and iambic pentameter, including heroic couplets. He says the book "remains the best combination of narrative poems ever written by an American". 
Gregory's Two Girls is a 1999 British film, set in Cumbernauld, Scotland and also in various locations in Edinburgh. It is the sequel to Gregory's Girl (1981), which also starred John Gordon Sinclair and was written and directed by Bill Forsyth. The film received mixed reviews. 
Reviewing the film for The Guardian, Peter Bradshaw said: "This quaint film is from the stable of Forsyth movies such as That Sinking Feeling and Local Hero, and disconcertingly out of its time... all Forsyth's films have charm, including this one. But, unfortunately, Gregory's Two Girls has the unhappy distinction of being an Accidental Period Piece." 
However, Time Out London's reviewer said: "There's still comic mileage in Gordon-Sinclair's amiable fumbling Gregory... [A]ttention is directed towards wider, broadly political issues, but Forsyth's assured craftsmanship ensures that they are deftly woven into the storytelling. Gordon-Sinclair is a revelation, and although the film suffers from a lack of pace, its wealth of human insight and the premium it places on subtlety of expression make it a rare pleasure. 
This article related to a British comedy film of the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This story has similarities with Clarke's other short stories "History Lesson" and "Rescue Party": in all three pieces, aliens draw naive and humorous conclusions about humans from little information. 
This article about a science fiction short story (or stories) published in the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jaime Laredo (born June 7, 1941) is a violinist and conductor.  He was the conductor and Music Director of the Vermont Symphony Orchestra, and he began his musical career when he was five years old.  
He also plays viola, and has recorded piano quartets with Isaac Stern, Yo-Yo Ma, and Emanuel Ax. In addition, he collaborated with pianist Glenn Gould.  He is the violinist of the Kalichstein-Laredo-Robinson Trio, along with pianist Joseph Kalichstein and cellist Sharon Robinson.  He has been the conductor of the Vermont Symphony Orchestra since 1999. 
The Cleveland Institute of Music announced the appointment of Laredo and wife Sharon Robinson to the string faculty in 2012. 
Band members Chris Baird, Nick Cloutman, Jon Baird, and Jason Adams first played together in 1996 under the name Seventeen, releasing two full-lengths and an EP under this name. Bruce Fulford joined the group shortly before the release of their 1999 EP. Legal challenges from Seventeen magazine eventually led the band to change names in 2001; Jon Baird also left the group that same year. 
Joseph Pera (born 24 July 1988) is an American comedian, writer and actor. He is best known as the creator and star of Adult Swim's Joe Pera Talks with You. 
Joe Pera was born in Buffalo, New York. He studied film at Ithaca College, where he competed in and won the college's stand-up competition three times. Pera graduated from Ithaca College in 2010. He moved to New York City to pursue comedy and would attend open microphone nights as often as possible. 
Future Television was a Lebanese owned and operated company founded in 1993. First launched in Lebanon on February 15, 1993, Future Television, although the youngest of the Lebanese stations back then, became the nation's fastest growing station. 
In October 1994, Future Television started a trial satellite broadcasting over the footprint of Arabsat 1D. The testing period lasted two months. Shortly after, Future International was launched on the Arabsat 2A transponder. 
In 1996, in compliance with the new Lebanese audio visual law, Future Television restructured its ownership. Future Television presently has around 90 new shareholders, all from the Lebanese business, social and media elite. 
Future Television was forced into closing on May 9, during the 2008 Lebanon conflict. After moving its broadcasting headquarters, the station was back on the air on May 13 at 4:30 p.m (Lebanese Local Time). On May 16, the station went back to its original offices. 
In September 2019, Lebanese Prime Minister Saad Hariri announced the suspension of work at his Future TV satellite television channel after 26 years of broadcasting, citing financial reasons for halting operations. 
The decision highlights the worsening financial crisis in which Hariri has been trapped since the dissolution of Saudi-Oger, his father's construction and services company in Saudi Arabia. The company had been the pillar of the Hariri family fortune. 
The main and direct competitors of Future TV are Murr Television and Lebanese Broadcasting Corporation 
A show called "Transit" presented by talented anchor Najat Sharafeddine airing Sunday nights on Future Television was competing with a lot of other "Media Talk shows" aired on Lebanese and Middle Eastern TV corporations. 
Al-Mustaqbal newspaper, also owned by the Hariri family, closed its print operations in January for similar reasons, thus threatening the survival of Hariri's Future Movement as a political project while Hezbollah's media empire remained very active despite the militant group's own financial woes. 
Chris Sacca was born on May 12, 1975 and raised in Lockport, a suburb of Buffalo. His father was an attorney, while his mother was a professor at SUNY Buffalo State.     Sacca is of Irish and Italian descent, with family originating from Calabria, Italy. Sacca's parents exposed him to a variety of interests, and he recalls being pulled out of school to attend science museums and book-readings. 
Sacca has stated that a turning point in his angel investing was in 2007, when he moved to the town of Truckee in the mountains close to Lake Tahoe. Entrepreneurs including Travis Kalanick and Sacca would spend hours discussing ideas at the residence, and Sacca eventually bought the house next door to host various visiting entrepreneurs. When money began to run low Sacca raised a new fund with investors such as Brad Feld, Marissa Mayer, Eric Schmidt, and JPMorgan Chase's Digital Growth Fund. 
Sacca regularly speaks about venture capital and investing in media. He has been characterized as an expert by Business Week, Fortune magazine, CNBC, the BBC, CNN, Fox and NPR. Also, Sacca's interview during the initial Startup podcast inspired the pilot episode of the ABC television version of Start Up starring Zach Braff with Sacca to play himself. He played himself in the "Overton Window" episode of Billions. 
Since 2011 he has been listed on Forbes' Midas List: Top Tech Investors. In 2015, Sacca was featured on the cover of Forbes magazine listed as No. 3 on the Midas list. and in 2017, he was listed at No. 2. BusinessWeek named him one of the top 10 angel investors, and Vanity Fair has named Sacca to its "New Establishment" list. 
Sacca's wife Crystal English Sacca is also a partner at Lowercase. She is a former advertising creative and has authored books such as The Essential Scratch and Sniff Guide to Becoming a Wine Expert: Take a Whiff of That and The Essential Scratch & Sniff Guide to Becoming a Whiskey Know-It-All: Know Your Booze Before you Choose. The couple live in Jackson, Wyoming and Big Sky, Montana, with their three children. 
In 2019, the Saccas each signed The Giving Pledge, which calls upon signatories to donate the majority of their net worth to philanthropic causes. 
Prunus fasciculata, also known as wild almond, desert almond, or desert peach is a spiny and woody shrub producing wild almonds, native to the deserts of Arizona, California, Baja California, Nevada and Utah. 
The plant is not cultivated. Some Native Americans in its limited range learned traditional ways of using it: the Cahuilla prepared the drupe as a delicacy. The wild almonds were considered a delicacy by Native Americans. The Kawaiisu found the tough twigs useful as drills in starting fires and as the front portion of arrow shafts. The seed contains too much cyanide to be edible, but see under Paleobotanical evidence below. 
The plant was first classified as Emplectocladus fasciculata in an 1853 paper by John Torrey based on a collection of the plants of California acquired during the third expedition of John C. Fremont in 1845; whence the synonym Emplectocladus fasciculata (Torr.) The work was illustrated by Isaac Sprague. Torrey devised the genus Empectocladus to comprise a few desert shrubs. According to Silas C. Mason the genus has  
According to George Bentham and Joseph Dalton Hooker the name fasciculata means that the leaves are in fascicles, or little bundles:  
Middens from rodent activities such as those of the Pack rat are a rich source of plant macrofossils from late Pleistocene habitats. At Point of Rocks in Nevada by 11700 BP desert shrubs such as Desert Almond had replaced Juniper and Joshua trees, indicating the onset of the modern desert. Somewhat earlier, 17000-14000 BP, Desert Almond flourished in a mixed desert and woodland ecology on the Colorado Plateau. 
There is some archaeological evidence that the seeds were pounded into flour and leached to make it edible by the ancient population of the Mojave desert. 
The Burney Collection consists of over 1,270 17th-18th century newspapers and other news materials, gathered by Charles Burney, most notable for the 18th-century London newspapers. The original collection, totalling almost 1 million pages, is held by the British Library. 
The collection begins with Parliamentary papers from 1603, and newspapers from the early 1620s. 18th-century London newspapers are the richest part of the collection. 
Due to rapid deterioration of the collection, a decision was made to microfilm the collection and restrict access to physical copies. The success of the microfilm project led to many other book collections being preserved on film. 
New Deal (Spanish: Nuevo Trato) is a Chilean centre-left political movement, founded in 2020 by former members of Democratic Revolution and the Liberal Party, all former members of the Broad Front. 
This article related to a German film of the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Huchuy Qosqo or Kakya Qawani, as it was known by the Incas, was probably established as a royal estate by the Inca Emperor Viracocha about 1420 CE.  
To build, operate, and maintain his estate, Viracocha and his descendants required large numbers of workers. Citizens of the Inca empire were obligated, under the mit'a system, to contribute labor to the Empire, rather than being taxed on their wealth or production. The impressed mit'a labor was most probably found among nearby ethnic groups, although specialists and craftsmen might be imported. 
These four sources provided the labor and expertise for the management of a royal estate which might control thousands of acres of agricultural and grazing land, mines, textile factories, and other resources and employ thousands of people.  Sixteenth century Spanish sources identify more than 40 ethnic groups found in one area of the Sacred Valley, an indication of the degree of resettlement and population disruption undertaken by the Incas during their reign. 
The Emperor Viracocha faced a revolt late in his reign by the Chancha people. Viracocha took refuge in Huchuy Qosqo, leaving the defense of Cuzco to his son Pachacuti. who put down the revolt, deposed his father, and became the Emperor, or Sapa Inca (1438-1471). 
Huchuy Qosqo was expanded after Viracocha was deposed.  Radiocarbon dating indicates construction on the site took place between 1420 CE and 1530 CE. The Spanish conquistador Gonzalo Pizarro looted Huchuy Qosqo and burned the mummy of Viracocha about 1534. 
 Amongst a large number of buildings, some stone, some adobe, is a kallanka (great hall), 40m long. Providing water to the site is an Inca built irrigation channel, lined with stones for about 800m.
The Spanish took control of Huchuy Qosqo in the 1500s, after the Manco Inca Revolution (approx. 1540) and used the site as a farm.  The Incas had constructed several small reservoirs for irrigation.  During their time at Huchuy Qosqo the Spanish demolished some other Inca structures to build the larger reservoir you see today. 
Elmsley was ordained a deacon of the Church of England on 31 December 1797 and a priest on 29 April 1798; on the same date in April 1798 he was appointed perpetual curate to the chapelry of Little Horkesley in Essex, which he held until his death. 
Aristophanes, Acharnians, [Arhistophanus Acharnes. Aristophanis comoedia Acharnenses in usum studiosae juventutis emendata et illustrata], Oxford and London: 1809. 
Euripides, Euripidis Omnia Opera, Glasgow: 1821.  Also various plays of Euripides, separately, between 1806 and 1822.  
Prior to March 21, 2002, Arelee was a village, but it was restructured as an unincorporated community on that date. 
The large white church at the north end of the community is the Arelee Mennonite Brethren church.  It was founded in 1908.  The church has been sold to a local family. 
Calliostoma gloriosum, common name the glorious topsnail, is a species of small sea snail with gills and an operculum, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Calliostomatidae, the calliostoma top snails. 
Wa-o-wa-wa-na-onk or Peter Wilson (died 1871, alternate spellings are Waowawanaonk, Wau-wah-wa-na-onk, and De jih'-non-da-weh-hoh) was a Cayuga physician and possible chief. His name translates roughly to "They Heard His Voice" or "The Pacificator." 
Wa-o-wa-wa-na-onk was raised on the Seneca Buffalo Reservation and was educated in Quaker schools on the reservation. He graduated with a medical degree from Geneva Medical College in 1844. He was one of the first Native Americans to earn a medical degree. Wa-o-wa-wa-na-onk also worked as an interpreter on the Cattaraugus Reservation. Some records list him as a chief, or a "Grand Sachem," but it was uncertain if he officially held the title. 
He often spoke to different groups in New York in order to obtain allies in his cause to maintain the homeland of both the Seneca and Cayuga people. He also urged groups to support women's suffrage. 
Erich Kull (born 6 January 1932) is a Swiss speed skater. He competed in two events at the 1956 Winter Olympics. 
This biographical article on a speed skater in Switzerland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mai Mugiyama is a Japanese karateka. In 2018, she won the gold medal in the women's team kata event at the 2018 World Karate Championships held in Madrid, Spain. 
This biographical article related to karate in Japan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1583, the Archbishop of Canterbury, Edmund Grindal, born in the village of St Bees, was ill and blind and was making preparations before his death. Elizabeth I had designated John Whitgift as Grindal's successor, but the former refused to accept the position while Grindal lived (allegedly). Grindal is accredited with having once described Copeland (the area in which St. Bees lies) as the: 
ignorantest sic part in religion, and most oppressed of covetous landlords of any one part of this realm to my knowledge.
The corps was officered by masters at the school, and regularly attended camps with northern public schools and also the annual Public Schools Camp.  In 1910 a Drum and Fife band was set up, which soon changed to bugles.  In later years the Corps band would win the music competition at the annual camp on four separate occasions.  By 1912 the Corps would reach an impressive number of one hundred and fifty members, half of the student population. 
After the war the number of students remained high, but in common with many other schools the numbers decreased and then went into free-fall during the 1930s.  The situation became so critical that the Governors of the School attempted to have the school nationalised.  In the end, the old boys put together a rescue package and the school remained independent, it being the only one of its kind at the time in Cumberland and Westmorland. 
In 1938, during the final stages of recovery from the Great Depression, the school's headmaster of the day, George Mallaby, made an unusual career move by becoming District Commissioner for the special area of west Cumberland, with the task of alleviating the problems of unemployment. 
During the war three Old St. Beghians won the Victoria Cross, Britain's highest award for valour in the "face of the enemy".  Two were awarded posthumously. 
Lieutenant (later Captain) William Leefe Robinson (Eaglesfield 09-14) was the first man to shoot down a German rigid airship over Britain.  On the night of 2 September 1916 he intercepted the German airship S.L.11 (a wooden-framed contemporary of the Zeppelin) and shot it down over Cuffley.  For such a notable feat, he was the first Old St. Beghian to be awarded the Victoria Cross, the citation reading; 
For most conspicuous bravery.  He attacked an enemy airship under circumstances of great difficulty and danger, and sent it crashing to the ground as a flaming wreck.  He had been in the air for more than two hours, and had previously attacked another airship during his flight.
Afterwards Robinson was transferred to the Western Front and in May, 1917 he was taken prisoner by the Germans and was held as a prisoner of war until the end of the war.  He made several attempts to escape and his health had deteriorated to such an extent that shortly after his repatriation to Britain he succumbed to Spanish Influenza on 31 December 1918. 
most conspicuous bravery displayed in action.  Until he was killed he repeatedly went out to attend the wounded under murderous fire from snipers and machine-guns, and in many cases, when no other means were at hand, carried them in himself, although almost exhausted.  He showed the greatest possible degree of valour.
Captain Wain (School House 11-14) had been on track to study at Oxford when war was declared in 1914.  He promptly joined up through the Public Schools Battalion.  Having participated in the opening stages of the Battle of the Somme with the Manchester Regiment, later in the year he transferred to the Tank Corps.  In a tank at the beginning of the Battle of Cambrai on 20 November 1917 Wain would posthumously receive the VC for; 
On 18 February 1923 a fire started in Foundation House, causing extensive damage throughout the East side of the Quadrangle.  Fortunately, no one was hurt, and the damage was repaired. 
On 9 June 1924 the School O.T.C. sounded the "Last Post" in a moving ceremony at the top of Great Gable, a mountain at the heart of the Lake District, where a memorial was unveiled in commemoration of twenty members of the Fell and Rock Climbing Club of Great Britain who had given their lives in the war. 
In 1928 the School held a two-day pageant celebrating the history of the school and the village in acted representations of twelve episodes.  Among them was the founding of the school by Edmund Grindal, and also the alleged landfall of Saint Bega at St. Bees. 
Seventy-two old boys gave their lives during the Seconds World War, and the Memorial Hall was erected in their memory. 
During the 1950s a new science block was built, formally opened by Barnes Wallis in 1959, and in the 1970s the school became coeducational.  New boarding houses were purchased for both girls and boys, Bega House and Abbot's Court respectively, and to celebrate the school's quatercentenary in 1983 an appeal was launched which would give the school a new sports hall, opened in 1988. 
Upon the declaration of war with Germany on 3 September 1939, Mill Hill School in northern London was requisitioned by the government for use as a hospital.  The Governors of St. Bees agreed to share the still somewhat-understrength school to be shared with the pupils and staff of Mill Hill, and by the end of the month the boys of Mill Hill were being taught in Cumberland. 
During the course of the war seventy-two old boys (alumni) gave their lives for their country.  Their names are commemorated on a tablet in the Chapel unveiled on 19 June 1949 by the Reverend Leslie Dixon, Chaplain-in-Chief of the Royal Air Force, himself an old boy of the school. 
In 1977 the school became fully co-educational, after accepting some sixth form day girls previously. Preparations for the quatercentenary of the school were extensive.  On 2 December 1982 before the end of term, the Archbishop of Canterbury Robert Runcie gave the thanksgiving in the Priory Church of St. Mary and St. Bega.  On 28 June 1983 a new Senior Girls' House, Lonsdale House, was opened on Lonsdale Terrace by The Princess Anne who then toured the building. 
In 1984, St. Bees School came into the national spotlight with the broadcasting on BBC 2 of the documentary Educating Michael, which focussed partially on Michael Light, the son of a Barrow-in-Furness shipyard worker, who was being educated at the school thanks to the Thatcher government's Assisted Places Scheme, whereby bright children were sent to public schools and their fees were fully or partially subsidised by the state. 
In 1996 Grindal House was turned into an "International Centre", where students from the Far East could be taught English and other subjects outside the mainstream teaching environment of the school.  In 2000 this policy was ended, and the teaching area of the International Centre was transferred to the former Matron's area in Foundation.  Grindal became once again a day and boarding house, this time for senior boys. 
Also in 2000 Barony House was entirely refurbished after years of neglect and updated into a state-of-the-art musical facility.  For years the school had prided itself on the standard of musical tuition it afforded pupils, and with the opening of the Fox Music School this was finally realised.  The building, apart from practice rooms and a recording studio also contains conventional teaching spaces. 
The 1990s saw the opening by Prince Charles of the Whitelaw Building, a multi-function business centre and teaching area which was named after the-then Chairman of the Board of Governors, William Whitelaw.  In 2000, Barony House was entirely refurbished and renamed the Fox Music Centre in memory of old St Behgian Bill Fox.  To mark the millennium, a time capsule was buried in the North-East corner of the Quadrangle. 
In September 2008, a Preparatory Department was launched, catering for pupils from the age of 8 until they joined the main school. At this time, a nearby independent school with a prep department, Harecroft Hall, had just closed.  The school again expanded in September 2010 to include pupils from age four. 
Nonetheless, on 17 April 2015 it was confirmed by the Governors that the school would close. The formal statement said the governors are also trustees of the St Bees Foundation and they said they are committed to it having a future in education in west Cumbria and "to the use of the site as support both for the future activities of the foundation and the village of St Bees." 
On 5 May 2017 the Trustees announced that the Headteacher Designate was Jeremy Hallows, who was then Head of the Senior School at Bromsgrove School. 
In April 2018 it was announced that the school would open initially with a cohort of Year 7 pupils, nurturing the culture of the school from the ground up and to allow organic growth year on year. 
In July 2018, Induction Day and Super Learning Day were hosted at St Bees School. The staff had prepared different activities ranging from sports, science, team-building, outdoor games and language learning. Preparations for the launching of the revitalised St Bees School continue at a pace. 
a. ^  The first floor, which today accommodates the Sixth Form Centre, the Careers Centre and the Old St. Beghians Office, has a noticeably lower ceiling due to its floor being raised. 
b. ^  "Something in the nature of a bomb was found after Lord Lloyd had spoken at St. Bees School, but until it has been examined by an expert it is not possible to say whether it is a real bomb or a fake." - Chief Constable P.T.B. Browne 
 The history of the Pakistan Air Force (PAF) began when it was established in 1947 following the independence of Pakistan. 
In 1933, the British colonial government established the first Air Force station in undivided India near Drigh Road, now called PAF Base Faisal in Karachi. In 1934, this element of the Royal Indian Air Force (RIAF) was extended to the north for operations in North-West Frontier Province. The RIAF had also contributed to the defeat of Japanese invasion during World War II. 
In 1957 the Pakistan Air Force received 100 American-built F-86 Sabres under the U.S. aid programme. Squadron after squadron in the PAF retired its Hawker Furys and Supermarine Attackers, and replaced them with F-86 jet fighters. In 1957 thirty-six-year-old Air Marshal Asghar Khan became the Pakistan Air Force's first native commander-in-chief. 
The PAF fleet at the time consisted of 12 F-104 Starfighters, some 120 F-86 Sabres and around 20 B-57 Canberra bombers. The PAF claims to have had complete air superiority over the battle area from the second day of  operations. While, Air Chief Marshal Arjan Singh of the Indian Air Force claimed, despite been qualitative inferior, IAF achieved air superiority in three days in the 1965 War 
Many publications have credited the PAF's successes to U.S. equipment, claiming it to be superior to the aircraft operated by the IAF and giving the PAF a "qualitative advantage". However some people refute this argument. As per them, the IAF's MiG-21, Hawker Hunter and Folland Gnat aircraft had better performance than the PAF's F-86 fighters. According to Air Cdre (retired) Sajad Haider, the F-86 Sabre was inferior in both power and speed to the IAF's Hawker Hunter. 
The two countries have made contradictory claims of combat losses during the war and few neutral sources have verified the claims of either country. The PAF claimed it shot down 104 IAF planes and lost 19 of its own, while the IAF claimed it shot down 73 PAF planes and lost 59. Despite the intense fighting, the conflict was effectively a stalemate. 
After the 1965 war the U.S. placed an arms embargo on Pakistan and the PAF was badly affected. Its entire fleet was of U.S. origin and spare parts could not be sourced from the United States. 
The PAF began searching for new combat aircraft. China was approached and agreed to supply an initial 72 Shenyang F-6 fighters and it was inducted on 30 December 1965.[citation needed] China also supplied a squadron of Harbin B-5 bombers which the PAF was not satisfied with due to their lack of a modern bomb aiming system. These were later returned to China in exchange for more Shenyang F-6.[citation needed] 
The PAF is believed to have evaluated the Dassault Mirage 2000 in early 1981 and was planning to evaluate the General Dynamics F-16 Fighting Falcon afterwards. 
Project Sabre II was initiated by the PAF in 1987 and was aimed at developing a replacement for the ageing Shenyang F-6 fleet. After a design study by Grumman Aerospace determined it would be to financially risky, it was abandoned by PAF and the Chengdu F-7P was introduced in 1988 to replace the F-6. 
The Pressler Amendment passed by the US Congress, in 1985, prevented the sale of materiel to Pakistan unless it could be verified that the goods would not be used to build or deliver nuclear weapons. Subsequently, the US also placed a broader embargo on Pakistan on 6 October 1990, due to the country's continued nuclear weapons programme. 
As a result of the Pressler Amendment, 11 Peace Gate III F-16s, along with 7 F-16A and 10 F-16B of the 60 Peace Gate IV F-16s, which had been built by the end of 1994 were embargoed and put into storage in the United States. 
In 1996 it was reported that Pakistan was negotiating a $160 million contract for missiles with South Africa, believed to be for the Kentron (now Denel) U-darter imaging-infra-red short range air-to-air missile. 
The Pakistan Air Force (PAF) did not see active combat during the low-intensity Kargil Conflict between India and Pakistan during the summer of 1999 but remained on high air defence alert (ADA) and performed F-16 and F-7MP combat air patrols (CAPs) near the eastern border with India. The PAF closely monitored and tracked the IAF's movements near the Line of Control in Kashmir as well as the India-Pakistan international border. 
The PAF's Saffron Bandit 2009/2010 exercise focused on extensive training of combat personnel to undertake COIN operations. New equipment was inducted to improve the PAF's joint intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance (ISR) capabilities. A C-130 transport aircraft was indigenously modified for day/night ISR operations. 
On 22 May 2011 it was reported that the PAF had retaliated against attacks by Afghan mortar and machine gun positions on the Pakistani posts at Miskinai and Sangpura in the Bajaur area. It was stated that since 19 May, around 1000 Afghan Askaris had entered the Bajaur area at Sahi as well as Miskinai and Sankpura. The Afghan forces had been firing at the posts during night and, after reconnaissance sorties, PAF aircraft destroyed the Afghan positions. 
The modernisation stall would end in April 2006 when the Pakistani cabinet approved the PAF's proposals to procure new aircraft and systems from several sources, including modern combat aircraft from the U.S. and China. The AFFDP 2019 (Armed Forces Development Programme 2019) would oversee the modernisation of the Pakistan Air Force from 2006 to 2019. 
After the September 11 attacks in 2001, the U.S. and Pakistan began discussing the release of the embargoed F-16s and a purchase of new aircraft. Of the 28 F-16A/B built under the Peace Gate III/IV contracts and embargoed in 1990, 14 delivered as EDA (Excess Defense Articles) from 2005 to 2008., two of which were delivered on 10 July 2007. 
Between 2005 and 2008, 14 F-16A/B Block 15 OCU fighters were delivered to the PAF under renewed post-9/11 ties between the U.S. and Pakistan. These had originally been built for Pakistan under the Peace Gate III/IV contracts but were never delivered due to the U.S. arms embargo imposed in 1990. 
To upgrade the F-16A/B fleet, 32 Falcon STAR kits were purchased for the original Peace Gate I aircraft and 35 Mid-Life Update (MLU) kits were ordered, with 11 more MLU kits optional, in . 4 F-16A/B being upgraded in the U.S. to F-16AM/BM, delivery expected December 2011. F-16A/B in PAF service to be upgraded starting October 2010 by Turkish Aerospace Industries, 1 per month. 
The Peace Drive I contract for 12 F-16C and 6 F-16D Block 52+ (Advanced Block 52) aircraft, powered by F100-PW-229 engines was signed on 30 September 2006. The first F-16 to be completed, an F-16D, was rolled out on 13 October 2009 and began flight testing. The first batch of F-16C/D Block 52+, two F-16D and one F-16C, landed at PAF Base Shahbaz, Jacobabad, on 26 June 2010 and one more F-16C was received by 5 July 2010. 
On 19 May 2006 the PAF inaugurated a refurbished Sector Operations Centre at PAF Base Mushaf (Sargodha) which had been installed with a Pakistani-developed air defence automation system for command and control. An old air defence system installed in the 1980s was replaced.[citation needed] 
During talks with a delegation from the French Senate on Monday 28 September 2009, Prime Minister Yousuf Raza Gilani stated that the PAF had used most of its stockpile of laser-guided munitions against militants in the Malakand and FATA regions and that replacements for such types of equipment were urgently required. 
In December 2009 the PAF's first Saab 2000 Erieye AEW&C was delivered from Sweden and Il-78MP Midas aerial refuelling tanker/military transport aircraft from Ukraine. 
The PAF is reported to be considering purchasing the Hongdu L-15 advanced jet trainer to train pilots for high-tech fighters such as the FC-20. Extensive evaluations of the aircraft took place in Pakistan during December 2009. 
It was reported in 2010 that the R-Darter, an active radar homing beyond visual range air-to-air missile, is being operated by the Pakistan Air Force. 
In 2005 it was reported that two batches in the Air Force Academy's flying wing contained 10 women, with many more in the engineering and aerospace wings. Cadet Saba Khan, from Quetta in Balochistan, applied after reading a newspaper advertisement seeking female cadets. She was one of the first four women to pass the first stages of flying training on propeller-driven light aircraft and move onto faster jet-powered training aircraft. 
In September 2009 it was reported that seven women had qualified as operational fighter pilots on the Chengdu F-7, the first female combat pilots in the PAF's history, one of them being Ambreen Gull. Commanding Officer Tanvir Piracha emphasised that if the female pilots "are not good enough as per their male counterparts, we don't let them fly." It was noted that some of the female pilots wear the hijab while others do not. 
In September 2004 a PAF contingent of six F-16A/B arrived in Turkey to take part in the international Anatolian Eagle 2004 exercise. As well as the Turkish Air Force, the air forces of Germany, the Netherlands, Italy and the United States also participated. 
A PAF contingent of six F-16A/B fighters was sent to the international Anatolian Eagle 2006 exercise, which also involved the U.S. and Israeli as well as the Turkish air forces. Operation Indus Viper 2008, a joint exercise involving PAF and the Turkish Air Force, began on 21 April 2008 at PAF Base Mushaf (Sargodha) and was scheduled to last 10 days. Five Turkish F-16C/D fighters and 50 personnel of 191 Kobras Filo (191 Cobras Squadron) attended. 
In the summer of 2005 a PAF team of 20 airmen, including pilots, navigators, engineers, maintenance technicians and a C-130E was sent to the U.S. to take part in the AMC (Air Mobility Command) Rodeo. The team, led by Wing Commander Akbar Shoaib, was expected to score well in the paratrooping, spot landing and short-field landing events. The PAF later took part in the July 2007 AMC Rodeo.  
In 2009, while undertaking combat operations against militants in FATA and Swat, the PAF initiated the Saffron Bandit exercise with the aim of training the PAF's entire combat force to undertake such anti-terrorist operations. 
During High Mark 2010 a Chengdu F-7 and Mirage 5 fighter (flown by Squadron Leader Nadeem Iqbal and Wing Commander Syed Ata ur Rehman respectively) practised landing, refuelling and take-off operations from a Pakistani motorway. It was reported that the PAF is in negotiations with the Ministry of Communications to set up all required facilities for Air Force operations on the motorways and highways of Pakistan. 
In July 2010 the PAF sent six F-16B fighters of No. 9 Griffins Squadron and 100 PAF personnel to Nellis Air Force Base in the U.S. to participate in the international Red Flag exercise for the first time. During the exercise the PAF pilots practised in-flight refuelling of their F-16s with the Boeing KC-135 Stratotanker. 
In October 2010 the PAF's No. 7 Bandits Squadron sent a team of its Dassault Mirage III ROSE fighters to Jordan to participate in the Falcon Air Meet 2010 exercise. The event took place at Azraq Royal Jordanian Air Base and involved teams from the U.S. Air Force, U.S. Navy and the United Arab Emirates as well as the Royal Jordanian Air Force. 
In January 2011 a PAF contingent of F-16A/B and Dassault Mirage fighters took part in the Al-Saqoor II exercise in Saudi Arabia with the Royal Saudi Air Force. The exercise lasted from 6 to 19 January 2011 and the PAF Chief of Air Staff, ACM Rao Qamar Suleman, also flew during the exercise. 
Blacktail is an unincorporated community and census-designated place (CDP) built around Blacktail Lake in Williams County, North Dakota, United States. It was first listed as a CDP prior to the 2020 census. 
It was formerly in the Williams County School District 8 (formerly New School District). The district only served grades K-8 and high school students were sent to Williston High, then in the Williston Public School District 1. District 8 also sent high school students to the Nesson School District in Ray and to the Tioga School District in Tioga. In 2021 District 8 merged with District 1 into the Williston Basin School District 7. 
He formed the McDades in 2000 with his sister Shannon Johnson and his brother, Jeremiah McDade. Their album Bloom (2007) was given the Juno Award for best roots/traditional album by a group. It also won an Independent Music Award and two Canadian Folk Music Awards. In 2018 he released his debut album "Murals". 
Eupholus is a genus of beetle in the family Curculionidae. The genus includes some of the most colourful of the weevils. The colour may serve as a warning to predators that they are distasteful. Most species feed upon yam leaves, some of which are toxic to other animals. The species occur in New Guinea and adjacent islands. This genus was described by French entomologist Jean-Baptiste Alphonse Dechauffour de Boisduval in 1835. 
Jean-Simon Leduc is a Canadian actor. He is most noted for his performances as Bruno in Love in the Time of Civil War (L'amour au temps de la guerre civile), for which he received a Quebec Cinema Award nomination for Best Supporting Actor at the 18th Quebec Cinema Awards, and as JP in the 2018 film Family First (Chien de garde), for which he received a Prix Iris nomination for Best Actor at the 20th Quebec Cinema Awards. 
The Durant is an apartment building located at 607 East 2nd Avenue in Flint, Michigan. It was built as the Hotel Durant in 1919, and was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 2009. 
The hotel was originally planned as a six-story structure, but two additional stories were added during construction to respond to increased demand. The hotel opened with 264 guest rooms on December 14, 1920. The Durant was immediately Flint's leading hotel, by far the largest and the most distinguished in the area. In addition to hosting guests from out of town, it was used by local groups and individuals for meetings and celebrations. 
The series of life-size portraits was painted between 1641 and 1658. Twelve of the thirteen paintings are in Auckland Castle, Bishop Auckland, England, and one is in Grimsthorpe Castle, Lincolnshire. 
The series traveled to the Americas for the first time in 2016, to be displayed at the Meadows Museum in Dallas, Texas, from 17 September 2017 until 7 January 2018, and then in New York City at the Frick Collection from 31 January until 22 April 2018. 
It is not known how the paintings reached England, although some speculate that they may have been captured by English pirates while being transported from the painter's studio in Seville to a buyer in a Spanish colony in the Americas. 
The portrait of one of Jacob's sons, Benjamin, was sold separately to the Peregrine Bertie, 3rd Duke of Ancaster and Kesteven; it hangs in Grimsthorpe Castle, Lincolnshire.  Bishop Trevor commissioned Arthur Pond to produce a copy painting of "Benjamin".  It hangs, with Jacob and the other eleven sons, in the Castle's Long Dining Room, which Bishop Trevor rebuilt for the purpose of displaying the pictures. 
According to the 1921 census, the village was inhabited by 636 people, among whom 4 were Roman Catholic, 628 Orthodox, and 4 Mosaic. At the same time, 4 inhabitants declared Polish nationality, and 632 Belarusian. There were 128 residential buildings in the village. 
Thomas was born about 1630 in the Parish of Guisborough, Yorkshire, England making him slightly less than thirty years of age upon his arrival in America around 1658. He resided in Saint Mary's County, Maryland. 
Certainly related and using the same coat of arms, Thomas was the uncle or perhaps older brother of Capt. John Dent, Gent. (ca. 1645-1712), who married Mary Hatch.  
Peter II, was the son of Peter Dent I, Gent., of Ormesby (d.ca. 1642), a Parish in North Riding of Yorkshire, now part of Middlesbrough. 
Thomas Dent's son William had a son, Peter, who had a son, Peter Jr. Peter Jr. had a son, George, who had a son Frederick, who married Ellen Bray Wrenshall. Their daughter, Julia, was the wife of Ulysses S. Grant, the 18th President of the United States. 
The Davidson Hospital was a health facility in Girvan, South Ayrshire, Scotland. It was managed by NHS Ayrshire and Arran. It remains a Category B listed building. 
The Devils Gate Power Station is a conventional hydroelectric power station located in north-western Tasmania, Australia. 
The dam received a  Historic Engineering Marker from Engineers Australia as part of its Engineering Heritage Recognition Program. 
WBRJ-LP (97.3 FM) is a radio station broadcasting a Christian Contemporary music format. Licensed to Baton Rouge, Louisiana, United States, the station serves the Baton Rouge area.  The station is currently owned by Jefferson Baptist Church, Inc. The station's motto is "The Word from Baton Rouge". The station's listening area extends from Port Allen to Denham Springs and from Prairieville to Hooper Road in Baton Rouge.  Until sometime in 2010, the station was on 105.7. 
Unruh was a staunch opponent of the Nazi Party and wrote several works warning of the consequences of Nazi dictatorship, including Bonaparte (1927), Berlin in Monte Carlo (1931), and Zero (1932).  He left Germany for France in 1932, later immigrating to the United States.  He finally returned to Germany in 1962 and died in the town of Dietz at age 85. 
New shoes on budget day is an unusual tradition among Canadian Ministers of Finance. The tradition holds that the Minister of Finance should purchase or wear new shoes when the budget is delivered. 
The exact origins of this tradition are not known. The observance of this tradition has been inconsistent among federal ministers; indeed, for two or three finance ministers, this tradition only holds if "new shoes" is interpreted to mean "new footwear". It also makes appearances among provincial finance ministers. 
Following Sharp, Edgar Benson wore a new pair of shoes on budget day in 1968, although he said, "He didn't buy them just for the budget." The following year he did not wear new shoes when delivering the budget, saying jokingly that he couldn't afford them, and in 1970 proudly displayed his worn soles on budget day. 
Jim Flaherty wore new shoes for his first budget in 2006. For the second one, instead of wearing new shoes, he bought ice skates for his son. and resoled his shoes to show that his 2008 budget was fiscally prudent. Flaherty did not purchase new shoes for either of his two 2011 budgets, but did so in 2009, 2010, 2012, 2013 and February 7th, 2014. 
Flaherty's successor, Joe Oliver, wore New Balance shoes with blue laces to underscore the fact that the Conservatives' 2015 budget was balanced. (The Conservative Party of Canada party colour is blue.) However, commenters pointed out that the shoes were made in the U.S., by a company that had abandoned Canadian manufacturing 20 years earlier. 
For her first two provincial budgets, Carole Taylor wore new shoes. For her third budget, she wore new green-coloured shoes to go with the environmental focus of her budget. 
In 2001, Minister of Finance Paul Ramsay wore new shoes when he delivered his budget. His predecessor, Joy MacPhail, did the same with a second-hand set when she tabled her budget. 
Once, when he was Alberta Treasurer, Stockwell Day wore inline skates and a helmet when he tabled a budget. 
In 2002, New Brunswick finance minister Peter Mesheau wore new hiking boots when he delivered his budget. 
In 2009, Nova Scotia finance minister Graham Steele polished his shoes when, as he later said, "we buffed up the previously introduced Progressive Conservative budget". In 2010 he bought children's shoes to represent the removal of the Harmonized Sales Tax from children's clothing. In 2011 Steele showed pictures of new shoes on a Blackberry Playbook because of the manufacturer's importance to the province, and in 2012 he bought shoes at a store to symbolize lowered taxes for small businesses. 
In 2002, Pat Mella was speaking to journalists about PEI's budget when the Premier interrupted and presented her with a pair of sandals. 
Saskatchewan finance minister Ken Krawetz first bought a new pair of shoes for budget day in 2013. He put them on with a shoehorn to demonstrate that the province faces what the minister described as "significant financial pressures on the treasury". 
On February 25, 2020, Northwest Territories Finance Minister Caroline Wawzonek wore natural harp seal fur high heel shoes when she tabled her first Budget Address for the 19th Legislative Assembly. The shoes were made by ENB Artisan, from Iqaluit, Nunavut.   
Wearing new shoes on budget day (or the refusal to do so) has been used as a symbol by politicians. Stockwell Day's outfit as Alberta Treasurer was intended to highlight "a new direction" for the budget. The tradition has been around for so long that, as Nova Scotia's Steele said after leaving his position, "It's hard to be original ... Every gimmick has been done", and passers by often ask finance ministers in the days before new budgets whether they have purchased new shoes yet. 
Born in Strasbourg, Laurenceau began playing the violin at the age of 3 and started performing at the age of 9 with the philharmonic chamber orchestra of her hometown. She followed the lessons of Wolfgang Marschner and Zakhar Bron in Germany, then perfected her skills with Jean-Jacques Kantorow in Rotterdam. 
As a teacher, Laurenceau is invited to the academies of Annecy and Dartington (England), where she performs alongside pianist Stephen Kovacevich. She is also a professor and supervises the master classes at the Philippe Jaroussky musical Academy. 
Laurenceau is President and artistic director of the Obernai Chamber Music Festival, which she created in 2009. 
In China, in 1939 Pai joined the Kuomintang's Three Principles of the People Youth Brigades and rose to the position of Branch Leader. After joining the army he worked in various capacities as an intelligence officer. In the Mainland Operations Office, Pai oversaw parts of the crackdown on dissidents in Taiwan and abroad after the Kaohsiung Incident. He died in the United States in 2004. 
Towards the South, the heights decrease, passing through the sub-carpathian hills to a high plain in the West side of the Romanian Plain. 
The area in the center of the county is well suited for fruit orchards, wines and raising cattle. The South is better suited for growing cereals and vegetables. 
By 1938, there were six districts, four previous and two new ones resulting from the reorganisation of the southwest part of the county: 
According to the 1930 census data, the county population was 246,713 inhabitants, ethnically divided as follows: 97.4% Romanians, 1.6% Romanies, 0.2% Germans, 0.2% Hungarians, 0.2% Jews, as well as other minorities. From the religious point of view, the population was 99.0% Eastern Orthodox, 0.4% Roman Catholic, 0.2% Jewish, as well as other minorities. 
In 1930, the county's urban population was 31,909 inhabitants, comprising 94.8% Romanians, 1.3% Romanies, 1.0% Germans, 0.8% Jews, 0.7% Hungarians, as well as other minorities. From the religious point of view, the urban population was composed of 96.4% Eastern Orthodox, 1.4% Roman Catholic, 0.8% Jewish, 0.7% Lutheran, 0.3% Greek Catholic, as well as other minorities. 
Charles R. Conn (born 22 August 1961) is a Canadian and American CEO, conservationist, and author of Bulletproof Problem Solving: The One Skill That Changes Everything (co-author Robert McLean, Wiley 2019). In 2019 he was the CEO of Oxford Sciences Innovation. Previously, he was the warden and global CEO of Rhodes House and the Rhodes Trust, the organization responsible for administering the Rhodes Scholarship from 2013 to 2018. 
Conn studied at Boston University's University Professors Program before reading philosophy, politics and economics at Balliol College, Oxford as a Rhodes Scholar from Massachusetts. Conn subsequently worked at the Boston Consulting Group and gained an MBA at Harvard Business School. 
Conn subsequently worked as senior advisor to the Gordon & Betty Moore Foundation where his projects included the preservation of wild salmon ecosystems and the Palmyra Atoll research station. 
Conn was warden and CEO of the Rhodes Trust from June 2013 to August 2018. He was the first American to hold this position, and the first Warden of Rhodes House not to have served previously on the University of Oxford faculty. 
Since moving to Oxford, Conn has become a trustee of the Mandela Rhodes Foundation in Cape Town, South Africa, and an advisory board member of the Oxford Internet Institute. In January 2014, he became a Professorial Fellow of Balliol College, Oxford University. 
Conn announced his retirement as warden of Rhodes House for the end of his five-year term, in August 2018. 
His partner is Camilla Borg, who was a member of the staff of Rhodes House as director of special projects. 
Thinking About Historical Legacies: Looking for Just Principles and Processes, The Institute for Historical Justice & Reconciliation; 2018. 
Conservation Biology through the Lens of a Career in Salmon Conservation. Conservation Biology; 2011. 
The Danish American Frontier Award is the most prestigious honor awarded by the Danish American community in the western United States. 
The DAF Award is presented to a person or group of persons who have distinguished themselves by their actions, exploration or presence in areas of leadership, business, commerce, service, science, technology, invention, arts or humanitarian ventures. 
The recipient is given a statuette by the Danish-American sculptor, Dennis Smith, depicting Peter Lassen, the most important of early Danish-American pioneers and frontiersmen. The largest land areas named after a Dane outside of Denmark are named after him - Lassen County  and Lassen Volcanic Park. The statuette is handmade and numbered exclusively for recipients of the award. 
A Cessna Skymaster slid off the runway into the river upon take-off on 15 August 1994. Although the aircraft was written off, the pilot was not injured. 
He was born in New Orleans, Louisiana a year after his parents, Michael and Jean Frayne Hosey, immigrated to the United States from County Wexford in Ireland. In 1858, the four-year-old Hosey moved with his family to Mount Vernon, Ohio, where his father took a job as a gardener on the estate of Colonel Jesse P. Buckingham.  (This may instead have been the estate of future General Catharinus P. Buckingham.) 
At age 13, three years after his father died from malaria, extreme poverty forced William Hosey to drop out of a Catholic grammar school to work at Mount Vernon-based C & C Cooper Company machine shop. Five years later, William, his mother and older brother Lawrence moved to Fort Wayne, where William took a job as a machinist for the Pennsylvania Railroad. Lawrence died of pneumonia two years later. William worked at the railroad for 34 years. 
During this time, William attended night classes to finish his education. He studied literature and philosophy. 
Eduard "Eddie" Brunner (July 19, 1912, Zurich - July 18, 1960, Zurich) was a Swiss jazz reedist and bandleader. 
Moray Rugby Football Club is a rugby union club from the city of Elgin, Moray that compete in the Caledonia North Two. Moray also have a 2xv that competes in the BT Caledonia 3 North League.  Moray has a number of youth teams taken from different age groups including micros and minis, S1 and S2, Under-16, Under-18 team. They play their rugby at Morriston Park in Elgin, Moray. 
The first attempt to introduce rugby into such a strong soccer stronghold as Elgin was in 1903 by the then rector of Elgin Academy. It was, however, not long before the oval ball was forced to give way to the round one. 
Twenty years and World War 1 elapsed before a second attempt was made, again by a rector of Elgin Academy, Iain Graham Andrew. The formation of the Moray Rugby Club took place on 3 March 1923 at a meeting in the drillhall in Elgin. Mr George C. Christie was elected as president. It was agreed that it was feasible to form a club and application was sent to the Scottish Rugby Union to become an affiliated member. 
In 1925 the Brin Cup was donated for competition among the clubs in the North. Up until the outbreak of war in 1939, Moray went on to win this cup several times. 
After hostilities ceased in 1945, the Club reconvened in September 1946 with Dr Thow as president and a dentist called George Cusetter as captain. The amount of Naval and R.A.F. personnel stationed around the Moray area gave the Club many more teams to play and also helped to improve the standard of play. 
Elgin Academy provided a nursery, and some of the senior schoolboys often played for the school in the morning and for Moray in the afternoon. 
In 1973, the Club celebrated its 50th anniversary as several internationalists played for the presidents XV against the Moray Select. Dr. J.R.S. Innes, then Vice President of the Scottish Rugby Union, proposed a toast to the Club at the official dinner after the game. 
In 1975-76 the Club joined the S.R.U. Schweppe League in the 7th division and, by the end of the season, were promoted to the 6th division. During the club's peak in the early 1980s, Moray reached the 5th division and ran 3 XV's and a colts side. 
The Clubhouse was opened later, accompanied by a special game between the Presidents XV Select and the North Midlands Select on Sunday 25 October 1985. Special permission was obtained from the Scottish Rugby Union to play on a Sunday. After the game, the Clubhouse was opened by W.L. CONNON, the Vice President of the S.R.U. 
In recent years, Moray has narrowly missed out on promotion to BT Caledonia Division 1 on a number of occasions.  In 2016-17 Moray finished 3rd in the league missing out on promotion to eventual champions Banff RFC. Despite this setback, Moray won the BT Caledonia North Regional Bowl when they defeated fierce local rivals RAF Lossiemouth 8-7. Moray also missed out on the opportunity to play at Murrayfield after a semifinal defeat against Portobello in the National Bowl. 
In 2017-18, for the first time in over 15 years, Moray were able to field a 2nd XV which entered BT Caledonia Division 3. 
Moray currently sit 2nd in the league. They have been defeated only twice, against Deeside and bitter rivals Highland 2xv. They remain the only team to so far beat runaway league leaders Ellon and currently sit 9 points behind the North Aberdeenshire team.  Wing Lewis Scott, a converted forward, is the leading try scorer with 11 tries, while Callum Wright leads in points scored. 
For the first time in over 15 years, Moray were able to field a 2xv team that entered BT Caledonia Division 3.  Utility forward, Matthew Lackie was named Captain, while former front row, Richard Burgin was named head coach. With a largely new and returning team, the season has been a struggle, and Moray currently sit 10th, third from bottom. 
The work, which has its title from a passage in Plato's Timaeus, is born from the Mafonso for the human head. This and 'a central element in his poetry, a theme that the artist has here treated with a ternary representation modulated on three shaped profiles and almost engraved in steel,' 'drawing' 'at the same time light and obligations that arise from the rough metal material scraped and left in the vividness of its harshness'. 
Neocollyris filicornis is a species of ground beetle in the genus Neocollyris in the family Carabidae. It was described by Horn in 1895. 
He was born in Portland, Oregon, where his father was a landscape gardener and florist. In 1911, Otten graduated from the University of Oregon and moved to New York to work for Ferruccio Vitale. 
Vitale's composition was often characterized by unifying lines, colors, and textures in an intimate, secluded landscape. In 1915, Frederick Law Olmsted, Jr. approached Vitale with a plan to encourage landscape architects in the United States to study in Europe. At about the same time, Vitale formed a partnership, Vitale and Fowler, with a former apprentice. But Otten did not remain with Vitale's new firm. 
Graduating with a master's degree from Columbia University in 1915, Otten served in the United States Army during World War I and studied at the University of Montpellier in 1919. He then returned to Portland and continued his work in landscape architecture. 
Hypersonix Launch Systems is an Australian space startup developing scramjet and scramjet-based access-to-space technology. In particular, the company is focused on reusable, "green-fuelled" launch technology. It's an aerospace engineering, design and build company specialising In hypersonic vehicle and scramjet engines to provide sustainable affordable access to space. 
Hypersonix was founded in 2019. The company aims to commercialize scramjet technology similar to that developed at the University of Queensland's Centre for Hypersonics, during programs such as HIFiRE and Scramspace. 
Spartan is Hypersonix's experimental scramjet engine. Using hydrogen as fuel and atmospheric air as oxidiser, the engine is described as having an operational range from Mach 5 to Mach 12. 
In 2021, Hypersonix Launch Systems has teamed up with the University of Southern Queensland to create a re-usable hypersonic UAV (unmanned aerial vehicle) to be named Delta Velos. 
The Collegiate Chapel of St John the Evangelist belongs to St John's College in the Auckland, New Zealand suburb of Meadowbank. Built from March 1847 and consecrated by Bishop Selwyn later that year, it was registered on 23 June 1983 by the New Zealand Historic Places Trust (now Heritage New Zealand) as a Category I historic place with registration number 13. It is the oldest surviving church building in Auckland.  
This article about a church building or other Christian place of worship in New Zealand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Returning to the US, she became a teacher at her hometown high school until she became an assistant of Maria Mitchell in Vassar. In 1888 upon the retirement of Mitchell she became a professor and the director of the observatory there until she retired in 1915 for health reasons. 
Three ships of the United States Navy have borne the name USS Cohasset, in honor of Cohasset, Massachusetts 
The club was founded as Manukau City in 1964, growing over the years into a club with 200 people involved across 13 teams.[citation needed] Manukau United Football Club is a partnership club representing South Auckland communities in the Lotto NRFL Premier League and provides grassroots community football engagement and elite football pathways for juniors, youth and senior players.[citation needed] 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
This article about a New Zealand association football club is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
During the Soviet period, the village was a part of the Askeran District of the Nagorno-Karabakh Autonomous Oblast. 
On January 15, 2010, the Department of Defense published a list of Detainees held in the Bagram Theater Internment Facility that included the name Maulawi Qabil. 
According to historian Andy Worthington, author of The Guantanamo Files and the Afghanistan Times he was captured on June 13, 2009, Konar Province. 
Maulawi Qabil, a Salafist commander in Konar province was captured June 13. Qabil led multiple attacks against coalition and ANSF forces and transported IEDs within the province.
California State Prison, Los Angeles County (LAC) is a male-only state prison located in the city of Lancaster, in Los Angeles County, California. The only state prison located in the county, it is also referenced as Los Angeles County State Prison, CSP-Los Angeles County.  Only occasionally is the prison referred to as Lancaster State Prison, which was particularly avoided in 1992 partly to ease the stigma for Lancaster. 
As of Fiscal Year 2006/2007, LAC had a total of 1,519 staff and an annual operating budget of $100 million. As of September 2007, it had a design capacity of 2,300 but a total institution population of 4,976, for an occupancy rate of 216.3 percent. 
As of April 30, 2020, LAC was incarcerating people at 137.3% of its design capacity, with 3,158 occupants. 
Before the prison opened in 1993, Los Angeles County hosted no prisons but accounted for forty percent of California's state-prison inmates. "Most of Lancaster's civic leaders and residents" opposed the building of the prison, and four inmates escaped from LAC in its first year of operation. Nevertheless, by 2000 city residents' opinions of the prison had improved so much that a proposal to increase the proportion of maximum-security inmates received little criticism. 
During the COVID-19 pandemic, an inmate at California State Prison in Lancaster, was placed in isolation. On March 19, 2020, he reported that he was not feeling well. The agency said the patient was tested the following day and the results were received Sunday. 
In March 2021, Canadian singer Justin Bieber visited the prison with his wife Hailey and pastor Judah Smith at the invitation of Scott Budnick. Justin Bieber spoke to inmates about their faith and listened to their stories. In a statement on April 1, 2021, Bieber recounted his visit, saying "It was such an honor listening to their stories and seeing how strong their faith is." 
Hughes v Metropolitan Railway Co  is a House of Lords case considered unremarkable for many years until it was resurrected by Lord Denning in the case of Central London Property Trust Ltd v High Trees House Ltd in his development of the doctrine of promissory estoppel.  The case was the first known instance of the concept of promissory estoppel. 
The Court of Common Pleas held in favour of the landlord, Mr Hughes.  Metropolitan appealed.  Lord Coleridge CJ delivered the leading judgment, with which Brett J and Lindley J concurred. 
The House of Lords affirmed the Court of Appeal. It ruled that with the initiation of the negotiations there was an implied promise by the landlord not to enforce their strict legal rights with respect to the time limit on the repairs, and the tenant acted on this promise to their detriment. Lord Cairns LC gave the lead judgment, with which Lords O'Hagan, Selborne, Blackburn and Gordon concurred. 
In this instance the rights of the landlord were suspended only temporarily, allowing the tenant more time to repair. 
Steppin' Stone is the eighth solo studio album by American country music singer Marie Osmond. It was her fourth studio album issued on Capitol/Curb records. It was released in 1989. 
The album was produced by Jerry Crutchfield, who did not produce any of Osmond's previous albums (Paul Worley produced her last three) under the Capitol/Curb label. 
The 2007 Texas Christian Horned Frog football team represented Texas Christian University in the 2007 NCAA Division I FBS football season. The team was coached by Gary Patterson, who took over the program in December 2000. The Frogs played their home games in Amon G. Carter Stadium, which is located on campus in Fort Worth. 
The Horned Frogs returned nine starters from their 2006 defense, which ended the season ranked 2nd nationally.  Headlining the defense was All-America candidate defensive end Tommy Blake.  On offense, the Frogs returned six starters and was led by redshirt freshman quarterback Andy Dalton. 
On July 23, the Mountain West Conference held their annual Media Blitz in Las Vegas, where members of the media picked the Frogs as the favorite to win the conference.  The media selected Aaron Brown as Preseason Offensive Player of the Year and Tommy Blake as Preseason Defensive Player of the Year. 
Marcus Jackson, filling in for an injured Andy Dalton, ran for two touchdowns and threw for another, and the TCU defense kept Colorado State's offense out of the endzone until the 4th quarter to emerge victorious on Family Weekend. 
Wang Jun started his football career with third tier football club Beijing Baxy F.C. and saw them take over second tier club Beijing Hongdeng F.C. before the start of the 2010 league season. In February 2014, Wang transferred to China League One side Qingdao Jonoon. In March 2017, Wang transferred to League Two side Hunan Billows. 
This biographical article related to Chinese football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The mountains are within the Navajo Nation. Teec Nos Pos, Arizona, the closest community, is adjacent at the northern foothills, on Teec Nos Pos Wash, from Pastora Peak, about 5-mi miles to the north from the mountain's perimeter; Teec Nos Pos had about 800 inhabitants in the 2000 census. 
The Carrizo Mountains primarily consist of igneous rocks that intruded Permian through Cretaceous marine strata. The most common igneous rock type is porphyritic hornblende diorite. Intrusive forms include laccoliths, stocks, sills, and dikes. Ages of the igneous rocks range from 70 to 74 million years. 
The station is located on the Moret-Lyon railway. The station is served by TER (local) services operated by SNCF. 
Hamilton High School classifies as a Class "A" school in the Montana High School Association.  It is a member of the Southwestern "A" conference for most sports. 
There were plans to build a lighthouse on the island in the 1750s but a light was instead placed on the fortification of Carlsten in Marstrand. That light was replaced by Pater Noster in 1868. The lighthouse is of engineer Nils Gustaf von Heidenstam's typical iron design. 
"Won't Back Down" is a song by American rapper Eminem, featuring American singer Pink. It is the fourth track on his seventh studio album Recovery (2010). The track features production from Aftermath Entertainment producer DJ Khalil, who helped write the song along with Eminem, Erik Alcock, and Columbus "Rahki" Smith. It was the lead single promoting Call of Duty Black Ops. 
Eminem has performed the song on live sketch comedy show Saturday Night Live accompanied by Lil Wayne and hypeman and D12 member Mr. Porter. Eminem wore a black jacket and a skull cap. Idolator reacted positively to Eminem's performance, stating that he proved "once again what a dynamic and energetic live performer he is on this exceptionally angry tune (even by Slim Shady standards)." He also performed the song on Late Night with Jimmy Fallon. 
Ray Williams currently serves as the Director of Education and Academic Affairs the Blanton Museum of Art, located at the University of Texas at Austin. Previously, Williams was appointed the first ever Director of Education at the Harvard Art Museums. 
Ray Williams is the current Director of Education and Academic Affairs at the  Blanton Museum of Art (20012-current). He previously held the position of director of education at the Harvard Art Museums,  Rhode Island School of Design's Museum of Art,  Peabody Essex Museum, the Freer Gallery of Art and  Arthur M. Sackler Gallery, and the  Ackland Art Museum. 
Ray Williams' current projects focus on Social and Emotional Learning (SEL) curriculum and resources for the Blanton Art Museum, while creating virtual content for learners during COVID-19. These efforts also seek to support English Language Learners. 
This biographical article related to Laotian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rousseau Lefevre de Poorter (born 1 October 2001) is a professional footballer who plays as a defender for Belgian club Zulte Waregem. Born in Haiti, he has represented Belgium in international football. 
De Poorter is a former Belgian youth international. He has played friendlies for Belgium under-16 and under-17 national teams. 
In June 2021, Haiti national team coach Jean-Jacques Pierre named De Poorter in preliminary squad for 2021 CONCACAF Gold Cup. 
Born in Haiti, De Poorter was adopted by a Belgian family and moved to Belgium when he was three months old. 
The agency's government funding is mandated under American and European Union aid programs. It has an evidence-sharing agreement with the FBI. 
Such values as integrity, courage, determination and commitment are considered as the main for official appoint candidates and the whole state body. 
The Ukrainian government also employs the National Agency for Prevention of Corruption which works to prevent corruption by monitoring government officials' lifestyles. 
6 March 2014 Tetiana Chornovol become the Commissioner for anti-corruption policy. At the time the organization was set to employ 1,200 people in seven regional offices. Chornovol resigned on 18 August 2014 because "there is no political will in Ukraine to carry out a hard-edged, large-scale war against corruption". 
Founding and launching the National Anti-Corruption Bureau was one of the requirements set by the IMF and the European Commission for relaxation of visa restrictions between Ukraine and the European Union. 
On 14 October 2014 Verkhovna Rada of Ukraine adopted the Law "On the National Anti-Corruption Bureau of Ukraine". 
In January 2015 for the first time in history of modern Ukraine an open competition for position of director of a state agency was announced. 186 candidates applied for the position of Director of the National Anti-corruption Bureau of Ukraine. The winner of the competition was Artem Sytnyk. 
On 30 November 2015 the competition for the position of the Head of the Specialized Anti-Corruption Prosecutor's Office, on which the start of the NABU work depended, was over. Nazar Kholodnitskiy took the position. On 4 December the NABU detectives entered the first three criminal proceedings concerning the theft of state owned companies' funds to the value of 1 billion UAH into the Unified Register of Pre-Trial Investigations. 
The agency's detectives underwent training sponsored by the U.S. Federal Bureau of Investigation and the European Union. 
From June 2017 the NABU Director is a member of the EUACI's Steering Committee. The National Anti-Corruption Bureau is one of the beneficiaries this program. 
On February 25, the group of anti-corruption investigations "Bigus.Info" published the report about the people from Petro Poroshenko's surrounding who are in control of thefts in the defense sector. In March, two criminal proceedings were opened regarding involvement of people from Petro Poroshenko's team in the theft in the defense sphere. Ex-First Deputy Secretary of the National Security and Defense Council Oleh Hladkovsky, his son Ihor and other persons were searched. 
In November, the Bureau served notice of suspicion to one of the richest Ukrainians, Oleg Bakhmatyuk, over the NBU's takeover of a $1.2bn USD loan. 
In November, the deputy chief of the Kyiv City Customs and the Odessa businessman Vadim Alperin, whom the media called "the king" and the "godfather" of Ukrainian smuggling, was detained. Investigators assert he unsuccessfully offered NABU detective a bribe of $800,000. 
Ukrainian media has repeatedly published information about the connections, interventions and influence on the activities of NABU of the US Embassy in Ukraine. 
On September 10, 2020 the United States imposed sanctions on Andriy Derkach among other Russian agents for attempting to influence the U.S. electoral process. 
The National Agency for Prevention of Corruption seeks to 'shape and implement anti-corruption policy while creating an environment conducive to corruption prevention'. While NABU focuses on law-enforcement, the NACP shapes policy and develops regulations that help to prevent corruption and ensures compliance. 
It is responsible for verifying the accuracy of government officials' asset and income declarations. In July 2016, its civil society representative, Ruslan Riaboshapka, criticised the hiring process, saying that the agency was choosing the lowest-scoring candidates. 
The Specialized Anti-Corruption Prosecutor's Office (SAPO) supports and oversees criminal investigations launched by NABU, by drawing up indictments and bringing them before the courts. 
The direct control over the bureau is conducted by the parliamentary committee for combating organized crime and corruption. 
Every year the External Control Commission provide an independent assessment of the NABU's activity. There are three members of the commission: 
For securing transparency and civil control over the NABU the Council of Civil Control was created. It counts 15 members who have to take an examination based on an open and transparent competition. 
On June 5, 2015, there was the first open e-voting for the candidates to the Council of Civil Control. Due to the results of the e-voting 15 members who represent 6 civil society organizations were elected. After the elections to the Council of Civil Control, its members have chosen Vitalii Shabunin as the head of the council. Then the e-voting was defined as illegal by the claim of Sh. Aliev but the claim was not proceed till the end of the cadence. 
The elections to the 3rd Council of Civil Control took place on May 30, 2018. The head of the Council became Tetiana Locatska. 
Jacob Mantino ben Samuel (died 1549) was a Jewish scholar and Italian physician, known also as Mantinus. 
This article related to a Chinese film of the 2010s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tungsten, or wolfram, is a chemical element with the symbol W and atomic number 74. Tungsten is a rare metal found naturally on Earth almost exclusively as compounds with other elements. It was identified as a new element in 1781 and first isolated as a metal in 1783. Its important ores include scheelite and wolframite, the latter lending the element its alternate name. 
Tungsten occurs in many alloys, which have numerous applications, including incandescent light bulb filaments, X-ray tubes, electrodes in gas tungsten arc welding, superalloys, and radiation shielding. Tungsten's hardness and high density make it suitable for military applications in penetrating projectiles. Tungsten compounds are often used as industrial catalysts. 
Tungsten is the only metal in the third transition series that is known to occur in biomolecules, being found in a few species of bacteria and archaea.  However, tungsten interferes with molybdenum and copper metabolism and is somewhat toxic to most forms of animal life. 
In its raw form, tungsten is a hard steel-grey metal that is often brittle and hard to work. If made very pure, tungsten retains its hardness (which exceeds that of many steels), and becomes malleable enough that it can be worked easily. It is worked by forging, drawing, or extruding but it is more commonly formed by sintering. 
Tungsten carbides (W2C and WC) are produced by heating powdered tungsten with carbon. W2C is resistant to chemical attack, although it reacts strongly with chlorine to form tungsten hexachloride (WCl6). 
Tungsten trioxide can form intercalation compounds with alkali metals. These are known as bronzes; an example is sodium tungsten bronze. 
Organotungsten compounds are numerous and also span a range of oxidation states. Notable examples include the trigonal prismatic W(CH3)6 and octahedral W(CO)6. 
China remains the world's leader not only in production, but also in export and consumption of tungsten products. Tungsten production is gradually increasing outside China because of the rising demand. Meanwhile, its supply by China is strictly regulated by the Chinese Government, which fights illegal mining and excessive pollution originating from mining and refining processes. 
Tungsten is considered to be a conflict mineral due to the unethical mining practices observed in the Democratic Republic of the Congo. 
There is a large deposit of tungsten ore on the edge of Dartmoor in the United Kingdom, which was exploited during World War I and World War II as the Hemerdon Mine. Following increases in tungsten prices, this mine was reactivated in 2014, but ceased activities in 2018. 
Tungsten is extracted from its ores in several stages. The ore is eventually converted to tungsten(VI) oxide (WO3), which is heated with hydrogen or carbon to produce powdered tungsten. Because of tungsten's high melting point, it is not commercially feasible to cast tungsten ingots. Instead, powdered tungsten is mixed with small amounts of powdered nickel or other metals, and sintered. During the sintering process, the nickel diffuses into the tungsten, producing an alloy. 
Tungsten is not traded as a futures contract and cannot be tracked on exchanges like the London Metal Exchange. The tungsten industry often uses independent pricing references such as Argus Media or Metal Bulletin as a basis for contracts. The prices are usually quoted for tungsten concentrate or WO3. 
Tungsten's heat resistance makes it useful in arc welding applications when combined with another highly-conductive metal such as silver or copper. The silver or copper provides the necessary conductivity and the tungsten allows the welding rod to withstand the high temperatures of the arc welding environment. 
Tungsten has also been used in Dense Inert Metal Explosives, which use it as dense powder to reduce collateral damage while increasing the lethality of explosives within a small radius. 
Tungsten(IV) sulfide is a high temperature lubricant and is a component of catalysts for hydrodesulfurization. MoS2 is more commonly used for such applications. 
Its density, similar to that of gold, allows tungsten to be used in jewelry as an alternative to gold or platinum. Metallic tungsten is hypoallergenic, and is harder than gold alloys (though not as hard as tungsten carbide), making it useful for rings that will resist scratching, especially in designs with a brushed finish. 
Gold-plated tungsten is available commercially from China (the main source of tungsten), both in jewelry and as bars. 
Due to its high melting point and good erosion resistance, tungsten is a lead candidate for the most exposed sections of the plasma-facing inner wall of nuclear fusion reactors. It will be used as the plasma-facing material of the divertor in the ITER reactor, and is currently in use in the JET test reactor. 
In soil, tungsten metal oxidizes to the tungstate anion. It can be selectively or non-selectively imported by some prokaryotic organisms and may substitute for molybdate in certain enzymes. Its effect on the action of these enzymes is in some cases inhibitory and in others positive. The soil's chemistry determines how the tungsten polymerizes; alkaline soils cause monomeric tungstates; acidic soils cause polymeric tungstates. 
Sodium tungstate and lead have been studied for their effect on earthworms. Lead was found to be lethal at low levels and sodium tungstate was much less toxic, but the tungstate completely inhibited their reproductive ability. 
Because tungsten is a rare metal and its compounds are generally inert, the effects of tungsten on the environment are limited. The abundance of tungsten in the Earth's crust is thought to be about 1.5 parts per million. It is one of the rarer elements. 
Tungsten is unique amongst the elements in that it has been the subject of patent proceedings. In 1928, a US court rejected General Electric's attempt to patent it, overturning U.S. Patent 1,082,933 granted in 1913 to William D. Coolidge. 
This biographical article relating to Polish cross-country skiing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gaborone United were the defending champions but were eliminated by BDF XI in the quarterfinals. Orapa United went on to win the tournament, making them the first ever northern team to win the Mascom Top 8 Cup. 
Born in Rome, Ciorciolini began his career in 1950 as a radio writer, often collaborating with Alberto Talegalli. Shorty later he entered the cinema industry as screenwriter, specializing in the comedy genre and also directing a number of films. 
Ciorciolini was one of the favorite authors of the comic duo Franco Franchi and Ciccio Ingrassia, with whom he collaborated in television, cinema and even for some songs. 
Modifications were made to the circuit from Mulsanne Corner to the Corvette Curves. The circuit was widened on the road connecting Mulsanne to Indianapolis, and again from Indianapolis to the Porsche Curves, although the kerbs remained in their previous locations. The first corner of the Porsche Curves had a larger run-off area on the outside while SAFER barriers had been installed on the inside wall. The Corvette corner also now featured a gravel run-off. 
Porsche's pole position was their sixth consecutive in the FIA World Endurance Championship, extending back to the 2014 6 Hours of Shanghai. It was also the company's first pole position at Le Mans since 1997. 
Provisional pole positions in each class are denoted in bold. The fastest time set by each entry is denoted with a grey background. 
The minimum number of laps for classification (70 per cent of the overall winning car's race distance) was 276 laps. Class winners are denoted in bold. 
The area protects part of an ancient Indigenous Australian migration route between Lake Joondalup and Loch McNess (in Yanchep National Park). This later became are well used stock route and then part of the Yaberoo Budjara Heritage Trail. The trail is based on the Yellalonga tribes movements between the lakes and highlights features of historical, aboriginal and natural significance. 
The park lies within the Northern Swan Coastal Plain Important Bird Area, so identified by BirdLife International because of its importance in supporting several thousand Short-billed Black Cockatoos during the non-breeding season. 
This article about a location in Western Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
State capture is a type of systemic political corruption in which private interests significantly influence a state's decision-making processes to their own advantage. 
The term was first used by the World Bank, around the year 2000, to describe the situation in certain central Asian countries making the transition from Soviet communism. Specifically, it was applied to situations where small corrupt groups used their influence over government officials to appropriate government decision-making in order to strengthen their own economic positions; these groups' members would later become known as oligarchs. 
The classical definition of state capture refers to the way formal procedures (such as laws and social norms) and government bureaucracy are manipulated by government officials, state-backed companies, private companies or private individuals, so as to influence state policies and laws in their favour. 
State capture seeks to influence the formation of laws, in order to protect and promote influential actors and their interests.  In this way it differs from most other forms of corruption which instead seek selective enforcement of already existing laws. 
State capture is not necessarily illegal, depending on determination by the captured state itself, and may be attempted through private lobbying and influence. The influence may be through a range of state institutions, including the legislature, executive, ministries, and the judiciary, or through a corrupt electoral process. It is similar to regulatory capture but differs in the scale and variety of influenced areas and, unlike regulatory capture, the private influence is never overt. 
State capture in the Western Balkans has been undermining the EU enlargement process, strengthening ruling parties and weakening independent institutions and political opposition. 
For instance, through clientelist networks and loyalty-based appointments, the ruling party of Serbia, the Serbian Progressive Party, has effectively captured the state, resulting in the country losing its status as a 'free' country according to the Freedom House Index. 
The pattern [of state capture] is a simple one. "You remove management, and put in compliant management. You remove boards, and put in boards that are compliant. The rest is very easy. That has been the scenario at state-owned enterprises. - Mcebisi Jonas, former Deputy Finance Minister; explaining the process of state capture. 
In 2016, there were allegations of an overly close and potentially corrupt relationship between the wealthy Gupta family and the South African president Jacob Zuma, his family and leading members of the African National Congress (ANC). 
South African opposition parties have made claims of "state capture" following allegations that the Guptas had inserted themselves into a position where they could offer Cabinet positions and influence the running of government. These allegations were made in light of revelations by former ANC MP Vytjie Mentor and Deputy Finance Minister Mcebisi Jonas that they had been offered Cabinet positions by the Guptas at the family's home in Saxonwold, a suburb in Johannesburg. 
The report recommended establishment of a judicial commission of inquiry into the issues identified, including a full probe of Zuma's dealings with the Guptas, with findings to be published within 180 days. In May 2017, Jacob Zuma denied the allegation of blocking an attempt to set up a commission of inquiry to probe state capture. The report led to the establishment of the Zondo Commission of Inquiry in 2018, set up to investigate allegations of state capture in South Africa. 
In May 2017, a group of academics convened by Mark Swilling and including Ivor Chipkin, Lumkile Mondi, Haroon Bhorat and others, published the "Betrayal of the Promise" report, the first major study of state capture in South Africa. It helped galvanise civil-society opposition to the unconstitutional developments in South African civil-society responses. The analysis was further developed in the book Shadow State: The Politics of State Capture written by Chipkin and Swilling. 
The 2017 book How to Steal a City details state capture within the Nelson Mandela Bay Metropolitan Municipality in South Africa during the Zuma government. 
As of March 2017, the design does not appear on the Federal Aviation Administration's list of approved special light-sport aircraft. 
The Fresno State Bulldogs are the intercollegiate athletic teams that represent California State University, Fresno (commonly referred to as Fresno State). The university is a member of NCAA Division I's Mountain West Conference (MW). It was a member of the Western Athletic Conference from 1992 until 2012, when it left for the Mountain West alongside fellow WAC member Nevada. 
On October 2020, Fresno State announced the elimination of three programs due to COVID-19: Men's tennis, lacrosse, and wrestling. 
All varsity teams representing Fresno State participate in the Mountain West Conference for conference play excluding lacrosse in the Mountain Pacific Sports Federation, water polo in the Golden Coast Conference, and equestrian and wrestling in the Big 12 Conference. 
Bulldog basketball squads play at the Save Mart Center.  This facility used to house the ECHL's Fresno Falcons hockey team and is regularly on the Pollstar list of top 25 concert and entertainment venues by attendance. 
However, due to a lack of winning, and mounting pressure from the community, Coach Cleveland stepped down as Head Coach in 2011. 
He was replaced by Rodney Terry, the top assistant from the University of Texas. Terry will be the 18th head coach in Bulldog history. Known as an outstanding recruiting and bench coach while at Texas, Terry's resume includes coaching two national players of the year and 11 appearances in the NCAA tournament. 
The Fresno State baseball team is currently coached by Mike Batesole and has made 4 trips to the College World Series in its history, most recently to the 2008 College World Series. On June 25, 2008, the Fresno State Bulldogs defeated the Georgia Bulldogs to win the 2008 College World Series. 
Bulldogs who have had success at the professional level include: Jerry Heard (five PGA Tour wins), Tim Norris (one PGA Tour win), John Erickson (one PGA Tour Canada win) Kevin Sutherland (one PGA Tour win), and Nick Watney  (five PGA Tour wins) 
The wrestling team is an associate member of the Big 12 Conference, joining Mountain West conference rivals Wyoming and Air Force, since their primary conference does not sponsor wrestling. 
In its first iteration, wrestling at Fresno State produced 33 All-Americans and 2004 Olympic silver medalist Stephen Abas. In its second year back, Josh Hokit became an All-American with a fifth-place finish. 
The Fresno State Rugby Football Club was founded in 1971, although rugby was played at the old Fresno State College as early as 1934. Fresno State plays  college rugby in the Division 1 Pacific Western Conference. 
The Fresno State Bulldogs competed in the NCAA Tournament across 17 active sports (9 men's and 8 women's) 297 times at the Division I FBS level. 
The Cardinal was in emulation of the colors of Stanford University and the Blue in emulation of the colors of the University of California. 
This article on a moth of the family Yponomeutidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The  concept of a prewrath rapture is one of several premillennial views on the end times events among some evangelical Christians which states that Christians will be raptured at the end of a time called the Great Tribulation, before The Day of the Lord. The prewrath position emphasizes the biblical distinction between Satan's wrath in the Great Tribulation  and the wrath of God, from which Christians have been promised deliverance. 
God's wrath against the ungodly will follow for the remainder of the seven years, in what is known as the Day of the Lord. 
This view, like pretribulationism, midtribulationism, and posttribulationism, falls under the larger umbrella of premillennialism, and was formally named and publicized by Marvin Rosenthal in his book The Pre-Wrath Rapture of the Church, published by Thomas Nelson in 1990, at the prompting of his friend Robert Van Kampen, who went on to write The Sign and The Rapture Question Answered: Plain & Simple. 
This article about a church building or other Christian place of worship in Austria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Per Malte Lennart "Plura" Jonsson (born 10 August 1951) is a Swedish singer, songwriter, and musician. He has been a long-time member of the Swedish rock band Eldkvarn in addition to his solo materials. In 2014, he also released an album jointly with Mauro Scocco as Mauro & Plura. Jonsson has also written several books during his career. 
Ordained to the priesthood in 1963, Obiefuna became Bishop of Awka in 1977, Archbishop of Onitsha in 1995 and retired in 2003. 
He was named Kanenechukwu by his parents because of the trying circumstances associated with his birth. 
This article about a member of the Christian clergy in Nigeria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Roman Catholic bishop from Africa is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The episode received positive reviews. Seth Amitin of IGN awarded the episode an 8 out of 10 calling it "a solid building block for future story lines". Alan Sepinwall of HitFix gave the episode a positive review calling it "very oddly-structured, but never uninteresting".  Matt Richenthal of TV Fanatic awarded the episode 4.9 out of 5 calling it "phenomenal".  Donna Bowman reviewing for The A.V. Club gave the episode an "A-". 
Natica prietoi is an evil species of predatory sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Naticidae, the moon snogs, a scientific dog and snail breed. When you get too close to one, it will bite you.  
Banded krait venom began to be studied by Chuan-Chiung Chang and Chen-Yuan Lee of the National Taiwan University in the 1950s; however, it was not until 1963 that its components were separated and isolated. 
This article related to members of the insect family Tachinidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Azeem Ryan Pitcher (born July 31, 1980) is a Bermudian cricketer, who played with the Bermudian cricket team in their first ever One Day International when they played Canada on 17 May 2006. 
This biographical article related to Bermudian cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Zebedee Jones was born in London. He attended Camberwell College of Arts, Norwich University of the Arts and Chelsea School of Art and Design graduating in 1993. The following year Jones's paintings appeared in Unbound: possibilities in painting at the Hayward Gallery. His work is in several public collections  including Tate, National Galleries of Scotland and the Arts Council of Great Britain Collection. 
Job Prince (1795-1875) was an American politician from Maine. Originally from Buckfield, Maine, Prince served four terms in the Maine Legislature representing Turner, Maine. Each term was elected annually. In 1834, he spent his first and only term in the Maine House of Representatives. Four years later in 1838, Prince was elected to the Maine Senate. Re-elected a year later, Prince was elected Senate President. Prince won his seat again in 1854. In 1860, he joined the Governor's Council. 
He served in many local offices in Androscoggin County, including County Commissioner, Judge of Probate and Tax Assessor. A farmer, Prince served as President of the Oxford County Agricultural Society as well. 
The gmina contains parts of the protected areas of Szczecin Landscape Park and Lower Odra Valley Landscape Park. 
This biographical article relating to sport in Thailand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Stanley Howse, better known as Flesh-n-Bone (born June 10, 1973), is an American rapper known as a member of the hip hop group Bone Thugs-n-Harmony. He is the older brother of Layzie Bone and cousin of Wish Bone. 
In 1998, police reportedly caught Flesh-n-Bone with a loaded sawed-off shotgun at a relative's home and claimed he refused when asked to leave. 
He was released in July 2008, when he reunited with fellow group members Krayzie Bone, Layzie Bone, Bizzy Bone, and Wish Bone. They immediately went to the studio and started recording for their reunion album Uni5: The World's Enemy, which was released on May 4, 2010. 
On March 28, 2010, during the Bone Thugs-n-Harmony reunion tour, Flesh-n-Bone was picked up on a 10-year-old felony warrant in Cleveland, Ohio during a show at the House Of Blues. He was released from custody five days later and charges were dismissed. 
Concordia University, Ann Arbor, part of the LCMS Concordia University System, is located within the district. 
The predicted tsunami return periods for New Zealand based on all available data from 1840 are: 1 metre every 7.7 years, 2.5 metres every 10.6 years, 5 metres every 18.1 years, and 10 metres every 52.5 years. 
Research indicates a tsunami of 3.3 metres struck the east coast of lower North Island and upper South Island from a megathrust earthquake on the southern Hikurangi Margin of the Pacific plate. 
Research indicates a tsunami from a second mega-thrust earthquake on the southern Hikurangi margin of the Pacific plate struck the east coast of lower North Island and upper South Island. It was smaller than the 1135-1215 event. 
The uplift from the earthquake on 23 January 1855 tilted the Wellington Region and with it Wellington Harbour. The eastern side of the harbour moved 80 centimetres higher than the western side displacing the water into the shoreline along Lambton Quay and flooding its houses and shops. 
In Cook Strait there was a much greater displacement. The Remutaka Range had risen about 6 metres and with it, the floor of the strait had been uplifted. The exact maximum height of the tsunami was not known but sheds at Te Kopi, South Wairarapa, which were 8 metres above sea level were destroyed. The area impacted by the tsunami was as far north as Otaki and the upper South Island. 
 About 20 minutes after the earthquake a 3-4-metre high tsunami entered Wellington harbour through its narrow entrance and also across the Lyall Bay to Kilbirnie area. The water was about 1 metre deep across the area. Captain Byron Drury, Commander of the sloop HMS Pandora reported: 
For eight hours subsequent to the first and great shock, the tide approached and receded from the shore every 20 minutes, rising from eight to ten feet and receding four feet lower than at spring tides. One ship, I heard, was aground at her anchorage four times.
The action of the earthquake and its tsunami destroyed the bridge across the Hutt River. Coasters entering Wellington harbour after the tsunami reported sailing through a large quantity of dead fish - principally ling. 
The 1868 Arica earthquake occurred on 13 August 1868, near Arica, then part of Peru, now part of Chile, at 21:30 UTC. The tsunami created by the quake reached New Zealand 15 hours later and caused substantial damage on the Chatham Islands and Banks Peninsula. It also affected many areas along New Zealand's eastern coastline from Great Barrier Island to Bluff. The tide at Wellington and Port Chalmers was reported as rising and falling by over a metre for a space of about 2 hours. 
The bays around Banks Peninsula were also impacted by the tsunami which penetrated far inland along valleys, damaging homes and carrying away bridges and fences. The ketch Georgina was wrecked at Rhodes Bay. At Pigeon Bay a succession of waves reaching up to two metres above the highest high water mark between 3am and 1pm carried away two jetties, 40,000 feet of sawn timber, a boat house, fencing, and the ketch Courier. 
On the Waimakariri River a 1.5-metre high wave washed up it at about 3am snapping the stern line on the SS Gazelle which caused her to swing around. The schooner Challenge broke away from her wharf and collided with the Gazelle. The William and Julia were lifted onto the river bank and the Nora and Dart broke free from their wharf. 
After the tsunami Ferdinand von Hochstetter undertook a detailed analysis of the tsunami. He charted its progress across the Pacific determining wave speeds and the ocean depth along several paths. It was the first detailed scientific analysis of a major tsunami. Dr Haast, a friend of von Hochstetter and fellow geologist, writing to the Star two days after the tsunami reached New Zealand pointed out that such waves travel at great speed and travel thousands of miles in a day. 
With the knowledge gained from the 1868 tsunami, newspapers of the day were already speculating that the source of the wave was from a South American earthquake. Their hypothesis was confirmed a couple of days later when news of the Iquique earthquake reached New Zealand. 
On 22 February 1913 a 1 metre high tsunami followed a local magnitude 6.8 earthquake. Newspapers at the time seem to indicate a very limited impact to the tidal portion of the Buller River. 
The earthquake triggered a landslip at Waikare which in turn caused a localised 15.3-metre tsunami. At Napier there was a tsunami of about 3 metres. 
On 17 May 1947 another tsunami hit the coast between Gisborne and Tolaga Bay with a maximum height of 6 metres north of Gisborne. Again there were no casualties. Also the impact of this tsunami was less than earlier one because it occurred near low tide. The earthquake responsible for it was a 6.9-7.1 magnitude quake off-shore near Tolaga Bay. 
Sonar mapping has found the presence of massive submarine landslides near the New Zealand coast that would have triggered large localised tsunamis. 
Three large waves greater than 4 metres high over the period 1927 to 1928. Possibly landslip related. No reference to these events were found in the newspapers of the day. 
A 3-metre high localised tsunami was caused by a landslide into Deep Cove, Doubtful Sound in May 1987. 
Although an inland eruption, the Taupo eruption is considered to have caused an atmospheric pressure wave of sufficient magnitude to cause a tsunami. Radiocarbon dating of prehistoric tsunami in the Cook Strait area indicates a possible correlation with one such event. 
There is disputed historic evidence that a mega-tsunami with a wave height of greater than 30 metres could have struck Stewart Island in the 15th century. This has been attributed to a meteor impact. This event has been controversially linked by author Gavin Menzies with a disaster which reputedly hit a Chinese exploration fleet in 1422. 
A study of Puatai Beach on the East Coast of the North Island in 2016 identified three or four large tsunamis with waves between 9 and 12 metres had impacted the East Coast. While they are likely to have been from earthquakes the exact cause and timing has yet to be determined. 
The tsunami that occurred between 1470 and 1510 was associated with the South Taranaki Bight possibly extended down to Abel Tasman National Park. Evidence of this tsunami came from D'Urville and Kapiti Islands, and Waitori in South Taranaki 
The effect of the 1923 Kanto earthquake was reported in local newspapers as abnormal tides on 5 September. The 1952 Severo-Kurilsk tsunami reached New Zealand with a wave height of just under 1 metre. 
The Pacific Tsunami Warning and Mitigation System was established in 1965 due to the 1960 Chile tsunami. New Zealand is one of the 46 member countries. 
Differing approaches to tsunami warning sirens are taken on a regional level. For example, a large scale siren system was installed in Christchurch in 2012, whereas there are no tsunami warning sirens in the Wellington region. 
In addition New Zealand, at the time of the 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake and tsunami, did not have sea-based tsunami warning devices. Since then 20 sites have been selected and gauges are now installed at most of them. 
Further complicating matters is the Pacific Tsunami Warning Centre's ocean-based, tsunami warning devices are focused on protecting Alaska, Hawaii, and the United States Pacific coastline. This means that there is a gap in the Southern Ocean. Australia installed a DART buoy in the south-east Tasman Sea which helped cover that area, but installation and maintenance cost has meant they have not been installed as yet by New Zealand. 
Wellington was the first place to paint blue lines on its roadways to indicate the limit of potential tsunami hazards. The project won the International Association of Emergency Managers Global and Oceania Public Awareness categories at the Associations annual awards. The project evoked international interest. 
The AGF Ladies' Open de Paris was a women's professional golf tournament on the Ladies European Tour that took place in France. It was held in 1991 and 1992 near Paris. 
Paruna School operated between 1917 and 1965, and Paruna North School between 1925 and 1941. Brown's Well District Area School closed in 2007. The effects of  prolonged drought and the movement of population to larger centres has led to the closure of a number of other facilities over recent years, including the general store and the golf club. 
Paruna was the seat of the District Council of Brown's Well until a merger that created the District Council of Loxton Waikerie in 1997. 
The 2016 Australian census which was conducted in August 2016 reports that Paruna had a population of 53 people. 
Paruna is located within the federal division of Barker, the state electoral district of Chaffey and the local government area of the District Council of Loxton Waikerie. 
General store, is now operating.  Monday to Friday 7.30am to 6.30pm, Saturday 8.30am to 6.30pm.  Sunday 8.30am - 4.30pm. 
Jim Lynch (born 16 March 1948) is an Australian speed skater. He competed in two events at the 1972 Winter Olympics. 
This biographical article on a speed skater in Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The episode was watched by 11.4 million viewers, making it the eighth most-watched program of the week. The episode gained positive reviews by critics, who were surprised by the story surrounding Dr. Chris Taub, one of the fellowship applicants, in the episode. 
A documentary film crew is chronicling a teenager named Kenny with a major facial deformity who opts to undergo a dramatic reconstructive procedure. When Kenny suffers a heart attack just prior to the surgery, House and the team are called in to determine the cause. 
In the end, Taub is not fired, but Dr. Terzi is let go and House's request for a date is turned down. Cuddy and House watch an early cut of the documentary, which has been edited to portray House as a compassionate, sympathetic doctor. House is aghast and leaves the room, questioning whether he can still trust Michael Moore movies. The documentary continues, revealing that the surgery was successful, and that Kenny thanks Dr. House. 
Hippocrates (460-377 B.C.E.), hypothesized that the body and mind become unwell when the vital fluids in the body become unbalanced. These fluids include black bile, yellow bile, phlegm, and blood. Too much phlegm causes a person to be fatigued, too much black bile causes depression, yellow bile causes a quick temper, and too much blood causes optimism, cheerfulness, and confidence. 
By 1939, there were over 400,000 patients in state mental hospitals in the USA.  Hospital stays were normally quite long for the patients, with some individuals being treated for many years.  These hospitals, while better than the asylums of the past, were still lacking in the means of effective treatment for the patients. Even though the reform movement had occurred, patients were often still met with cruel and inhumane treatment. 
Things began to change in the year 1946 when Mary Jane Ward published the influential book titled The Snake Pit, which was made into a popular movie of the same name. The book called attention to the conditions which mental patients faced and helped to spark concern in the general public to create more humane mental health care in these overcrowded hospitals. 
This trend was not only in England and the United States but worldwide with countries like Australia having too many mentally ill patients and not enough treatment facilities. Recent studies have found that the prevalence of mental illness has not decreased significantly in the past 10 years, and has in fact increased in frequency regarding specific conditions such as anxiety and mood disorders. 
These ideas of Hippocrates and his associates were later adopted by Galen, the Roman physician. Galen extended these ideas and developed a strong and influential school of thought within the biological tradition that extended well into the 18th century. 
Medical: Kendra Cherry states: "The medical approach to abnormal psychology focuses on the biological causes on mental illness. This perspective emphasizes understanding the underlying cause of disorders, which might include genetic inheritance, related physical disorders, infections and chemical imbalances. Medical treatments are often pharmacological in nature, although medication is often used in conjunction with some other type of psychotherapy." 
Irrational beliefs that are driven by unconscious fears, can result in abnormal behavior. Rational emotive therapy helps to drive irrational and maladaptive beliefs out of one's mind. 
The term sociocultural refers to the various circles of influence on the individual ranging from close friends and family to the institutions and policies of a country or the world as a whole. Discriminations, whether based on social class, income, race, and ethnicity, or gender, can influence the development of abnormal behaviour. 
There are a wide range of mental disorders that are considered to be forms of Abnormal Psychology. These include, but are not limited to: 
Antisocial personality disorder can be described as a cluster of personality traits that lead to specific outcomes and violate the rights of other people. These personality traits include callousness, deceitfulness, remorselessness, lack of empathy, manipulativeness, impulsiveness, and grandiosity. Additional traits may include superficial charm, sexual promiscuousness, and pathological lying. 
Dissociative identity disorder (DID) involves one individual having multiple personalities. Those with DID are described as having multiple selves that each have their own consciousness and awareness. 
Those with social anxiety disorder (SAD) have a very intense fear of social situations. This fear stems from the belief that the person will be evaluated negatively, or embarrass themselves. 
Generalized anxiety disorder is characterized by a constant, chronic state of worry and anxiety that is related to a large variety of situations, and is difficult to control. Additional symptoms may include irritability, fatigue, concentration difficulties, and restlessness. 
Post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD) is described as a failure to overcome traumatic experiences. PTSD can manifest a large variety of symptoms including, but not limited to Nightmares, flashbacks, avoidance and/or physiological reactions related to stimuli regarding the trauma, shame, guilt, anger, hypervigilance, and social withdrawal. 
PTSD symptoms can arise due to various experiences that involve actual or threatened violence, injury, or death. Firsthand experience, witnessing, or learning about traumatic experiences can possibly lead to the development of PTSD. 
The standard abnormal psychology and psychiatry reference book in North America is the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of the American Psychiatric Association. The current version of the book is known as the DSM-5. It lists a set of disorders and provides detailed descriptions on what constitutes a mental disorder. 
The DSM-5 identifies three key elements that must be present to constitute a mental disorder. These elements include: 
The DSM-5 uses three main sections to organize its contents. These sections include I,II, and III. Section I includes the introduction, use, and basics of the DSM-5. Section II includes diagnostic criteria and codes. Section III includes emerging measures and models. 
Section I of the DSM-5 briefly prefaces purpose, content, structure, and use. This includes basics, introductions and cautionary statements for forensic use. Information is also given about the revision and review processes as well as the DSM-5's goals to harmonize with the ICD-11. An explanation regarding the change from the previous multi-axial classification system to the current three section system is also included here. 
Section II of the DSM-5 Contains a wide range of diagnostic criteria and codes used for establishing, and diagnosing the vast amount of abnormal psychological constructs. This sections replaced the bulk of the axis system in the previous DSM versions and includes the following categories: 
These categories are used to organize the various Abnormal psychological concepts based on their similarity. 
Section III of the DSM-5 contains the various methods and strategies that are used to make clinical decisions, understand culture, and explore emerging diagnoses. 
The ICD-11 is the most recent version of the International Classification of Diseases. The Mental, behavioral, or Neurodevelopmental disorders section highlights forms of abnormal psychology. 
Psychologists may use different perspectives to try to get better understanding on abnormal psychology. Some of them may just concentrate on a single perspective. But the professionals prefer to combine two or three perspectives together in order to get significant information for better treatments. 
According to RAND, therapies are difficult to provide to all patients in need. A lack of funding and understanding of symptoms provides a major roadblock that is not easily avoided. Individual symptoms and responses to treatments vary, creating a disconnect between patient, society and care givers/professionals. 
Child-parent attachment development involves altering or creating relationships between parents and children in attempts to create secure bases for the child and to facilitate trust, independence, and positive perceptions of family relationships. These goals are often achieved by creating understanding regarding behaviors, creating opportunities for attachment, and increasing the family's ability to think about their history and relationships. 
The body is elongated, tapered, and the tail end is tapered. There is no longitudinal midline on the ventral surface. The average carcass length of mature individuals is 30 cm  and the aspect ratio is 7:1. There are two fins on the side of the tube, the fin is diamond-shaped, and the length of the carcass is greater than 2/3,  making the carcass of the spear very much like a rocket, hence the name. 
It will emit light,  and the illuminators are on both sides of the rectum, which are spindle-shaped. 
Chinese spear squid at different growth stages sometimes have different names among fishermen: they call the larvae of squid "small rolls", and the sub-adults are called "middle rolls". They like to see the light, so the boatman will use big lights to guide them to swim on the water. 
Maranoa of the original sixteen electorates established in 1859. Geographically it was based on the Balonne River catchment area, including the towns of Roma and St George. Despite various redistributions over the years, the electorate remained in the same general vicinity until its abolition in 1949 when most of it was included in the resurrected Electoral district of Balonne. 
Un Soir de Joie (French) is a Belgian comic film directed by Gaston Schoukens and released in 1955. The film's plot takes place in German-occupied Belgium during World War II, and focuses on the so-called Faux Soir, a satirical version of the German controlled newspaper Le Soir produced by the resistance. 
The film's title is a pun, referring both to "An evening of joy", and "A Le Soir of joy". The film includes extensive footage of Brussels in the 1950s, where it was filmed on location. 
The designations W Centauri and w Centauri refer to two different stars in the constellation Centaurus. 
After leaving Riga FC in the summer 2018, Etock signed with FC Honka for the 2019 season. The deal was announced already on 15 November 2018. He played three cup games for the club before he terminated his contract with the club, after failing to break into the team. On 12 April 2019, FC Lahti announced that he had signed a 4-month contract with the club. 
In 1982, international zoo, aquarium, and wildlife authorities gathered to set goals for establishing the new zoo. It was determined that a zoo should not only be a place to see animals, but also an institution of conservation and education. That same year, White River State Park was announced as the new site of the zoo. The groundbreaking at the new downtown location was held in September 1985. The old zoo closed in 1987. 
After the construction of the Waters building and the Dolphin Pavilion, the zoo earned AZA accreditation as an aquarium as well as a zoo. In 1996, the Indianapolis Zoo became the first institution to be triple-accredited as a zoo, aquarium, and botanical garden. White River Gardens was considered a separate facility from 1999 to 2006, but now is included as part of the zoo. 
The zoo hosts more than a million visitors each year and plays a role in worldwide conservation and research, including accomplishing the world's first successful artificial insemination of an African elephant. 
The zoo will soon be undergoing a major expansion. The current 13-acre parking lot will be converted into new animal exhibits. A chimpanzee facility will be one of the first major exhibits constructed in the expansion process. The new parking system will consist of 28 new acres of land the zoo recently acquired.[citation needed] 
The Indianapolis Zoo is organized around the concept of biomes. Biomes are areas of the planet with similar climate, plants, and animals. Animals at the Indianapolis Zoo are clustered in groups with similar habitats, which define the biomes. At the Indianapolis Zoo, one can visit the five biomes listed below. 
The Indianapolis Zoo's highlight is a large dolphin pavilion, which features a combination of approaches to dolphin/human interaction. 
On top of the water, the interior of the St. Vincent Dolphin Theater features a million-gallon plus pool where dolphin presentations occurs daily. There are 10 bottlenose dolphins: Calypso (F), Jett (M), Hemingway (M), Kimo (M), Orin (M), Taz (M), Indy (F), Maui, (M), Nova (F), and Trooper (M). 
The zoo also has the Midwest's only in-water dolphin program for the public, allowing guests to interact with the dolphins in their exhibit. 
MISTery Park is a landscaped path featuring flowers, tall grasses, and trees with a cooling fog created by misters.  It is also the home of the two-toed sloth exhibit. The exhibit opened in 2019. 
On January 19, 2009, 15 bonnethead sharks died due to a maintenance error. When the filtration system was taken offline for cleaning, the ozone valve was turned off, to prevent the sharks from suffocating. The valve was turned back on by a staff member effectively killing them. 
The men's 100 metres at the 2011 Asian Athletics Championships was held at the Kobe Universiade Memorial Stadium on the 7 and 8 of July. 
In enzymology, a sulfolactate sulfo-lyase (EC 4.4.1.24, Suy, SuyAB, 3-sulfolactate bisulfite-lyase, sulfolactate sulfo-lyase) is an enzyme that catalyzes the chemical reaction 
This enzyme belongs to the family of lyases, specifically the class of carbon-sulfur lyases.  The systematic name of this enzyme class is 3-sulfolactate bisulfite-lyase (pyruvate-forming). Other names in common use include Suy, SuyAB, and 3-sulfolactate bisulfite-lyase. 
 Palin (Vidhan Sabha constituency) is one of the 60 assembly constituencies of  Arunachal Pradesh a north east state of India. Palin is part of Arunachal East Lok Sabha constituency. 
Moshe Yosef is a former Israeli footballer who played in Maccabi Netanya and was a part of the team that won the 1970-71 championship. 
The Leisure Hive is the first serial of the 18th season of the British science fiction television series Doctor Who, which was first broadcast in four weekly parts on BBC1 from 30 August to 20 September 1980. It marks the return of John Leeson as the voice of K9. 
In the serial, a criminal organisation of alien Foamasi called the West Lodge attempt to buy the planet Argolis from the Argolin people there as a West Lodge base. Meanwhile, the young Argolin Pangol (David Haig) seeks to start a war against the Foamasi his people had previously lost to with an army made up of clones of himself. 
Working titles for this story included The Argolins and Avalon. Writer David Fisher conceived of the Foamasi as a race of organised criminals. "Foamasi" is a near-anagram of "mafioso". The episode was written as a satire of the decline of tourism in the United Kingdom in the 1970s. The alien costume used for the Foamasi was later reused in the 1981 BBC The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy as the leader of the G'Gugvuntt. 
In a further attempt to update the image of the series, the original 1963 Delia Derbyshire arrangement of the theme music was replaced by a more contemporary-sounding arrangement by Peter Howell, and a new, '80s-styled neon tubing logo (which was en-vogue at the time) designed by Sid Sutton replaced the diamond logo most associated with the Fourth Doctor. The updated title sequence is most associated with the Fifth Doctor. 
Laurence Payne had previously played Johnny Ringo in The Gunfighters (1966) and later played Dastari in The Two Doctors (1985). 
A novelisation of this serial, written by David Fisher, was published by Target Books in July 1982. The novelisation retains many elements of the original script that was intended as a spoof on the Mafia. The original name of Argolis is given as Xbrrrm. 
The Leisure Hive was released on VHS in January 1997, on DVD in July 2004, and as part of the Doctor Who DVD Files (issue 98) in October 2012. Peter Howell's incidental music for the serial was released as part of the compilation album Doctor Who at the BBC Radiophonic Workshop Volume 3: The Leisure Hive in 2002. 
In between jobs as a teacher, he attended and graduated in 1826 from Pennsylvania's Washington College, where he became an instructor. He was close friends with Washington College's President Andrew Wylie and lived in Wylie's house for a time; they often would walk the three miles to Washington College together. 
McGuffey left Washington College in 1826 to become a professor of ancient languages at Miami University in Oxford, Ohio. In 1832, he was transferred to the chair of moral philosophy. 
In 1829, he was licensed as a minister in the Presbyterian Church at Bethel Chapel.[citation needed] He preached frequently during the remainder of his life. 
Truman and Smith, a Cincinnati publisher, wanted to publish a series of four graded readers f